
 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com
Bioanalytical Laboratory Services | Multi-omics | Firalis Molecular Precision, CRO & CDMO We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Your end-to-end partner, From biomarker discovery to IVD kit production. Trusted by biopharmaceutical organizations, researchers and healthcare professionals for providing a powerful multi-omics approach across the entire drug and diagnostic product development pipelines, with precision and regulatory expertise. Our approach Our commitment Our DNA At the core of our values lies a commitment to fostering collaboration and crafting tailored innovative solutions for academia, research organizations, and biopharmaceutical companies, recognizing the unique challenges and opportunities each sector presents. Unique solutions Swift turnaround times Steadfast collaboration Cost-effectiveness Regulatory compliance Innovative technology Global presence Client-centric approach Our services From state-of-the-art genomics and proteomics solutions to Mass Spectrometry assays, data science and ASD/Production, our cutting-edge services are all designed to accelerate your research and biomarker discovery journey. Bioanalytical Services Biobanking Genomics Proteomics Lipido-metabolomics Associated Services Bioinformatics & Biostatistics Assay Development & IVD kit Production Find the service that helps you meet your research goals Support throughout the whole process Discovery Pre-clinical Research Clinical Development Approval An essential step in drug development FMP plays a pivotal role in drug development’s discovery phase, leveraging advanced expertise and cutting-edge technologies to craft customized bioanalytical strategies for discovery programs. Leveraging a holistic multi-omic approach, we delve deep into biomarker/target discovery and validation, laying the foundation for robust disease understanding. Our expertise extends to elucidating the intricate mechanisms of action underlying various diseases, empowering pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies throughout this critical phase. Explore our drug discovery capabilities Laying the foundation - Investigating safety and efficacy before human trials In pre-clinical research, we offer comprehensive services from early to late stages. Our expertise includes biomarker studies, drug safety and efficacy assessments, drug concentration quantification, and custom assay development, providing tailored solutions for advancing biomedical science. Leveraging both in vitro and in vivo experiments, we rigorously evaluate the effects of drugs to ensure thorough understanding and informed decision-making throughout the drug development process. Explore our drug effect assessment capabilities Comprehensive support across trial phases In clinical development, our support spans phases 1 to 3, encompassing a wide array of services. We investigate short-term adverse reactions, evaluate drug activity, measure efficacy, and discover prognostic and diagnostic biomarkers. We also initiate CDx development, evaluate drug effects and adverse events, and validate drug response signatures and biomarkers clinically. Furthermore, we conduct CDx CoU validation and develop custom assays, ensuring comprehensive assistance throughout the clinical trial journey. Explore our solutions for clinical development Steadfast support for post-market surveillance In the post-approval phase, we remain steadfast in our commitment to ensuring the ongoing safety and efficacy of approved treatments. Our comprehensive post-market surveillance program includes diligent monitoring of long-term biomarker efficacy, safety profiles, and the balance of risks and benefits associated with the use of pharmaceutical products. Leveraging advanced technologies and methodologies, we conduct thorough assessments to identify any emerging concerns and promptly address them to safeguard patient well-being. Additionally, we undertake the production of CDx kits, facilitating the integration of personalized medicine approaches into clinical practice and enhancing patient care outcomes. Explore our solutions for post-market surveillance From samples to insights Uncovering insights requires going beyond data generation. It requires an approach that analyzes multiple layers of information simultaneously. Our team of experts can support you throughout your R&D from samples to insights. Study Planning Samples Collection – Kick off design – Scientific support ​ Sample Management Quality control – Labelling – Barcoding – Blinding LIMS Registry > Freezing (-4 to -150°C) > Monitoring (24/7) ​ Pre-Analytical Services​ Samples Aliquoting – Extraction Services – Custom Protocols ​ Sample Analysis & QC​ Genomics – Epigenomics – Transcriptomics – Proteomics – Metabolomics ​ Data Analysis​ Bioinformatics & ML – Statistics – Internal Data Storage ​ Insights Reporting​ Raw Data – Custom Analysis – Data Visualization ​ Scientific insights and news View all insights Deadline extended to apply for the MERSCOPE® Grant Program in collaboration with Vizgen To offer researchers across Europe a chance to leverage spatial transcriptomics in their research field, our MERSCOPE® Platform Grant Program's deadline has been extended until June 30... Read More Firalis Molecular Precision becomes a Certified Olink Service Provider Firalis Molecular Precision becomes a Certified Olink Service Provider, proving proficiency in using the Flex, Target 48 & 96, Explore HT, and Explore 384-plex panels for proteomics analysis... Read More Firalis Molecular Precision announces its participation in Swiss Biotech Day 2024 Firalis Molecular Precision announces its participation in Swiss Biotech Day 2024, in Basel, Switzerland, April 22-23, a platform for networking and collaboration in the life sciences community... Read More Partner with us Our experts are committed to providing you with strategic multi-omics solutions tailored to your research goals, in each and every therapeutic area. Get in touch Join us Want to help us drive progress in precision medicine by supporting researchers, biopharmaceutical organizations and healthcare professionals ? View job opportunities Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/cro-cdmo-services/
CRO & CDMO Services | Drug development | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Our approach Supporting biopharmaceutical companies, researchers and healthcare professionals​ with tools to advance precision medicine. Dedicated resources and a holistic approach We offer specialied expertise and resources in the context of generating and analyzing of genomics, trasncriptomics, proteomics, metabolomics, and lipidomics data. We boast a diverse team of scientists, engineers, and industry experts with deep domain knowledge in specific therapeutic areas, scientific disciplines, and technical capabilities, who is committed to providing our sponsors with strategic, cost-effective, tailored and comprehensive solutions to fit their R&D needs. With 15+ years of experience and a deep understanding of the latest technologies, we are committed to delivering the highest quality results for our sponsors with swift turnaround times. 0 operational offices 0 PhD experts 0 square feet labs 0 years of experience Partnering with us is the key to accelerate your research, streamline development processes, and optimize manufacturing operations. How can we support your research project ? Reach out to our experts Our services From genomics and proteomics solutions to assay development, omic data analysis and custom kit production, our CRO & CDMO services are all designed to accelerate and streamline your drug development and diagnostic product development journeys. With scientific expertise and a deep understanding of the latest technologies, our experts are committed to delivering the highest quality and most reliable results for our sponsors. Bioanalytical CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Proteomics Mass Spectrometry Assay Associated and CDMO services Data Science Assay Development Custom Kit Production Find the service that meets your research needs Get in touch Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/cro-cdmo-services/storage-of-biological-and-chemical-samples/
Biobanking solutions | Sample storage and management | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Biobanking infrastructure Long-term biological and chemical sample storage and management under optimal conditions. OUR TEAM A powerful combination of expertise and infrastructure allowing us to deliver biobanking solutions that address the diverse and evolving needs of our clients. OUR CAPABILITIES Sample storage and aliquoting | Labeling, packaging and documenting aliquots for easy tracking | Temperature monitoring | Manual and automated DNA/RNA extraction EXPLORE OUR SERVICES Storage and Aliquoting Service A secure and efficient solution for storing and managing samples while ensuring their integrity and stability is provided through our sample storage and management service. With an extensive storage capacity accommodating various sample types and sizes, including body fluids (WB, Plasma, Serum, CSF, Exomes, RNA, DNA) as well as cells and tissues, our services also encompass an aliquoting service. This service involves labeling, packaging, and documenting aliquots for easy tracking and future use in quality control, research and development, or testing. Services are fully personalized, and assistance with sample retrieval and shipping is available through our team if needed. Nucleic Acids Extraction Service We offer a high-quality DNA/RNA extraction service, delivering nucleic acids suitable for diverse applications. Manual and automated extraction methods, along with various techniques, are employed to isolate DNA or RNA from a range of sample types, including blood, tissues, and cells. Rigorous protocols are adhered to in order to guarantee the purity and integrity of the extracted nucleic acids. Extraction protocols can be customized to align with specific research needs, allowing for variations in parameters such as downstream application, sample volume, and extraction yield. We ensure the integrity and security of your samples. In our state-of-the-art biobanking facility, we ensure optimal storage and preservation of biological and chemical samples through strict adherence to cold chain standards, guaranteeing reliable results for research projects. What sets our biobanking services apart ? Large storage capacity A dedicated space of 250 m² accommodating a variety of sample types (FFPE, Fresh Frozen, PBMC, Cell Lines, Fluids) and packaging formats. Controlled temperature Cold room, freezers, liquid nitrogen containers for optimal sample storage : +4°C, -20°C, -80°C, -150°C Sample tracking system Agilent Laboratory Information Management System (SLIMS), possible tracking using unique 2D bar code, database regularly updated. 24/7 on-call system Continuous temperature monitoring (radio transmitter sensors), backup freezers, power supply generators, intrusion detection alerts High quality worldwide-used standards In adherence to your specific requirements, we implement stringent quality control measures and uphold traceability throughout every stage of the sample life cycle. Our quality assurance process guarantees the acquisition of all data in accordance with our established standards. ISO 9001 : for high quality management. ISO 20387 : for high quality management and processing of biological resources. ISO 14001 : for a high quality environmental management system (EMS). Our quality assurance practices If you are interested in benefiting from our biobanking services for the handling of your samples Reach out to a biobanking specialist Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/cro-cdmo-services/genomic-services/
Biomarker discovery through genomics | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Genomics solutions Designing and implementing genomics strategies aligning with our clients' objectives in every therapeutic area (oncology, cardiology, immunology and inflammation). OUR TEAM A powerful combination of scientific expertise and cutting-edge platforms allowing us to deliver customized genomics solutions that address the diverse and evolving needs of our clients. OUR CAPABILITIES RT-qPCR platforms High-throughput NGS platforms Single-cell sequencing platform Spatial gene expression studying platform EXPLORE OUR SERVICES Next-Generation Sequencing services Our NGS service leverages a full range of sequencing systems by Illumina®, allowing us to adapt to all project sizes – the NextSeq 2000, the NovaSeq 6000 Dx, and the NovaSeq X Plus – for gene expression profiling, epigenetic analysis, or target-specific investigations. Applications include mRNA, Total RNA & non-coding RNA sequencing, methyl sequencing, and whole genome & exome sequencing. Learn more about our NGS services Single-cell Sequencing services​ Our single-cell sequencing service leverages the 10x Genomics Chromium iX instrument, fueled by Next GEM technology, to offer high-resolution analysis of individual cells. Our experts use different protocols to provide insights into transcriptional mechanisms and gene regulation of individual cells, shedding light on gene expression dynamics and RNA-regulated biological processes. Learn more about our Single-cell Sequencing services Spatial Transcriptomics services Our spatial transcriptomics services uses the cutting-edge Vizgen® technology to provide high-resolution spatial mapping of gene expression within tissue samples. This technology enables identification of spatially-resolved molecular signatures and has applications in a range of research areas including developmental biology, cancer research, and neuroscience. Learn more about our Spatial Transcriptomics services Custom RT-qPCR Services Our custom RT-qPCR service provides sensitive and accurate quantification of gene expression levels. We offer a wide range of TaqMan probes and primer sets for your specific gene of interest, and can provide consultation on experimental design and data analysis. Learn more about our RT-qPCR services Leverage and tailor our multi-platform genomics solutions for your research projects Get in touch with our team of scientists Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/cro-cdmo-services/genomic-services/next-generation-sequencing-services/
Next-Generation Sequencing services | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Next-Generation Sequencing Cutting-edge sequencing technology generating high-throughput high-quality genetic data EXPLORE OUR NGS SERVICES Whole Genome Sequencing Whole Genome Sequencing (WGS) provides a complete map of an organism’s DNA. With this service, entire genome can be sequenced to determine genetic variants that may be associated to disease or other phenotypic traits. WGS can be used for de-novo assembly when the genome of interest is poorly annotated. Epigenomics Epigenomics refer to a range of technics used to analyze the chemical modifications and interactions between DNA and proteins to better understand the molecular mechanisms underlying complex diseases and identify potential targets for therapeutic intervention. Targeted Sequencing Targeted Sequencing is a technique allowing to focus on specific regions of interest in the genome. Our service is ideal for identifying genetic variants that are associated with specific diseases or traits. RNA Sequencing RNA Sequencing is a powerful tool for studying gene expression and identifying novel transcripts. Our service provides a complete transcriptome, for the identification of genes that are differentially expressed under different conditions. Whole genome Sequencing Methyl-Seq Single Cell & Bulk ATAC-Seq CUT&RUN Whole Exome Sequencing Custom Genes Panel CRISPR Validation Assay HTG targeted panel RNA Seq Non-coding RNA Seq Exome Sequencing Single-Cell RNA Seq (10X®) OUR ANALYTICAL PARK Our labs are equipped with the latest and most innovative technologies dedicated to Next-Generation Sequencing, leading to a swift sample analysis and reduced analytical cost. Output range Run time Maximum reads per run Maximum read lenght NextSeq 500 16-120 Gb 15-29 hr 130-400 M 2×150 bp NextSeq 2000 10-360 Gb 10-48 hr 100M-1.2 B 2×300 bp NovaSeq 6000Dx 80 Gb-6 Tb 13-<45 hr 800M-10 B x2 2×250 bp* NovaSeq X Plus 265 Gb-16 Tb 13-48 hr 25 B x2 2×150 bp* * Possibility to generate contiguous long-read sequences of 5-7 kb with some reads > 10 kb What sets our Next-Generation Sequencing services apart ? High-quality results We use the latest sequencing technology and only the highest quality reagents and equipment to ensure that our clients’ receive the most accurate and reliable results. Qualified team Our team has extensive experience in sequencing and omic data analysis and is dedicated to provide a tailored solution and extensive support throughout our clients’ projects. Fast turnaround time Understanding that time is critical when it comes to research projects, we strive to provide fast turnaround times without compromising on quality. Tailored strategic solutions Understanding the uniqueness of every research project, we offer omics solutions tailored to our clients’ specific needs and research goals, from sample preparation to data analysis. If you are interested in benefiting from our genomics services leveraging Illumina® technology for your research Reach out to an expert Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/singlecell-sequencing-services/
Single-Cell Sequencing services | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Single-cell Sequencing Explore gene expression profiles at a single cell level combining gene expression data with cell surface markers, TCR and BCR clone frequencies or open chromatin analysis. Our single-cell sequencing service uses the latest technology from 10x Genomics® to provide high-quality single-cell sequencing data : the Chromium iX. Our experts use two specific protocols: the 3’/5’ protocol and the Fixed Flex protocol, providing valuable insights into transcriptional mechanisms and gene regulation. This diverse approach enables us to conduct precise analyses, shedding light on gene expression dynamics and RNA-regulated biological processes. 10x Genomics® Next GEM TECHNOLOGY PRINCIPLE 10x Genomics® Next GEM technology uses droplet-based microfluidics to partition individual cells into tiny droplets, where each droplet is loaded with unique barcoded primers that enable the identification of individual cells during sequencing. This technology allows for high-throughput analysis of thousands of individual cells, enabling a more comprehensive understanding of cellular heterogeneity. Illustration of the 10x Genomics® Next GEM Technology principle EXPLORE OUR SERVICES Sample preparation We provide assistance with cell isolation, dissociation, and preservation to ensure high-quality single-cell suspensions for downstream sequencing. Library preparation We perform library preparation using the 10x Genomics platform, which includes cell encapsulation, barcoding, and cDNA synthesis. Our service includes quality control measures to ensure that only high-quality libraries are used for sequencing. Sequencing We offer high-throughput sequencing on Illumina® platforms to generate high-quality single-cell sequencing data. Data analysis We provide a comprehensive analysis of the single-cell sequencing data, including quality control, alignment, quantification of gene expression, and clustering analysis to identify cell subpopulations and marker genes. What sets our Single-Cell Sequencing services apart ? Comprehensive analysis of cellular heterogeneity Our single-cell RNA Seq service enables a comprehensive analysis of cellular heterogeneity and thus, the identification of cell subpopulations and marker genes that would be missed in traditional bulk sequencing approaches. Qualified team Our experts in single-cell sequencing and omics data analysis will provide assistance throughout the entire sequencing process, from sample preparation to data analysis, to ensure a successful project outcome. High-quality data We use state-of-the-art technology and quality control measures to ensure high-quality data, which is critical for downstream analysis. If you're interested in learning more about our single-cell sequencing services leveraging 10x Genomics® technology Reach out to our experts Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/cro-cdmo-services/genomic-services/spatial-transcriptomics-services/
Spatial Transcriptomics Services | Capture transcriptional activity | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Spatial Transcriptomics Cutting-edge technology from Vizgen enabling us to study the spatial organization of biological molecules in your tissue samples. Firalis Molecular Precision positions itself as a leading certified Vizgen service-provider in Europe. Our Spatial Transcriptomics solutions allow researchers to obtain high-resolution and spatially-resolved gene expression data from tissue samples, enabling them to gain insight into the relationships between genes, cells, and tissues. What is Spatial Transcriptomics ? Spatial transcriptomics is an approach allowing to obtain gene expression data in its spatial context. In fact, it allows for the simultaneous detection of thousands of genes within a tissue sample, while preserving its native spatial organization. This approach has broad applicability in the fields of biology, medicine, and drug discovery. Our service uses Vizgen's patented MERFISH technology, which enables the detection of up to 500 genes/panel in a single tissue sample. The MERFISH technology provides high spatial resolution, allowing for the vizualisation of gene expression patterns at the single-cell level. Our genomics experts leverage this cutting-edge technology to offer an end-to-end service, ranging from sample preparation and data generation to analysis and visualization. We also provide customized data analysis solutions to aid resarchers in gaining insights from their generated data. MERFISH technology principle MERFISH is an image-based transcriptomic technology measuring both expression and spatial information of RNA in individual cells from tissue slices. Vizgen’s MERFISH allows massive multiplexing single molecule FISH measurement. Individual RNA species are encoded by error robust barcodes using combinatorial oligonucleotide labeling. Sequential rounds of oligonucleotides hybridization and imaging by a high resolution fluorescence microscope measure barcodes for spatially resolved RNA quantification of up to 500 genes. To perform a MERFISH experiment, tissue samples are first fixed. Then, they are hybridized with the specially designed DNA probes. The samples are then imaged using a fluorescence microscope. Each individual RNA molecule identified and localized based on its unique combination of fluorescent signals. Read the original publication on " Spatially resolved, highly multiplexed RNA profiling in single cells " What sets our Spatial Transcriptomics services apart ? Qualified team of experts Our experts have extensive experience in sequencing and bioinformatics analysis. We provide assistance throughout the entire sequencing process, from sample preparation to data analysis, to ensure a successful project outcome. High-quality data and data analysis Our genomics experts leverage cutting-edge technology and quality control measures to ensure high-quality data generation and work closely with our sponsors to ensure that their research objectives are met. Competitive pricing We offer competitive pricing for our spatial transcriptomics services to enable broad access to this powerful technology. Certified service provider We are positioned as a leading certified service-provider in Europe for Vizgen’s MERSCOPE® Platform. Leverage our scientific expertise and in-house technology to obtain high-quality, spatially-resolved gene expression data from your samples. Talk to one of our experts Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/cro-cdmo-services/genomic-services/custom-rt-qpcr-services/
https://www.gene-quantification.de/flyer-biomark-96x96.pdf
The BioMark™ 96.96 Dynamic Array provides the flexibility of a  microwell plate and the density of a microarray in one easy-to-use,  consumable integrated fluidic circuit (IFC). The key advantages include:  •	Easy	multiplexing	of	96	primer-probe	sets	against	96	samples •	9,216	individual	data	points	per	dynamic	array •	192	liquid-transfer	steps	per	9,216	reactions, 	with	complete	setup	flexibility The New Standard in High Throughput Profiling BioMark dynamic arrays radically reduce the cost per data point   and time to results while radically raising the bar for parallel throughput. The chart below shows parameters to complete a study of 2,000   samples against 96 genes using 384-well plates as compared to 96.96  Dynamic Arrays:   384-WELL   96.96 DYNAMIC  TOTAL RUNS  500  21 REACTIONS PER RUN  384  9,216 TOTAL LIQUID-TRANSFER STEPS  384,000  4,032 TOTAL MASTER MIX  960 ml  5.1 ml With a dynamic array, high-throughput multiplexing is easy because the microfluidic architecture does the work of combining samples and  primer-probe sets into 9,216 PCR reactions. That’s twenty four-fold  more data than is produced by a 384-well plate. This radical advance in experiment density is fully leveraged through a hardware/software  system that automates setup and data analysis.    Gene expression results may be viewed as a heat map  showing 9,216 reactions per run.New 96.96	Dynamic	arrayPRoD uCT NeWs HigH THrougHpuT MulTiplex pcr – Gene ExpressionThe BioMark 96.96 Dynamic Array HiGH-THrOUGHPUT	mULTiPLEX	Pcr Gene	Expression SnP	Genotyping Digital	PcrThe BioMark System for  Genetic Analysis  Digital Arrays  Consumable IFCs for digital PCR.  Dynamic Arrays  Consumable IFCs for gene expression analysis  and sNP genotyping. IFC Controller   Integrated hardware/software for loading IFCs. Real-Time qPCR System  Integrated hardware/software for thermal cycling and real-time or end-point detection of fluorescent signal within BioMark IFCs. Software Suite  Analysis software for real-time qPCR,   sNP genotyping, and digital PCR. Service Plans  Hardware service and software maintenance plans.The BioMark 96.96 Dynamic Array – Gene Expression For Use with Gold-Standard PCR Assays The BioMark system runs licensed 5' nuclease assays, so it integrates  easily into established workflow. The footprint of the dynamic array  and spacing of fluid inlets comply with sBs* standards, so the  laboratory may continue to use existing liquid-handling equipment.  Fluidigm has adopted sBs standards for all of its systems, ensuring  compatibility of BioMark instrumentation with higher density arrays in future releases. * The society for Biomolecular sciences96.96 Dynamic Array –   Gene Expression Specifications coMpoNeNTs   PARAMeTeR sPeCIFICATIoNs Quantitative resolution 2-fold difference in starting copy    with 99.7 % confidence and 6-log of    dynamic range Chip format sBs Compatible    (128 mm x 85 mm x 14 mm) Inlet spacing on input frame 4.5 mm pitch Liquid transfer steps 192 Primer-probe inlets 96 sample inlets 96 Reaction chambers 9,216 Reaction volume 6.7 nlPRoD uCT NeWs HigH THrougHpuT MulTiplex pcr Work Flow 1 prime  Prime the  dynamic array to close the interface valves, preventing premature mixing of samples   and assays.2 Transfer  Pipette samples, premixed with master mix, into separate sample inlets and the primer-probe sets into separate primer-probe inlets on the frame of the chip.3 load  Place the dynamic array on the IFC controller, and use the software interface to pressure load the assay components into reaction chambers. Assay components are automatically combined on-chip.4 run  Place the dynamic array on the BioMark Real-Time PCR s ystem for  thermal cycling and fluorescence detection.5 Analyze  use real-time qPCR Analysis software to view and to interact with amplification curves, color-coded heat maps, and C t data for the  run. corporate Headquarters  Fluidigm Corporation  7000 shoreline Court, suite 100   south san Francisco, CA 94080 us A Toll-free: 1.866.FLuIDLINe   Fax: 650.871.7152   www.fluidigm.com sales  North America   650.266.6170 | biomark@fluidigm.com europe/eMeA  +31 20 578 8853 | biomarkeurope@fluidigm.com Japan/Korea   +81 3 3555 2351 | biomarkasia@fluidigm.com Asia  +65 9431 3790  | biomarkasia@fluidigm.com © Fluidigm Corporation. All rights reserved. Fluidigm, the Fluidigm logo, BioMark, NanoFlex and FLuIDLINe  are trademarks or registered trademarks of Fluidigm Corporation  in the u .s. and/or other countries. All other trademarks are the  property of their respective owners.  Fluidigm recommends that you only purchase TaqMan®   dual-labeled probes and/or other licensed PCR assay reagents  from authorized sources. FoR ReseARCH use oNLY.   MRKT00085e


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/cro-cdmo-services/genomic-services/custom-rt-qpcr-services/
Custom RT-qPCR services | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Custom RT-qPCR Providing you with the most accurate and reliable analysis for your single gene or multiple genes analyses across a large number of samples. Our analytical park We use the latest equipment and technology to perform RT-qPCR experiments with high sensitivity, specificity, and reproducibility. CFX96 QS5-DX™ CFS Opus 96 - Dx Fluidigm Biomark™ HD Number of samples per assay 96 samples/assay 96 samples/assay 96 samples/assay 96 samples/assay RUO IVDR Manufacturer’s information Know more Know more Know more Know more RT-qPCR principle RT-qPCR is a molecular biology technique used to measure the amount of RNA molecules present in a sample. The technique involves converting RNA to complementary DNA (cDNA) using reverse transcription. Then, cDNA is amplified using PCR (polymerase chain reaction) with fluorescent probes (SYBR Green or TaqMan). The amount of fluorescence produced is directly proportional to the amount of cDNA present in the sample, allowing for quantitative analysis of gene expression levels. What sets our custom RT-qPCR services apart ? Our custom RT-qPCR services are ideal for researchers who need accurate and reliable gene expression analysis for their experiments. Whether you are studying gene expression in cancer cells, investigating the role of specific genes in disease (genetic variations like SNPs or CNVs or miRNA profiling and disease phenotyping) or developing new molecular diagnostic assays, our service can help you achieve your research goals. A range of customized services Primer design, RNA isolation, cDNA synthesis, and PCR analysis are the customized services that we offer. High-quality data Our experts use advanced platforms to perform RT-qPCR with high sensitivity and specificity. We provide you with customized data analysis and interpretation. Qualified Team Our genomics team has extensive experience and training in RT-qPCR. We provides assistance throughout the entire process, from sample preparation to data analysis, to ensure a successful project outcome. Leverage our scientific expertise and advanced RT-qPCR platforms in-house for your research project Get in touch with one of our experts Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/cro-cdmo-services/protomics-services-immunoassays-quanterix-olink/
Proteomics services for biomarker discovery | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Proteomics solutions Protein biomarker detection and quantification services and multiplexed immunoassay services powered by various cutting-edge technologies from Olink®, Quanterix®, and more OUR TEAM A powerful combination of scientific expertise and cutting-edge platforms allowing us to deliver customized proteomics solutions addressing the diverse and evolving needs of our clients. OUR CAPABILITIES Panel customization and validation, from protein biomarker discovery to validation | Multiplexed immunoassays | Automated immunoassay platform for biomarker detection | Ultra-sensitive protein biomarker detection system. EXPLORE OUR SERVICES Large-protein screening using Olink® technology Firalis Molecular Precision positions itself as a certified Olink® Technology service provider and as one of the world’s first service providers. Our experts leverage the Olink® Signature Q100 platform under GCLP conditions with the Flex and Target 48 panels. Target 96 and Explore panels are also leveraged for our services. Our services play a pivotal role in drug target discovery, elucidating drug MoA, and conducting biomarker screening. Learn more about our Olink® technology-powered services Absolute biomarker quantification with multiplexed immunoassays With a repertoire of over +1000 validated assays, our immunoassay services feature cutting-edge technologies, including Bio-rad Luminex® BioPlex 200™, MSD Meso Sector S 600mm and Protein Simple ELLA™ for protein biomarker absolute quantification. Specializing in cytokines testing, surrogate biomarkers, and biomarker validation, our services cater to diverse therapeutic areas, including immunology, oncology, cardiology, and neurology. Learn more about our immunoassay services Ultra-sensitive biomarker detection systems Our experts leverage the Quanterix SR-X™, powered by the Simoa® bead technology, and Quanterix SP-X™ technologies. These platforms, with applicability for immuno-oncology, neurological and inflammatory biomarkers, redefine protein detection and quantification, enabling researchers to explore ultra-low concentrations with sensitivity and precision. Learn more about our ultra-sensitive biomarker detection services Leverage and tailor our multi-platform proteomics solutions for your research projects Get in touch with our team of scientists Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/cro-cdmo-services/protomics-services-immunoassays-quanterix-olink/large-scale-protein-identification/
Protein biomarker discovery | Certified Olink Service Provider | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Large-scale protein identification with Olink technology Our service leverages Olink® Explore, Target and Flex panels, providing a comprehensive overview of protein expression levels in biological samples. Firalis Molecular Precision is a Certified Olink Service Provider, proving proficiency in using the Flex, Target 48 & 96, Explore HT, and Explore 384-plex panels for proteomics analysis. Olink® Technology Olink® technology is a powerful tool for studying protein expression, allowing a comprehensive understanding of biological processes. Our service offers three different Olink® panels : Olink® Explore and Explore HT, Olink® Target (96 and 48) and Olink® Flex . The protein detection is allowed by Proximity Extended Assay (PEA), a sensitive and high-throughput technology. In PEA, pairs of oligonucleotide-labeled antibodies are used to capture and detect target proteins, and the proximity of the antibodies leads to the formation of a DNA amplicon that can be quantified by qPCR or Next Generation Sequencing (NGS). Proximity Extended Assay (PEA) Principle Learn more about PEA technology Olink® Explore panel This high-throughput protein biomarker discovery platform, using Olink®’s PEA technology and NGS readout on Illumina® instruments, allows precise measurement of thousands of human plasma proteins with minimal sample usage. The Olink® Explore 3072 provides access to the entire Olink® protein library of around 3000 assays, suitable for exploratory proteomics and multi-omics studies. Alternatively, for focused projects, one from the eight Explore 384-plex panels within the Explore 3072 library can be chosen. 3072 assay through 8 x 384-plex kits (customizable panel selection, running from 1 to 8 panels) : Olink® Explore 384 Cardiometabolic & Cardiometabolic II Olink® Explore 384 Inflammation & Inflammation II Olink® Explore 384 Neurology & Neurology II Olink® Explore 384 Oncology & Oncology II Learn more about Olink® Explore Olink® Explore HT panel A significant leap forward in next generation proteomics Proteomics are critical for understanding disease pathology and accelerating protein biomarker discovery. With the disruptive Olink® Explore HT panel, the solution for high-throughput protein biomarker discovery, we are able to measure over 5,400 protein biomarkers in only 2 µl of sample with accuracy, speed and quality, unveiling the human proteome in the blink of an eye and providing deeper biological insights for our clients. Contact us Learn more Olink® Target panel The Olink® Target 96 & 48 panels provide high-multiplex immunoassays for efficient targeted protein biomarker discovery. Identifying multiple proteins to create a signature enables faster and more informed decisions in human protein biomarker research, maintaining superior data quality and performance compared to a single-protein focus. Proteomics analyses using the Olink® Target 48 panel are conducted under GcLP conditions. Olink® Target 96 Limit of detection below pg/mL with only 1 µL of sample per panel. 15 panel disease specific with more than 1100 markers. 92 human proteins biomarkers measured simultaneously, up to 88 samples in one panel. 14 human disease-focused and 1 panel for Mouse exploratory research also available. Olink® Target 48 To measure 45 well established, inflammation-related human protein biomarkers simultaneously Needs only 1 µL of sample. Results reported in standard concentration units (pg/mL) or NPX units. Olink® Target 48 Mouse Cytokine Measures 43 biomarkers from just 1 µL of sample Monitor Inflammation and Immune Response . Carry out longitudinal studies on the same mouse (multiple blood samples), to avoid experimenting on a large number of mice. Learn more about Olink® Target 96 & 48 Olink® Flex panel Olink® Flex is a personalized product that allows the assembly of a biomarker panel comprising up to 21 human proteins. This is made possible by the ability to select from a pool of approximately 200 pre-validated protein biomarkers, which can be combined in various combinations. Proteomics analyses using the Olink® Flex panel are conducted under GcLP conditions. Industry-leading flexible assay library Up to 15 to 21 assays per panel, 40 samples per kit Readout in absolute quantification 200 inflammation-focused protein biomarkers Learn more about Olink® Flex What sets our large-scale protein identification services apart ? Wide range of biological matrices Large-scale protein identification in various biological matrices: Serum, EDTA plasma, Citrate plasma, Heparin plasma Highly multiplexed protein analysis Olink® technology enables simultaneous measurement of hundreds of proteins with low input in a single sample, saving time and costs compared to traditional methods. Qualified proteomics experts Our team, with extensive experience and training in using Olink® technologies, is committed to delivering optimal service and support for your research project, in every therapeutic area. If you are interested in leveraging Olink® technology for your protein biomarker research Reach out to our experts in proteomics Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/immunoassay-absolute-protein-quantification-proteomics-service/



 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/immunoassay-absolute-protein-quantification-proteomics-service/
https://www.bio-rad.com/webroot/web/pdf/lsr/literature/Bulletin_6006A.pdf
Practical, Versatile, and High-Throughput Options DeDicaTeD Magne Tic aDVanTage Bio-Rad offers a comprehensive selection of array readers for multiplex applications to satisfy a  variety of research needs and budgets. These readers include the Bio-Plex MAGPIX system with  practical multiplexing functionality, the versatile Bio-Plex 200 system, and the Bio-Plex 3D system  with high-throughput capacity. Assay performance based on sample concentration determinations, working assay ranges, limit of detection (LOD), and inter-assay %CV is similar on the Bio-Plex MAGPIX,  Bio-Plex 200, and Bio-Plex 3D systems. Bio-Plex Pro ™ assays can be run on all three systems.Bio-Plex® MAGPIX™ Bio-Plex® 200 and  Bio-Plex® 3D Systems — Comparable  Performance Across the Board Bio-Plex MAGPIX System Practical Multiplexing The Bio-Plex MAGPIX system   is appropriate for labs that have   n Budget constraints n Limited benchspace n  Interest in running magnetic   bead–based immunoassays Bio-Plex 200 System Unparalleled Versatility The Bio-Plex 200 system is   suitable for labs that value  n User-friendly data management  n  Benefits resulting from a  single acquisition and analysis   software package n  Running magnetic and   nonmagnetic assays Bio-Plex 3D System High-Throughput Capacity The Bio-Plex 3D system is   optimal for labs with n Fewer budget restrictions n High-throughput needs n Robotics-interfacing requirementsn Time savings n Cost effectiveness n Flexible multiplexing n Sample saving acute Phase Response cancer cardiovascular Disease cytokines, c hemokines,   growth Factors Diabetes gene e xpression genotyping immunoglobulin i sotyping MicroRnacell SignalingToxicologyFig. 1. Standard curve comparison of human 27-plex assays using the Bio-Plex MAGPIX (n), Bio-Plex 200 (n), and   Bio-Plex 3D (n) systems.Bio-Plex Pro human 27-plex group I cytokine assays were tested on the Bio-Plex MAGPIX, Bio-Plex 200, and   Bio-Plex 3D systems using 96-well plates. The performance of the Bio-Plex assays was compared based on  sensitivity, assay range, precision, accuracy, and sample concentrations. The standards, blanks, and serum  samples were run in duplicates using the low PMT setting on Bio-Plex 200 and Bio-Plex 3D systems. Comparable performance was observed from all three systems. Standard Curves from the Bio-Plex MAGPIX, Bio-Plex 200, and Bio-Plex 3D Systems Have Similar  Shapes and SlopesRepresentative standard curves from human 27-plex assays were generated for data acquired from the three  instruments (Figure 1). The standard curves have similar shapes and slopes. However, mean fluorescence intensity  (MFI) values obtained on the Bio-Plex 3D system were higher than those of the Bio-Plex 200 system. A high PMT setting on the Bio-Plex 200 system generated curves similar to those of the Bio-Plex 3D System. These higher MFI  values do not result in higher sensitivity. 1,000,000 100,000 10,000 1,000 100 10 0 1 10 100 1,000  10,000  100,000 1 10 100 1,000  10,000  100,0001 10 100 1,000  10,000  100,000 1 10 100 1,000  10,000  100,000 1 10 100 1,000  10,000  100,000IL-6 IL-8 TNF- aMFI1,000,000 100,000 10,000 1,000 100 10 01,000,000 100,000 10,000 1,000 100 10 0 1 10 100 1 ,000  10,000  100,000   1,000,000 100,000 10,000 1,000 100 10 0 Concentration, pg/mlMCP-1MFI1,000,000 100,000 10,000 1,000 100 10 0 Concentration, pg/mlIP-10 1,000,000 100,000 10,000 1,000 100 10 0 Concentration, pg/mlVEGF © 2012 Bio-Rad Laboratories, Inc. Bulletin 6006Fig. 2. LOD of Bio-Plex Pro human 27-plex group I cytokines using the Bio-Plex MAGPIX (n), Bio-Plex 200 (n), and   Bio-Plex 3D (n) systems.The Bio-Plex MAGPIX, Bio-Plex 200, and Bio-Plex 3D Systems Report Comparable LOD Values  LOD is the concentration corresponding to the minimum MFI value that can be reliably differentiated from  background and is defined as two standard deviations of the appropriate blank values. This translates into 99%  certainty that any signal measured at this MFI is the result of the presence of the analyte. The LOD of human 27-plex assays tested are shown here as mean values from three independent assays (Figure 2). Results demonstrate that  the sensitivity of the majority of analytes is comparable on all three instrument platforms. 7.0 6.0 5.0 4.0 3.0 2.0 1.0 0Concentration, pg/ml IL-1b IL-1ra IL-2 IL- 4 IL- 5 IL- 6 IL-7 IL- 8 IL-9 IL-10 IL-12p70 IL-13 IL-15 IL-17 Eotaxin FGF basic G-CSF GM-CSF IFN- g IP-10 MCP-1 MIP-1 a  PDGF-BB MIP-1 b  RANTES TNF- a VEGF Analyte The Bio-Plex 3D System Demonstrates Higher Background and Sample MFI Than Other Platforms  The background signal assessed using a human 27-plex assay was similar on the Bio-Plex MAGPIX and   Bio-Plex 200 systems, but was higher on the Bio-Plex 3D system (Figure 3). This corresponds to the proportionate  increase in MFI at all points of the standard curve on the Bio-Plex 3D system. 250 200 150 100 50 0MFI IL-1b IL-1ra IL-2 IL- 4 IL- 5 IL- 6 IL-7 IL- 8 IL-9 IL-10 IL-12p70 IL-13 IL-15 IL-17 Eotaxin FGF basic G-CSF GM-CSF IFN- g IP-10 MCP-1 MIP-1 a PDGF-BB MIP-1 b RANTES TNF- a VEGF Analyte Fig. 3. Background signal obtained with human 27-plex assays using the Bio-Plex MAGPIX (n), Bio-Plex 200 (n), and   Bio-Plex 3D (n) systems. Similar Inter-Assay Precision on All Three Instruments The inter-assay precision calculated using observed concentrations of spiked control from three independent  experiments was comparable on all three instrument types for most of the analytes tested (Figure 4). Spiked controls   were created by adding recombinant analytes to human serum. Fig. 4. Inter-assay precision of human 27-plex assays using the Bio-Plex MAGPIX (n), Bio-Plex 200 (n), and Bio-Plex 3D (n) systems.20 15 10 5 0%CV IL-1b IL-1ra IL-2 IL- 4 IL- 5 IL- 6 IL-7 IL- 8 IL-9 IL-10 IL-12p70 IL-13 IL-15 IL-17 Eotaxin FGF basic G-CSF GM-CSF IFN- g IP-10 MCP-1 MIP-1 a PDGF-BB MIP-1 b RANTES TNF- a VEGF Analyte © 2012 Bio-Rad Laboratories, Inc. Bulletin 6006Similar Working Assay Range  The working assay range is defined as the standard curve range where the analytes meet the recovery of   70–130% and intra-assay precision of 20% and is bound by the lower limit of quantification (LLOQ) and upper limit   of quantification (ULOQ). Assay ranges for most of the analytes were similar on all three instruments, with a few  minor fluctuations in LLOQ (Figure 5). Fig. 5. Lower limit of quantification (A) and upper limit of quantification (B) obtained with the Bio-Plex MAGPIX ( n), Bio-Plex 200 ( n),   and Bio-Plex 3D ( n) systems.12.0 10.0 8.0 6.0 4.0 2.0 0Concentration, pg/ml IL-1b IL-1ra IL-2 IL- 4 IL- 5 IL- 6 IL-7 IL- 8 IL-9 IL-10 IL-12p70 IL-13 IL-15 IL-17 Eotaxin FGF basic G-CSF GM-CSF IFN- g IP-10 MCP-1 MIP-1 a PDGF-BB MIP-1 b RANTES TNF- a VEGF 120,000 100,000 80,000 60,000 40,000 20,000 0Concentration, pg/ml IL-1b IL-1ra IL-2 IL- 4 IL- 5 IL- 6 IL-7 IL- 8 IL-9 IL-10 IL-12p70 IL-13 IL-15 IL-17 Eotaxin FGF basic G-CSF GM-CSF IFN- g IP-10 MCP-1 MIP-1 a PDGF-BB MIP-1 b RANTES TNF- a VEGF AnalyteA B Fig. 6. Sample concentrations acquired with the Bio-Plex MAGPIX ( n), Bio-Plex 200 ( n), and Bio-Plex 3D ( n) systems.160   120  80  40 0 1,600   1,200  800  400 010   8   6   4   2   0  12     8     4 0 250   200   150   100   50   0250   200   150   100   50   01 2 3 4 5 6 1 2 3 4 5 61 2 3 4 5 6 1 2 3 4 5 61 2 3 4 5 6 1 2 3 4 5 6Concentration, pg/ml Concentration, pg/mlIL-4 IL-8IL-5 IL-12p70IL-6 MCP-1 Sample ID Sample ID Sample ID © 2012 Bio-Rad Laboratories, Inc. Bulletin 6006Similar Sample Concentrations on All Three Instruments Six serum samples were evaluated for concentration on the three instruments. Figure 6 depicts the concentrations  of samples analyzed using the Bio-Plex MAGPIX, Bio-Plex 200, and Bio-Plex 3D systems for representative analytes  from human 27-plex assays. Concentration values were similar for all samples tested with Bio-Plex Pro human 27-plex group I cytokines. The error bars represent standard deviations from three independent experiments.Table 1. Instrument and assay compatibility. Assay  Bio-Plex MAGPIX System  Bio-Plex 200 System Bio-Plex 3D System Magnetic bead–based assays (6.5 µm bead) Bio-Plex Pro human cancer biomarker panel assays • • • Bio-Plex Pro human Th17 assays • • • Bio-Plex Pro mouse Th17 assays • • • Bio-Plex Pro cell signaling assays • • • Bio-Plex Pro human cytokine assays* • • • Bio-Plex Pro mouse cytokine assays • • • Bio-Plex Pro rat cytokine assays • • • Bio-Plex Pro human diabetes assays • • • Bio-Plex Pro mouse diabetes assays • • • Bio-Plex Pro rat diabetes assays • • • Bio-Plex Pro TGF- b assays • • • Nonmagnetic bead–based assays  • • • Bio-Plex signal transduction assays – • • Magnetic fixed panel assays (8.0 µm bead) – – – Bio-Plex Pro acute phase assay – • – Bio-Plex® Precision Pro™ human cytokine assay – • – Bio-Plex Pro isotyping assay – • – Bio-Plex Pro angiogenesis assay – • – *  Except Bio-Plex Precision Pro human cytokine assay (catalog #171-A1001P). Table 2. Distinct features of the three instrument platforms.  Bio-Plex MAGPIX System Bio-Plex 200 System Bio-Plex 3D System  Software  xPONENT (acquisition)  Bio-Plex Manager  xPONENT (acquisition)   Bio-Plex Manager™ (analysis) (acquisition and analysis) Bio-Plex Manager     xPONENT (optional)  (analysis)  Optics  LED/CCD camera  Lasers/APDs/PMTs  Lasers/APDs/PMTs  Multiplex capacity  50 100 500  Bead compatibility  MagPlex–C  MagPlex–C  MagPlex–C     MicroPlex  MicroPlex     LumAvidin  LumAvidin     xTAG  xTAG  Read time ~60 min/96-well plate ~40 min/96-well plate ~20 min/96-well plate     ~75 min/384-well plate  Applications  Low- to mid-throughput  Mid-throughput  High-throughput  Plate format 96-well 96-well 96-well/384-well  Dynamic range 3.5 logs 3.5 logs 4.5 logs Consistent Performance Across All Platforms The assay performance based on sample concentration determinations, working ranges, LOD, and inter-assay   %CV is similar on Bio-Plex MAGPIX, Bio-Plex 200, and Bio-Plex 3D systems. Bio-Plex Pro assays can be run on   all three systems. © 2012 Bio-Rad Laboratories, Inc. Bulletin 6006Life Science Group 12-0913    071 2    Sig 1211 Bulletin 6006 Rev A     US/EGBio-Rad Laboratories, Inc. Web site www.bio-rad.com  USA 800 424 6723  Australia 61 2 9914 2800  Austria 01 877 89 01  Belgium 09 385 55 11 Brazil 55 11 5044 5699   Canada 905 364 3435  China 86 21 6169 8500  Czech Republic 420 241 430 532  Denmark 44 52 10 00  Finland 09 804 22 00   France 01 47 95 69 65  Germany 089 31 884 0  Greece 30 210 9532 220  Hong Kong 852 2789 3300  Hungary 36 1 459 6100  India 91 124 4029300   Israel  03 963 6050  Italy 39 02 216091  Japan  03 6361  7000  Korea  82 2 3473  4460   Mexico 52 555 488 7670  The  Netherlands 0318  540666   New Zealand 64 9 415 2280  Norway 23 38 41 30  Poland 48 22 331 99 99  Portugal  351 21 472 7700  Russia 7 495 721 14 04   Singapore 65 6415 3188  South Africa  27 861 246 723  Spain 34 91 590 5200  Sweden 08 555  12700  Switzerland 061 717 95 55   Taiwan 886 2 2578 7189  Thailand 800 88 22 88   United Kingdom 020 8328 2000Ordering Information Catalog #  Description Instruments 171-015001   Bio-Plex MAGPIX Multiplex Reader   with Bio-Plex Manager Software , includes   Bio-Plex MAGPIX instrument, PC with xPONENT acquisition software installed, Bio-Plex Manager desktop license, calibration kit, verification kit, 2  drive fluid cartridges, 2 waste containers 171-000201   Bio-Plex 200 System , 100–240 V, includes   array reader, microplate platform, Bio-Plex Manager  software with workstation license, PC, monitor,  calibration kit, validation kit 4.0, MCV plate IV,   Bio-Plex reservoir, 20 L sheath fluid, spare   sample needle 171-000205   Bio-Plex 200 System with HTF , same as   171-000201 with high-throughput fluidics (HTF) Bio-Plex 3D  Bio-Plex 3D System , includes Bio-Plex 3D  suspension array system, xPONENT acquisition  software, PC, calibration reagents, verification  reagents, Bio-Plex Manager software,   desktop license Kits and Reagents 171-213001   Bio-Plex MAGPIX Calibration Kit,   calibration testing kit for Bio-Plex MAGPIX  instrument, includes 5 ml calibrator microspheres,  twenty-five 8-well strips, CD; 25 applications  171-213002   Bio-Plex MAGPIX Verification Kit ,   includes MAGPIX verifier, 5 ml microspheres,   MAGPIX fluidics 1, MAGPIX fluidics 2, MAGPIX  performance verification kit CD, twenty-five 8-well  strips; 25 applications  171-213003   Bio-Plex MAGPIX Drive Fluid , pkg of 4, 700 ml  drive fluid, for use with Bio-Plex MAGPIX instrument  Accessories 171-012004   Bio-Plex MAGPIX Replacement Waste Fluid  Container , pkg of 1, 850 ml container, holds waste  fluid, for use with Bio-Plex MAGPIX instrument  171-012005   Bio-Plex MAGPIX Sample Probe Needle ,   pkg of 1, needle  171-012006   Bio-Plex MAGPIX Sample Probe Height  Adjustment Kit , sample probe height adjustment kit  171-012008   Bio-Plex MAGPIX 96-Well Plate Heater Block ,  pkg of 1, heater block, fits one 96-well plate, for use with Bio-Plex MAGPIX instrument  171-020100   Bio-Plex Handheld Magnetic Washer , includes  magnetic washer and adjustment hex tools for use in  manual wash steps for all Bio-Plex magnetic assays  300-34376   Bio-Plex Pro Wash Station , includes magnetic  plate carrier, waste bottle, 2 buffer bottles  300-34377   Bio-Plex Pro II Wash Station , includes magnetic  plate carrier, vacuum manifold plate carrier, waste bottle, 2 buffer bottles Luminex, MAGPIX, MagPlex, MicroPlex, LumAvidin, xMAP, xPONENT, and xTAG are trademarks of Luminex Corporation. HASP is a trademark of Aladdin Knowledge Systems, Ltd.The Bio-Plex suspension array system includes fluorescently labeled  microspheres and instrumentation licensed to Bio-Rad Laboratories, Inc. by the Luminex Corporation.Catalog #  Description Software 171-001510   Bio-Plex Data Pro ™ Software with Bio-Plex  Manager Software , Bio-Plex Data Pro software   (5 seats), for multi-experiment analysis and advanced  data visualization, and Bio-Plex Manager software  (5 seats), for instrument data evaluation and  optimization. CDs and security HASP key included 171-001513   Bio-Plex Data Pro Software , (5 seats),   for multi-experiment analysis and advanced   data visualization 171-STND01   Bio-Plex Manager Software , includes   1 user desktop license, to analyze Bio-Plex  data and generate protocols, does not operate   the instrument CST antibodies exclusively developed and  validated for Bio-Plex phosphoprotein and  total target assays.


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/mass-spectrometry-assay/
Mass Spectrometry Assay | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Mass Spectrometry Assay services Offering a range of cutting-edge small-molecule identification services to support your research endevors. Our services Lipido-metabolomics services Our team uses cutting-edge mass spectrometry (MS) technologies to identify and quantify lipid and metabolite mixtures with high sensitivity and accuracy. Our services include sample preparation, analysis, data interpretation and analysis, and a comprehensive report of the results, all in a customized protocol that meets your specific research needs either in the fields of medicine or biology or chemistry. Learn more about our lipido-metabolomics services Custom R&D Mass Spectrometry services Small unknown compounds, such as metabolites, natural products, and synthetic compounds present in your samples are analyzed and identified accurately. Our services include sample preparation, method development, data interpretation and analysis, and a comprehensive report of the results. Learn more about our custom R&D MS services With our Mass Spectrometry Assay services, we are dedicated to providing you with the highest quality results and customer support. Contact us today to discuss your research needs and how we can assist you in your research endevors. Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/lipidomics-metabolomics-services/
Lipido-metabolomics Services | Small molecule identification | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Lipidomics and Metabolomics services Certified for the use of the AbsoluteIDQ p400 HR kit, a state-of-the-art solution for metabolomics analysis. We excel in the precise quantification and identification of small molecules in various biological samples, leveraging the advanced capabilities of the AbsoluteIDQ® p400 HR kit from Biocrates. Our expertise extends to detecting and quantifying metabolites and lipids across diverse biological matrices, including serum, plasma, CSF, urine, and saliva, employing customized extraction protocols for optimal results. The AbsoluteIDQ® p400 HR kit from Biocrates allows the detection and quantification of 407 metabolites in sample volumes as low as 10µL, including 21 amino acids, 21 biogenic amines, 1 carbohydrate, 55 (acyl) carnitines, 24 lysophosphatidylcholines, 172 phosphatidylcholines, 31 sphingomyelins, 9 ceramides, 14 cholesteryl esters, 18 diglycerides, and 42 triglycerides. Know more about the AbsoluteIDQ® p400 HR kit A comprehensive range of services using the AbsoluteIDQ p400 HR kit from Biocrates. Biomarker discovery We can help identify potential biomarkers for various diseases and conditions using metabolomics analysis. Drug discovery Our metabolomics analysis can assist in the development of new drugs by identifying potential targets and evaluating drug efficacy. Toxicology studies We can analyze the metabolomic changes in response to various toxins and help identify potential toxicological mechanisms. Nutritional studies Our metabolomics analysis can help evaluate the effects of different diets and nutritional interventions on metabolic pathways. Reach out to our experts if one of our proposed services aligns with your research needs. What sets our Lipidomics and Metabolomics services apart ? A wide range of matrices Quantification in various biological matrices, including serum, plasma, CSF, urine, saliva with adapted protocols. Competitive pricing Cost is an important factor in any research project. That is why we offer our services at an competitive price without compromising the quality. Qualified team We are dedicated to provide the best service and support to our clients throughout their projects. Fast turnaround time Understanding that time is critical when it comes to research, we strive to offer fast turnaround times without compromising on quality. Solutions tailored to your specific research needs Considering that every research project is unique, we tailor our offerings and solutions to our clients’ specific research goals and needs. Contact us to learn more about our Lipidomics and Metabolomics services and discuss your research projects. Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/custom-rd-services/
Custom R&D services We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your
browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our
traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies.
Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies
to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find
detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The
cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they
are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show
more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the
basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your
consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable
data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform
certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social
media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No
cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how
visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on
metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No
cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and
analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a
better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Custom R&D
Mass Spectrometry services Analysis, quantitation and characterization of
APIs, oligosaccharides and small synthetic chemicals within complex matrixes.
Our services Molecular Characterization service Characterization and
identification of chemicals are facilitated through our two cutting-edge
Thermo Fisher Scientific Mass Spectrometers (TSQ™ 9000 and Orbitrap™ Q
Exactive™). Valuable insights for specific issues are provided using our
unique internal database, including the identification of impurities in
processes, screening of impurities in API, determination of Extractables, and
Leachables. Additionally, remnants of pesticides and drugs can be identified,
with over 800 available and more on demand. Mass spectrometry method
development and validation service Our analytical method development and
validation services in Mass Spectrometry are designed to ensure the best
performance of your method. Our team uses state of the art equipment and
cutting-edge techniques to develop and validate methods for a variety of
applications, in pharmaceutical, biological and medical devices. Our services
include b ibliography services, method development and validation (ICH Q2 /
Q10), stability assessment, LOG(P) / LOGkow determination, analytical testing
and troubleshooting. We are committed to delivering high-quality, reliable,
and cost-effective solutions to our clients, helping them achieve their goals
and ensuring the safety and efficacy of their products. Discuss your research
project with our experts Our analytical park x Instrument type Mass range Mass
accuracy Sensitivity Ionization source Scan mode Applications Thermo
Scientific Q Exactive™ and Q Exactive Focus™ systems High-resolution accurate
mass spectrometer m/z 50-6,000 ±1 ppm Low picogram level Heated Electrospeay
Ionization (HESI) Full scan, targeted MS/MS, data-dependent MS/MS Proteomics,
metabolomics, lipidomics, food and environmental analysis Thermo Scientific
TSQ™ 9000 Triple Quadrupole system Triple quadrupole mass spectrometer m/z
10-2,000 ±0.1-0.5 Da Low femtogram level Advanced Electron Ionization (AEI)
SRM, MRM, SIM Quantitative analysis, drug discovery and development, clinical
research What sets our custom R&D services apart ? High-Quality Results
Employing cutting-edge technologies alongside premium reagents, we guarantee
results of the utmost precision and reliability. Competitive Pricing We
provide competitively priced top-tier services without compromising quality,
recognizing the pivotal role cost plays in any research project. Experienced
Team With a wealth of experience in small molecule identification, our team is
committed to providing unparalleled service and support throughout your
project. Fast Turnaround Time We prioritize swift turnaround times,
acknowledging the critical importance of time in research projects. Customized
Solutions Recognizing the uniqueness of each research project, we provide
tailored solutions to meet your specific needs, spanning from sample analyses
to method development. Contact us to learn more about our custom R&D Mass
Spectrometry Services and how we can help you achieve your research goals.
Back to the overview of our MS Assay services Contact us Subscribe to our
newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit
production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023
Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading
Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/bioinformatics-and-biostatistics-services/
Bioinformatics and Biostatistics services We value your privacy We use cookies
to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and
analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of
cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use
cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You
will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category
below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your
browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the
site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to
enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or
adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally
identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help
perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on
social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features.
No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how
visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on
metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No
cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and
analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a
better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR
Bioinformatics and Biostatistics Expert analysis and interpretation of omics
data (RNA-seq, scRNA-seq, DNA-seq, and more.) Our services​ Omics data
analysis We use cutting-edge tools to process and interpret genomics,
transcriptomics, proteomics, and metabolomics data. Our bioinformatics
offerings cover sequence analysis, gene expression analysis, pathway analysis,
variant analysis, annotation, and data visualization. Our automated primary
and secondary analyses handle tasks like quality control and read alignment,
while our customized tertiary analysis delves deeper into your data, providing
insights tailored to your research questions and goals. Partner with us to
develop personalized analysis pipelines for a thorough understanding of your
omics data, allowing you more time for in-depth analysis. Experience
comprehensive omics data analysis with our advanced bioinformatics and
biostatistics services. Reach out to our experts for omics data analysis
solutions. Contact us Insights into our service offerings Genomics Whole
Genome Sequencing (WGS) / Whole Exome Sequencing (WES) Detection of somatic
and germinal Single Nuclear Polymorphisms (SNPs) and Indels of bases Gene
fusion analysis Genome Wide Association Studies (GWAS) on large cohorts
Epigenomics Methylome Methylation sites identification Detection of
differentially methylated Cytosine bases Identification of protein binding
regions Transcriptomics RNA analysis, RT-qPCR results Analysis of non-coding
RNAs – panels of lncRNAs – and of coding mRNAs Pathways/Gene Ontology (GO)
term analysis Differential Gene Expression analysis Identification of novel
transcripts scRNA-seq On the 10X Genomics Chromium platform Characterization
of cell subtypes and abundance Characterization of uncommon cell types
Identification of cell biomarkers Spatial omics Analysis of imaging and
transcriptomic-data on Vizgen®’s MERSCOPE Vizualizer software. Clustering and
cell types detection Discovery of RNA biomarkers Spatial localization of cell
types First-level analysis Raw data Quality Assurance/Quality Control (QA/QC)
Alignment/Pseudo-alignment on the chosen reference Post-alignment QA/QC Raw
and normalized counts matrix generation Custom analysis Following biological
or clinical questions. Support to the experimental design, in accordance with
the biological questions Custom software and pipeline development (R, python,
NextFlow) Consulting on various R&D omics projects Entrust us with your omics
data analysis High-Performance Computing (HPC) infrastructure Our HPC
infrastructure enables swift and efficient processing and analysis of large-
scale omics datasets, utilizing state-of-the-art computing resources for even
the most complex bioinformatics projects. Entrust us with your omics data
analysis What sets our omics data processing services apart ? High-Quality
Results We follow strict quality control procedures to ensure accurate and
reliable omics data analysis. Experienced Team Our team has extensive
experience in analyzing a wide range of omics data. Confidentiality We take
all necessary measures to ensure that your data is secure and protected.
Customized Solutions We tailor our services to meet the unique needs of each
project, closely collaborating with you to ensure our analysis aligns with
your research questions. Contact us to learn more about our bioinformatics and
biostatistics services and how we can help you achieve your research goals.
Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking
Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice
Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved.
Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/cro-cdmo-services/assay-developement-and-production/assay-developement/
Assay Development | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Assay Development Immunoassay development and kinetic characterization of molecular interactions through Bio-Layer Interferometry (BLI) technology. Our solutions include Immunoassay design We specialize in developing highly sensitive and validated immunoassays for both research and diagnostic purposes. Our services include customizable ELISA development, with the option for multiplexing to detect multiple targets simultaneously. We offer antibody selection, rigorous assay validation, customized quality control, and ongoing technical support to ensure accuracy and reliability throughout the development process and beyond. Antibody selection: We offer you the option to use your own analytes and antibody library, or we can produce them for you. We carefully select the most optimal combination of antibodies for your assay. Assay validation: Each assay undergoes extensive validation to ensure accuracy, precision, and reliability. Custom QC: We determine the best standard, Minimal Required Dilution (MRD), and key controls for the assay. Technical support: Our team provides comprehensive technical support and guidance throughout the development process and after the assay is complete. Assay design and optimization Reach out to our assay development specialists for your research projects I have an inquiry Kinetic characterization with BLI technology The Octet® BLI (Bio-Layer Interferometry) technology allows to perform molecular interaction characterization, antibody interaction characterization, protein quantification, and protein-protein interaction characterization. Thanks to this technology, we can measure binding kinetics, affinity, and specificity of molecules, as well as determine the concentration of proteins in solution. Our service includes assay development, optimization, and validation for your specific needs. Key benefits include Higher throughput (up to 96 samples) Real-time analysis Label-free analysis Automated analysis Crude sample compatibility Find out how you can leverage the power of Octet® for your research projects Talk to one of our experts What sets our Immunoassay Development services apart ? Tailored solutions Recognizing the uniqueness of each research project, we tailor and scale our processes to align seamlessly with your specific requirements. High-quality Committed to top-notch quality, we rigorously control every stage of development to ensure our services meet your expectations. Qualified team With a seasoned team boasting extensive assay development experience, we offer comprehensive assistance throughout the entire process, ensuring the success of your project. Competitive pricing We provide competitive pricing for our assay development service, ensuring widespread access to high-quality assays. Our team is dedicated to providing high-quality assay development services that meet your specific requirements. Contact us today to learn more about our services and how we can help you achieve your research goals.​ Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/custom-kit-production/
Custom kit production (CDMO) | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Custom Kit Production (CDMO activity) We excel at high-quality custom diagnostic kit production, utilizing our parent company Firalis' ISO 13485 certified process. Our CDMO services include custom ELISA, biochemistry and molecular biology kit production. Our CDMO services ELISA kit production services We offer a comprehensive solution for custom Enzyme-Linked Immunosorbent Assay (ELISA) kit development. We work closely with you to industrialize production, tailoring kits to your specific requirements. Whether for biomarker detection, disease diagnosis, or drug screening, the customized ELISA kits we produce provide robust and sensitive target analyte detection. Know more about our assay development services Our ASD services Learn more about our ELISA kit production services Reach out to us Custom Molecular Biology kit production services We also provide custom molecular biology kit production and industrialization services, compliant with ISO 13485, for quantitative polymerase chain reaction (qPCR) and target sequencing (NGS) applications. The kits we produce enable accurate and sensitive nucleic acid detection, tailored for gene expression analysis, SNP genotyping, and pathogen identification. Applications of Molecular Biology kits include whole-genome sequencing, targeted sequencing, metagenomics, and transcriptomics. Know more about our sequencing services Our NGS services Know more about our qPCR services Our qPCR services Know more about our production services Reach out to our experts Our commitment to innovation is reflected in our advanced automation approach. Leveraging cutting-edge technologies, we optimize our manufacturing processes, ensuring increased efficiency and consistent quality. Contact us for logistic support In addition to kit production, our CDMO services encompass comprehensive support, including state-of-the-art controlled storage that meets the industry’s highest standards for optimal product preservation. Contact us for sample classification and storage or for temperature controlled kit stock Tailored collaboration both end-to-end and at each and every step of in vitro kit development, certification and production. An overview of the diagnostic kit NeuroLINCS we produced for the company Amoneta Diagnostics®. What sets our custom kit production CDMO services apart ? Customized Solutions We understand that every research project is unique. That is why w e adapt and scale the process to our clients’ needs. High-quality We perform rigorous quality control at every stage of the kit production process to ensure that the final product meets our clients’ expectations and that all of our services are delivered with the highest quality standards. Experienced Team Our has extensive experience in kit production and provides assistance throughout the entire diagnostic kit production process to ensure a successful project outcome. Competitive pricing We offer competitive pricing for our kit production CDMO service to enable broad access to high-quality custom molecular biology and immunoassay kits. Quality standards ISO 13485 Certified Laboratory: Our laboratory adheres to our parent company’s ISO 13485 certification, demonstrating our commitment to industrializing and producing diagnostic kits under strict quality management systems. We adhere to the highest standards of quality control and follow rigorous protocols to ensure the accuracy, reliability, and reproducibility of the kits we develop. By upholding these standards, we provide assurance to our customers that our kits are dependable and trustworthy for their diagnostic needs. Our experts, operating under the umbrella of our comprehensive CDMO services, will collaborate closely with you throughout the entire process — from initial design and feasibility assessment to kit manufacturing and quality control. If you are interested in our custom in-vitro diagnostic kit production CDMO services or have questions, Reach out to our experts Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/biological-material-production/
Biological material production | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Bio-material production We provide high-quality biological material production services. Our services include custom cell line development, recombinant protein production, antibody production, and more. Our services Custom Cell Line Development We provide custom cell line development services tailored to your specific needs. Our team of experts has extensive experience in generating stable cell lines using a variety of transfection techniques. Developed cell lines have various applications, such as gene editing, high-throughput screening, and protein expression. Recombinant Protein Production Not all proteins are commercially available and custom protein production may be complex. For producing high-quality proteins for your research at a reasonable price, consider using our recombinant protein production service. We have expertise in various expression systems, including bacterial and mammalian cells. Our team can produce proteins in small quantities for early-stage research or large quantities for industrial-scale applications. To ensure the good quality of produced and purified proteins, we do the characterisation by western blot. Antibody Production Upon receipt of cell lineages from you, we are capable of supporting you throughout the whole process of antibody generation : production, purification and characterization. In fact, we provide a comprehensive solution for generating high-affinity monoclonal and polyclonal antibodies that specifically recognize your target of interest using eukaryotic systems. An adaptable service for your project We provide an expertise to choose the best strategy and support you during your project: Choose the best expression system regarding our project (bacteria or mammalian) Design the expression vector Select the cell line (transient transfection or stable cell line) Purify your protein of interest. A scale process adapted to your needs FMP processes a wide range of cell culture tools that fit your needs, ranging from small scale production in cell culture flasks, to transient but robust production in Expi293™ Expression System up to large-scale production using Hollow fiber bioreactor Fibercell Systems Inc . We can also produce and purify antibodies from already existing hybridoma cell culture. Protein/Antibody Purification Our protein purification services use state-of-the-art equipment and techniques to provide high-quality and pure proteins for your research needs. We use the AKTA pure protein purification system allowing precise and efficient separation of proteins using various chromatography methods. Additionally, we offer HiTrap Protein A or G HP antibody purification columns, which provide high specificity and selectivity for the purification of antibodies. Long term storage of p roteins can be a problem, and the freeze drying, also known as lyophilization , can be a solution. Thus, in addition to providing a purification service, we can lyophilize your proteins with an Alpha 2-4 LSC device . What sets our Biological Material Production services apart ? Customized Solutions We understand that every research project is unique. This is why w e adapt and scale the process to your needs. High-quality We take quality seriously which is why we perform rigorous quality control at every stage of the production process to ensure that the final product meets your expectations and that all of our services are delivered with the highest quality standards. Experienced Team Our team of experts has extensive experience in production and assay developpment and is ready to provide assistance throughout the entire process to ensure a successful project outcome. Competitive pricing We offer competitive pricing for our production service to enable broad access to high-quality biological material. If you have any questions or would like to discuss your project with us, please do not hesitate to contact us . Back to the overview of our services Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/regulatory-affairs/
Regulatory Affairs | Services | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Regulatory Affairs With our focus on regulatory excellence, we empower clients to bring their IVD diagnostic kits to market with confidence and compliance. Our Regulatory Affairs department is committed to guiding our clients through the regulatory processes of both the EU and US markets, by providing support in CE marking or the FDA submission process. With extensive expertise spanning various therapeutic areas, developmental phases, and industries and a deep understanding of regulatory environments, we help clients bring their IVD diagnostic kits to market confidently. WHAT WE DELIVER Regulatory Compliance Assurance Ensuring compliance with relevant regulations such as the FDA in the US, the CE directive in the EU, and other national or international regulatory frameworks. Risk Assessment Conducting thorough evaluations of risks associated with IVD diagnostic kits, including patient health risks, result accuracy, and user safety. Process Validation Validating manufacturing, assembly, and quality control processes to ensure reliability and reproducibility of IVD kit results. Clinical Study Support Collaborating with clients to monitor and participate in clinical studies to assess IVD kit performance, including sensitivity, specificity, and diagnostic accuracy Labeling and Documentation Ensuring compliance with relevant regulations such as the FDA in the US, the CE directive in the EU, and other national or international regulatory frameworks. Quality Verification Establishing quality control systems to monitor IVD kit manufacturing, ensuring compliance with specifications and detecting potential quality issues. Change Management Managing changes throughout the IVD kit lifecycle, documenting changes, assessing their regulatory impact, and implementing them appropriately. Regulatory Authorities Interaction Engaging with competent regulatory authorities to obtain necessary approvals and maintain transparent communication regarding regulatory aspects of the kit. These services collectively ensure that your IVD diagnostic kit meets regulatory standards, performs effectively, and is brought to market with assurance and adherence to regulations. If you are interested in benefiting from our regulatory team's support and expertise in bringing your diagnostic kit to market Reach out to an expert Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/company/about-us/
About Us | CRO service-provider | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR About Firalis Molecular Precision A fast-growing provider of advanced multi-omics solutions and tailored contract research services to the life sciences sector. An end-to-end partner. Founded in 2016 and operating in two strategic locations—Huningue, France, in the heart of BioValley, and Cambridge, USA—Firalis Molecular Precision boasts a global team of 50+ experts. Our professionals, with scientific expertise and cutting-edge technology, understand individual customer research needs and deliver tailored multi-omics solutions and contract research services across therapeutic areas like oncology, neurology, and cardiology. Housed in 4000 m² bioanalytical labs, Firalis Molecular Precision offers bioanalytical testing (multi-omics : genomics, proteomics, lipidomics, metabolomics), a biobanking infrastructure for biological sample handling, assay development, data analysis, and custom IVD kit production (CDMO activities). Supporting you every step of the way. At Firalis Molecular Precision, we stand as a steadfast partner, offering unwavering support to our sponsors throughout their drug development and diagnostic product development journeys. Every step of the way, we bring forth the right blend of cutting-edge technologies, innovative solutions and specialized expertise to navigate the intricacies of these endeavors. From disease biomarker discovery to post-market surveillance, trust us to be your reliable collaborator, ensuring success with precision and innovation at every crucial phase of your projects. Firalis Molecular Precision's team. With a blend of passionate experts in multi-omics (genomics, proteomics, lipidomics and metabolomics), assay development & production, bioinformatics and business, we are dedicated in delivering the highest-quality results to the segments we serve. In fact, they are equipped with the knowledge, expertise, and 15+ years of experience to utilize our cutting-edge technology efficiently, analyze collected data thoroughly and present solutions tailored to our sponsors’ specific needs. They collaborate, innovate, and push boundaries to ensure that their work meets or exceeds standards. Sponsors we support At the core of our operation lies a dedication to customizing our services to meet the requirements of various life sciences sectors. With a team boasting more than 15 years of experience, their extensive knowledge has been pivotal in catering to over 120 customers worldwide, delivering disruptive solutions for their research projects. Specifically, we support: Biopharmaceutical organizations, whether emerging, mid-sized, or large. Researchers in academia. Healthcare professionals. Our pledge to the highest quality. We are steadfast in our commitment to delivering exceptional quality in every aspect of the multi-omics services we provide, aimed at advancing precision medicine in every therapeutic area. Learn more Talk to one of our experts about your research project Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/company/quality-management-and-standards/
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/wp-content/uploads/2024/04/CERTIFICATE-ISO-9001-FIRALIS-ID-88047.pdf
                  Certificat   Certificate                    N° 2014 /58992 .8     Page 1 / 1         11 rue Francis de Pressensé - 93571 La Plaine Saint -Denis Cedex - France - T. +33 (0)1 41 62 80 0 0 -  F. +33 (0)1 49 17 90 00                   SAS au capital de 18 187 000 € - 479 076 002 RCS Bobigny - www.afnor.org           AFNOR Certification certifie que le système de management mis en place par :   AFNOR Certification certifies that the management system implemented by:     FIRALIS     pour les activités suivantes :   for the following activities:       DEVELOPPEMENT, PRODUCTION, ET  VENTE D'IMMUNO -ESSAIS ET DE PRODUITS  INTERMEDIAIRES ET DERIVES  A USAGE CLINIQUE.   DEVELOPPEMENT, PRODUCTION ET VENTE D'ANTICORPS, PROTEINES ET PRODUITS DERIVES A  DES FINS DE RECHERCHE.   DEVELOPPEMENT ET PRODUCTION DE KITS DE DETECTION D'ACIDES NUCLEIQUES.       DEVELOPMENT, PRODUCTION AND SALE OF IMMUNOASSAYS AND INTERMEDIATE AND  DERIVED PRODUCTS FOR CLINICAL USE.   DEVELOPMENT, PRODUCTION AND SALE OF ANTIBODIES,PROTEIN AND BY -PRODUCTS FOR  RESEARCH PURPOSES. DEVELOPMENT AND PRODUCTION OF NUCLEIC ACID DETECTION KITS.       a été évalué et jugé conforme aux exigences requises par :   has been assessed and found to meet the requirements of:     ISO 9001 : 2015     et est déployé sur les sites suivants :   and is developed on the following locations:       17 RUE DU FORT    FR-68330  HUNINGUE     35 RUE DU FORT    FR-68330  HUNINGUE   Site de production : 16 ALLEE DES MARRONNIERS    FR-68330  HUNINGUE       Ce certificat est valable à compter du (année/mois/jour)   This certificate is valid from (year/month/day)  2023 -06-08 Jusqu'au   Until 2025 -04-11                                                          SignatureFournisseur       Julien NIZRI   Directeur Général d’AFNOR Certification   Managing Director of AFNOR Certification           Seul le certificat électronique, consultable sur   www.afnor.or g, fait foi en temps réel de la certification de l’organisme. The electronic certificate only, available at www.afnor.org ,   attests in real -time that the company is certified. Accréditation COFRAC n° 4-0001 , Certification de Systèmes de Management,  Portée  disponible  sur www.cofrac.fr .   COFRAC accreditation n°4 -0001, Management Systems Certification, Scope available on  www.cofrac.fr   AFAQ est une marque déposée.    AFAQ is a registered trademark  - CERTI F 0956.9./07 -2020 Flashez ce QR   Code pour vérifier l a  validité du certificat          


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/company/quality-management-and-standards/
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/wp-content/uploads/2024/04/CERTIFICATE-ISO-14001-FIRALIS.pdf
                  Certificat   Certificate                    N° 2022 /100533 .2     Page 1 / 1         11 rue Francis de Pressensé - 93571 La Plaine Saint -Denis Cedex - France - T. +33 (0)1 41 62 80  00 -  F. +33 (0)1 49 17 90 00                   SAS au capital de 18 187 000 € - 479 076 002 RCS Bobigny - www.afnor.org           AFNOR Certification certifie que le système de management mis en place par :   AFNOR Certification certifies that the management system implemented by:     FIRALIS     pour les activités suivantes :   for the following activities:       DEVELOPPEMENT, PRODUCTION, ET  VENTE D'IMMUNO -ESSAIS ET DE PRODUITS  INTERMEDIAIRES ET DERIVES A  USAGE CLINIQUE.   DEVELOPPEMENT, PRODUCTION ET VENTE D'ANTICORPS, PROTEINES ET PRODUITS DERIVES A  DES FINS DE RECHERCHE.   DEVELOPPEMENT ET PRODUCTION DE KITS DE DETECTION D'ACIDES NUCLEIQUES.       DEVELOPMENT, PRODUCTION AND SALE OF IMMUNOASSAYS AND INTERMEDIATE AND  DERIVED PRODUCTS FOR CLINICAL USE.   DEVELOPMENT, PRODUCTION AND SALE OF ANTIBODIES, PROTEIN  AND BY -PRODUCTS FOR  RESEARCH PURPOSES. DEVELOPMENT AND PRODUCTION OF NUCLEIC ACID DETECTION KITS.       a été évalué et jugé conforme aux exigences requises par:  has been assessed and found to meet the requirements of:     ISO 14001:  2015     et est déployé sur les sites suivants :   and is developed on the following locations:       17 RUE DU FORT    FR-68330  HUNINGUE     35 RUE DU FORT    FR-68330  HUNINGUE   Site de production : 16 ALLEE DES MARRONNIERS    FR-68330  HUNINGUE       Ce certificat est valable à compter du (année/mois/jour)   This certificate is valid from (year/month/day)  2023 -06-08 Jusqu'au   Until 2025 -06-12                                                           SignatureFournisseur       Julien NIZRI   Directeur Général d’AFNOR Certification   Managing Director of AFNOR Certification         Seul le certificat électronique, consultable sur   www.afnor.o rg, fait foi en temps réel de la certification de l’organisme. The electronic certificate only, available at www.afnor.org ,   attests in real -time that the company is certified. Accréditation COFRAC n° 4-0001 , Certification de Systèmes de Management,  Porté e disponible  sur www.cofrac.fr .   COFRAC accreditation n°4 -0001, Management Systems Certification, Scope available on  www.cofrac.fr   AFAQ est une marque déposée.    AFAQ is a registered trademark  - CERTI F 0956.9./07 -2020 Flashez ce QR   Code pour vérifier la  validité du certificat            


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/company/quality-management-and-standards/
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/wp-content/uploads/2024/04/CERTIFICATE-ISO-13485-3131439-ID-88049.pdf
                  Certificat   Certifi cate                    N° 2014/58993.6      Page 1 / 1         11 rue Francis de Pressensé - 93571 La Plaine Saint -Denis Cedex - France - T. +33 (0)1 41 62 80 00 -  F. +33 (0)1 49 17 90 00                   SAS au capital de  18 187 000 € - 479 076 002 RCS Bobigny - www.afnor.org             AFNOR Certification certifie que le système de management mis en place par :   AFNOR Certification certifies that the management system implemented by:   FIRALIS   pour les activités suivantes :   for the following activities:      • DEVELOPPEMENT, FABRICATION ET  MISE SUR LE MARCHE DE DISPOSITIFS DE DIAGNOSTIC IN VITRO D’IMMUNO - ESSAIS ET DE DETECTION D’ACIDES NUCLEIQUES DANS LE CADRE DE MALADES CARDIAQUES,  NEURODEGENERATIVES, IMMUNO -INFLAMMATOIRE ET INFECTIEUSES.   • DEVELOPPEMENT, PRODUCTION ET VENTE DE DISPOSITIFS  DE DIAGNOSTIC IN VITRO D’IMMUNO -ESSAIS ET DE  DETECTION D’ACIDES NUCL EIQUES A DES FINS DE RECHERCHE.   • DEVELOPPEMENT, PRODUCTION ET VENTE PRODUITS INTERMEDIAIRES ET DERIVES, D’ANTICORPS ET DE  PROTEINES A DES FINS DE RECHERCHE        • DEVELOPMENT, MANUFACTU RING AND PLACING ON THE MARKET OF IMMUNO -ASSAYS AND NUCLEIC ACID  DETECTION IN VITRO DIAGNOSTIC DEVICES IN THE FRAME OF CARDIAC, NEURODEGENERATIVES, IMMUNO - INFLAMMATORY AND INFECTIOUS DISEASES.   • DEVELOPMENT, PRODUCTION AND SALES OF IMMUNO -ASSAYS AND NUCLEI C ACID DETECTION IN VITRO  DIAGNOSTIC DEVICES FOR RESEARCH PURPOSES   • DEVELOPMENT, PRODUCTION AND SALES OF INTERMEDIATE AND DERIVED PRODUCTS, ANTIBODIES AND  PROTEINS FOR RESEARCH PURPOSES.        a été évalué et jugé conforme aux exigences requises par :   has been assessed and found to meet the requirements of:   ISO 13485 : 2016   et est déployé sur les sites suivants :   and is developed on the following locations:        17 RUE DU FORT   FR -68330 HUNINGUE      35 RUE DU FORT   FR -68330 HUNINGUE   Site de production : 16 ALLEE DES MARRONNIERS   FR -68330 HUNINGUE        Ce certificat est valable à compter du (année/mois/jour)   This certificate is valid from (year/month/day)  2022 -05-31 Jusqu'au   Until 2025 -04-11                                                                 Julien NIZRI   Directeur Général d’AFNOR Certification   Managing Director of AFNOR Certification           Seul le certificat électronique, consultable sur   www.afnor.org , fait foi en temps réel de la certification de l’organisme. The electronic c ertificate only, available at www.afnor.org ,   attests in real -time that the company is certified. Accréditation COFRAC n° 4 -0571, Certification de Systèmes de Management,  Portée disponible  sur www.cofrac.fr .   COFRAC accreditation n° 4 -0571, Management Sy stems Certification, Scope available on  www.cofrac.fr   AFAQ est une marque déposée.    AFAQ is a registered trademark  - CERTI F 0956.9./07 -2020 Flashez ce QR   Code pour vérifier la  validité du certificat        


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/company/quality-management-and-standards/
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/wp-content/uploads/2024/04/CERTIFICAT-ISO-20387-FIRALIS_.pdf
                      Certificat   Certificate                       N° 2024/108791.1    Page 1 / 1               11 rue Francis de Press ensé - 93571 La Plaine Saint -Denis Cedex - France - T. +33 (0)1 41 62 80 00 -  F. +33 (0)1 49 17 90 00                   SAS au capital de 18 187 000 € - 479 076 002 RCS Bobigny - www.afnor.org                       AFNOR Certification certifie que le système de management mis en place par :   AFNOR Certification certifies that the management system implemented by:     FIRALIS MOLECULAR PRECISION     pour les activités suivantes :   for the following activities:          RECEPTION, CONSERVATION ET MISE A DISPOSITION DE RESSOURCES BIOLOGIQUES  D'ORIGINE HUMAINE A DES FINS DE RECHERCHE ET DE DEVELOPPEMENT.          a été évalué et jugé conforme aux exigences requises par :   has been assessed and found to meet the require ments of :     ISO 20387 : 2018     et est déployé sur les sites suivants :   and is developed on the following locations:        35 RUE DU FORT   FR -68330 H UNINGUE           Ce certificat est valable à compter du (année/mois/jour)   This certificate is valid from (year/month/day)  2024 -03-28 Jusqu'au   Until 2027 -03-27                                                         SignatureFournisseur       Julien NIZRI   Directeur Général d’AFNOR Certification   Managing Director of AFNOR Certification        Seul le certificat électronique, consultable sur  www.afnor.org , fait foi en temps réel de la certification de l’organisme. The electronic certificate only, available at www.afnor.org ,   attests in real -time that the company is certified. AFAQ est une marque déposée. AFAQ is a registered trademark .CERT I  F 0956.9  07/2020  Flashez ce QR Code  pour vérifier la validité  du certificat              


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/company/quality-management-and-standards/
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/wp-content/uploads/2024/04/CAP-ACCREDITATION-FIRALIS-MOLECULAR-PRECISION.pdf



 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/company/quality-management-and-standards/
Our Quality Management System | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Our Quality Management System Complying to quality standards is central to our work. We uphold the highest standards in all of our operations because we understand the importance of quality in scientific research fields. Several of our activities are conducted using our parent company’s quality management system. It has been certified/accredited for some general and technical standards for years. ISO 9001:2015 Certificate N° 2014/58992.7 It sets out the criteria for a quality management system. This standard is based on some quality management principles including a strong customer focus, the motivation and implication of top management, the process approach and continual improvement. Using ISO 9001 helps ensure that customers are provided with good-quality services. ISO 14001:2015 Certificate N° 2022/100533.1 It specifies the requirements for an environmental management system that an organization can use to enhance its environmental performance. Consistent with the organization’s environmental policy, the intended outcomes of an environmental management system include enhancement of environmental performance, fulfilment of compliance obligations and achievement of environmental objectives. ISO 13485:2016 Certificate n° 2014/58993.6 It specifies requirements for a quality management system to demonstrate its ability to provide medical devices and related services that consistently meet customer and applicable regulatory requirements. This includes design and development, production, storage and distribution, installation or servicing of a medical device as design and development or provision of associated activities (e.g., technical support). ISO 20387:2018 Certificate N°2024/108791.1 It’s an international standard that specifies requirements for the competence, impartiality, and consistent operation of biobanks involved in the collection, processing, storage, and distribution of biological materials and associated data for research and development purposes. It provides guidelines to ensure the quality, reliability, and traceability of biological samples, thereby fostering confidence in research outcomes and facilitating collaboration among biobanks and researchers worldwide. Compliance with ISO 20387 signifies adherence to best practices in biobanking, ultimately enhancing the credibility and trustworthiness of biobank services and the integrity of scientific research. CAP Laboratory Accreditation CAP Number : 9211908 / AU-ID : 2161952 The CAP Accreditation is a program offered by the College of American Pathologists which assesses the quality and accuracy of medical laboratories and ensures they meet rigorous standards for testing and diagnosis. We are the first bioanalytical laboratory in France to achieve CAP Accreditation which underscores our dedication to upholding the highest standards of quality, accuracy, and reliability in laboratory services. We are committed to delivering high quality in every aspect of our bioanalytical services, aimed at advancing precision medicine in every therapeutic area. Talk to one of our qualified quality experts Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/job-openings/
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/wp-content/uploads/2023/09/Job_Description_Chief-Business-Officer.pdf
A 17-35 Rue du Fort  F-68330 Huningue     Firalis Molecular Precision (FMP) is a leading biotech services provider dedicated to supporting the research of biotech  and pharmaceutical companies, academic research and healthcare organizations, by offering advanced multiomics  solutions (genomics, proteomics, lipidomics and metabolomics) for clinical trials and biomarker discovery. Beyond its  multi-omics approach, analytical capabilities and scientific expertise, FMP is an end-to-end partner offering a set of  complementary services: biobank infrastructure, assay development, bioanalytical testing, data analysis and production  facilities to streamline and accelerate its customers' Research projects. Located in Huningue, the company's head office  comprises over 2000 m2 of R&D and production laboratories.  To strengthen our Business Development team, we are looking for a:  CHIEF BUSINESS OFFICER    We are seeking an experienced Chief Business Officer (CBO) to join our executive team. As the CBO, you will be responsible  for driving the overall business strategy and growth of our organization. You will collaborate with the CEO to develop and  implement strategic initiatives, forge partnerships, and identify new business opportunities that will accelerate our  company's success. The ideal candidate will have a good scientific understanding of Omics applications, and the ability to  present innovative products/services.    Responsibilities:  Under the supervision of the CEO, your main missions will be to:  - Boost visibility of Firalis CRO service offerings and IVD products : develop and implement strategies to increase  the visibility and awareness of our CRO services and IVD products in the market. Identify target markets and  customer segments and create marketing initiatives to promote our offerings effectively.  - Supervise, coach, recruit, and fully manage the Business Development team : provide leadership, guidance, and  support to the Business Development team. Set clear objectives, monitor performance, and ensure the team is  equipped with the necessary skills and resources to achieve business targets.  - Promote CRO services to pharmaceutical companies, biotechs, and CROs : build and maintain strong relationships  with potential clients and key decision-makers in the target market. Identify customer needs, present our CRO  services, and negotiate contracts (WO, SOW, MSA, CDA) to secure new business opportunities.  - Develop external communications and social media : collaborate with the marketing and communication teams  to develop effective external communication strategies. Create compelling content, oversee social media  presence, and ensure consistent messaging across various channels.  - Attend workshops, trade fairs, and networking events : represent the company at industry events, workshops,  conferences, and trade fairs. Network with potential clients, partners, and key stakeholders to expand the  company's reach and foster strategic collaborations.  - Keep track and report regularly on cumulated business and market intelligence : monitor and analyze market  trends, competitor activities, and customer feedback.   - Set up SMART objectives for yourself and your team : collaborate with the CEO to establish specific, measurable,  achievable, relevant, and time-bound (SMART) objectives for both yourself and the Business Development team.  Track progress and take necessary actions to ensure targets are met or exceeded.    A 17-35 Rue du Fort  F-68330 Huningue     - Report to CEO and the company Board regularly and systematically : provide comprehensive reports to the CEO  and the company's Board, presenting key performance indicators, business development activities, and strategic  recommendations. Ensure effective communication and alignment with the leadership team.     Your profile:  - Scientific Background with a master’s degree in biology, biochemistry, biotechnology, or a related scientific field.  - Additional business degree in management, business, or a similar discipline (MBA, EMBA, etc.) is a plus.  - Excellent presentation skills in both written and oral forms, particularly in English.  - Minimum of 5 years of experience in business development within the life science industry.  - Successful track record in commercializing life science services.  - Any experience of IVD/Dx product launch would be an asset.  - Scientific skills in biology, such as proteomics or genomics, would be an asset.  - Fluency in English and French. German language skills are a plus.  - Familiarity with Quality Management Systems (QMS) is a plus.    If you meet the above requirements and are passionate about working in Business Development, we would love to hear  from you. Please submit your resume and cover letter for consideration to :   careers@firalis.com   


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/job-openings/
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/wp-content/uploads/2023/11/Job-description_Informaticien.pdf
           Firalis Molecular Precision (FMP) est un prestataire de services biotechnologiques de premier plan qui a pour but  de soutenir la recherche des entreprises de biotechnologies et de la pharmacie, de la recherche universitaire et des  organismes de santé, en offrant des solutions multiomiques avancées (génomique, protéomique, lipidomique et  métabolomique) pour les essais cliniques et la découverte de biomarqueurs. Au-delà de son approche multi- omique, de ses capacités analytiques et de son expertise scientifique, FMP est un partenaire de bout en bout offrant  un ensemble de services complémentaires : l'infrastructure de biobanque, le développement d'essais, les tests  bioanalytiques, l'analyse de données et les installations de production afin d'alléger et d'accélérer les projets de  Recherche de ses clients. Situé à Huningue, FMP fait partie du groupe Firalis, dont le siège social comprend plus de  2000 m2 de laboratoires de R&D et de production.  Afin de renforcer l’équipe informatique au sein de notre entreprise, nous recherchons :  Un(e) Informaticien(ne)    Description du poste   Au sein du service informatique, vos principales missions consisteront à :    Mettre en place un système intégré pour l’exploitation de la plateforme de séquençage suivant les  principes FAIR ;    Gérer le versioning du code ;    Rédiger les cahiers de tests et réaliser les tests unitaires associés ;   Réaliser les tests de validation en face des équipements réseaux de tests ;   Assurer les mises en production ;   Suivre la mise en production des développements et corrections ;   Assurer le reporting de vos interventions ;   Mettre en place des systèmes d’automatisation de la gestion d’analyses de données.  Vos missions annexes pourront être :    Participer à l’implémentation du LIMS ( Laboratory Information Management System ) ;   Interagir avec les équipes bio-informatique et IT pour le développement d’outils internes au groupe  Firalis.  Votre profil   De formation Bac+2 en développement informatique, avec au moins une expérience en entreprise   Connaissances des outils web (Html, Javascript, PHP, Django)    Des notions en langage de programmation (Java, C++, C# ou Python)   Vous aimez travailler en équipe   Vous possédez un bon niveau d’anglais (lu et écrit).    Ce que nous offrons   - La possibilité de rejoindre une entreprise dynamique à taille humaine et d'être impliqué(e) dans divers  projets innovants  - Des horaires flexibles  - Des plans d'épargne salariale et de retraite  - Une prime de mobilités durables (vélo, trottinette…)  - Une prime d'intéressement en fonction des performances financières du groupe  - Des possibilités d'avancement    Si vous êtes intéressé(e), alors n'hésitez pas à nous envoyer votre CV et votre lettre de motivation à :  careers@firalis.com  


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/job-openings/
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/wp-content/uploads/2024/05/IT-Manager.pdf
       FIRALIS MOLECULAR PRECISION  S.A.  Code  NAF :  2120Z    SIRET  N° :   44384909600062   TVA:  FR73443849096   TI 443 849 096  EORI : FR44384909600062       +33 389 911 320  17 Rue du Fort, 683 30 HUNINGUE , France  sales @firalis.com       IT Manager  (M/F)     Company :  Firalis Molecular Precision (FMP) is a fast -growing provider of advanced multi -omics solutions and  tailored contract research services to the life sciences sector, based in Huningue, France and in  Cambridge, USA.   FMP leverages the latest cutting -edge technologies to provide an extensive range of bioanalytical  services - biobanking, multiomics -powered (genomics, proteomics, transcriptomics, lipidomics,  metabolomics) bioanalysis, omic data analysis and interpretation , assay development and IVD kit  manufacturing - to provide support along the entire drug and diagnostic product development  processes, from the discovery phase to the approval phase.   Job description:   Reporting to the CFO , you will be required to manage the Firalis Group's IT assets. In this context, you  will:   o Supervise, manage, prepare, store, secure, inventory and maintain IT materials.   o Provide technical support to users of hardware, peripherals,  and software .  o Use and develop skills, particularly in the field of data integrity, 21CFR, and any other areas relevant  to the company's activities and employee tasks.   o Administer IT tools and software, manage licenses, maintain user support , support functions,  monitor and carry out updates, when necessary,  in collaboration with service providers.   o Participate in upgrading, managing, virtualizing, administering,  and operating of servers, IT data  and backup systems in collaboration with external service providers.   o Raise users' awareness of IT security and best practice rules practices.   o Contribute to "quality control" and ensure traceability of the elements produced.   o Manage maintenance contracts with service providers, for server management, telephony ,  Internet (fiber -optic), computer network and printe rs.  o Prepare off -line training materials (audio -visual, forms etc.) to ensure effective use of existing  infrastructure and software for employees.   o Think, research and propose ideas on an ongoing basis, to save time and resources, minimize  human error, increase productivity,  and improve employee comfort.   o Supervise any technicians or apprentices joining the IT Unit.             FIRALIS MOLECULAR PRECISION  S.A.  Code  NAF :  2120Z    SIRET  N° :   44384909600062   TVA:  FR73443849096   TI 443 849 096  EORI : FR44384909600062       +33 389 911 320  17 Rue du Fort, 683 30 HUNINGUE , France  sales @firalis.com     Requirements:     • You have a 2/3 -year higher education qualification (BTS, DUT, Licence...) in IT and have  significant experience in a similar position.   • You have in -depth knowledge of VMware and VEEAM backup, and are familiar with Windows  10/11, Windows 2016 server, Active Directory and Microsoft Office 365.   • You are fluent  in English .  • You are rigorous, autonomous,  and organized.   • You have a good understanding of IT principles and can communicate technical concepts  effectively to a varied audience.       Interested candidates are welcome to send their resumes to careers@firalis.com    


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/job-openings/
Career opportunities | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Career opportunities Join us as we continue to grow and innovate. We are dedicated to supporting biopharmaceutical companies by offering comprehensive multi-omics solutions that cover the entire drug development pipeline from discovery to approval. Explore current job opportunities Join our team Our team of experts is the driving force behind our success and growth. When you work at Firalis Molecular Precision, you contribute to an important mission to support therapeutic breakthroughs and improve patient care and treatment. You will work alongside an open and collaborative team where you’ll have the autonomy and responsibility to make a real impact. You will thrive in a dynamic environment that fosters personal, intellectual, and operational growth. Explore current vacancies at Firalis Molecular Precision Growth opportunities Global presence At Firalis Molecular Precision, our global presence is a testament to our dedication to serving customers worldwide. With key locations in Huningue, France, at the heart of the BioValley, and in Kendall Square, USA, one of the world’s premier biotech hubs, we are uniquely positioned to cater to the diverse needs of our global clientele. Our recent establishment in the US is more than just a location; it’s a proactive step to be closer to our valued clients, allowing us to showcase our multi-omics solutions directly to the dynamic US market. Joining our team means becoming a part of an organization that prioritizes building meaningful connections worldwide. Know more about us Perks When you work at Firalis Molecular Precision, you experience a workplace designed with your well-being in mind. We make sure to provide a supportive environment where your needs are valued, and your productivity thrives. At Firalis Molecular Precision, we believe in empowering our employees with the flexibility to organize their working hours and with the ability to work from home, allowing for a healthy work-life balance. To keep you fueled throughout the day, enjoy a bounty of fresh fruits, snacks, and hot drinks, at your disposal. Plus, our office is dog-friendly, so you can bring your furry companion along for some extra company and stress relief. Explore current open positions at Firalis Molecular Precision Chief Business Officer (M/F) Computer scientist (M/F) IT Manager (M/F) We’re always looking for new profiles to join our team. If the openings above don't align with your background or your needs, feel free to send a spontaneous application (CV and cover letter) to our recruitment team. Spontaneous application Want to learn more about career opportunities and benefits of working at Firalis Molecular Precision ? Contact a Human Resources Specialist today Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/news-events/
News & Events - Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use
cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or
content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our
use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences
We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions.
You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent
category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on
your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of
the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required
to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or
adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally
identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help
perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on
social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features.
No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how
visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on
metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No
cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and
analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a
better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR News &
Events Deadline extended to apply for the MERSCOPE® Grant Program in Read more
Firalis Molecular Precision becomes a Certified Olink Service Provider Read
more Firalis Molecular Precision announces its participation in Swiss Biotech
Day Read more Firalis Molecular Precision achieves ISO 20387:2018
certification Read more Firalis Molecular Precision partners with Vizgen to
launch MERSCOPE® Platform Grant Read more FMP to attend the 31st International
Precision Med Tri-Conference Read more 1 2 3 4 5 Contact us Subscribe to our
newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit
production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023
Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/contact-us/
Rely on a CRO for your drug development strategy | Contact us We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Contact us How can we help ? Feel free to contact us using the details below or send us a message by filling out the form. +33 (0) 3 89 91 13 20 sales@firalis.com marketing@firalis.com Our French Headquarters CDMO Services CRO Services Admin. site Our US Headquarters Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/firalis-molecular-precision-biotech-service-provider-accueil/
Firalis Molecular Precision | Prestataire de services Biotech We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Votre partenaire pour la découverte de biomarqueurs et le développement de traitements. De la découverte de biomarqueurs à la production de kits IVD. Nous contacter Parcourir nos solutions multi-omiques Notre ADN Délai d'exécution rapide Notre délai d'exécution de 2 semaines à un mois bat tous les records dans le secteur, ce qui garantit une remise rapide et fiable des résultats. Expertise scientifique Grâce à notre parcours dans le domaine de la biotechnologie, nous sommes parfaitement positionnés pour aider nos clients à relever les défis de recherche qu'ils rencontrent. Haute qualité Nous veillons à ce que les solutions que nous proposons répondent aux exigences réglementaires et fournissent des données précises et fiables. Solutions avancées de multi-omique Que vous cherchiez à identifier de nouvelles cibles thérapeutiques ou à mieux comprendre les mécanismes des pathologies, nos solutions multi-omiques vous fourniront les informations dont vous avez besoin pour prendre des décisions plus éclairées. Nous vous accompagnons DÉCOUVERTE Approche holistique multi-omique (ARNm, ARNnc, protéines, métabolites) Découverte de nouvelles cibles médicamenteuses Compréhension de la maladie Découverte et validation de biomarqueurs diagnostiques, prédictifs et de substitution DÉVELOPPEMENT CLINIQUE Développement des phases 1 à 3 Découverte et suivi de biomarqueurs Exploration de l’activité des médicaments et mesure de leur efficacité Étude des effets indésirables à court terme Découverte de biomarqueurs pronostiques et diagnostiques Initiation du développement de diagnostic compagnon Validation de la signature et/ou de la réponse au médicament et validation clinique des biomarqueurs RECHERCHE PRÉCLINIQUE Développement précoce ou tardif Mécanisme d’action des médicaments (pharmacodynamie) Sécurité et efficacité des médicaments Quantification de la concentration de médicaments dans les fluides et les tissus APPROBATION Étude de marché a posteriori Suivi de l’efficacité, de la sécurité, des risques et des avantages des biomarqueurs à long terme Production de kits de diagnostic compagnon De l'échantillon à l'analyse Nous comprenons que pour obtenir des informations significatives, il faut aller au-delà de la génération de données. Il faut une approche globale qui analyse simultanément plusieurs couches d’informations. C’est pourquoi notre équipe d’experts peut vous accompagner tout au long de votre projet R&D, de l’échantillon à l’analyse de données . Planification des études Collecte d’échantillons – Conception et lancement du projet – Soutien scientifique Gestion des échantillons Contrôle qualité – Etiquetage – Code-barres – Randomisation Enregistrement LIMS > Congélation (-4 à -150°C) > Surveillance (24/7) ​ Services pré-analytiques Aliquotage d’échantillons – Services d’extraction – Protocoles personnalisés Analyse des échantillons et contrôle de qualité Génomique – Epigénomique – Transcriptomique – Protéomique – Métabolomique Analyse de données Bio-informatique et ML – Biostatistiques – Stockage interne des données Rapports d'analyse Données brutes – Analyse personnalisée – Visualisation des données Nos services Des solutions génomiques de pointe à la protéomique d’avant-garde, en passant par les essais de spectrométrie de masse, l’exploitation des données et le développement d’essais/Production, tous ces services sont conçus pour accélérer votre parcours de recherche et développement. Services bioanalytiques Biobanque Génomiques Protéomiques Spectrométrie de Masse Services associés Exploitation des données Développement d'essais - Production Parler à l'un de nos experts Nos experts se sont engagés à vous fournir l’assistance dont vous avez besoin pour vos projets de recherche et à trouver la solution multi-omique qui vous correspond. Nous contacter CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/cro-cdmo-services/assay-developement-and-production/
Assay developement and Production | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Assay Development and Production Assay development, biological material production, and in-vitro diagnostic kit production services. Our services Biological material production services Our services include the production of proteins and antibodies. We use a variety of techniques to produce high-quality biological materials, including recombinant DNA technology, cell culture, and protein purification. Learn more about our bioproduction services Assay Development Services Our services are specialized in the development and optimization of immunoassays for your specific research requirements. We work closely with our clients to ensure the reliability and accuracy of our assays, while adhering to the highest quality standards. With years of experience in ELISA test development and access to the state-of-art technologies and equipment, we guarantee the highest quality for our assays. Learn more about our assay development services In-Vitro Diagnostic Kit Production Our in-vitro diagnostic kit production services are designed to help you develop and manufacture high-quality diagnostic kits. We work closely with our clients to develop kits that are reliable, accurate, and meet the highest quality standards. Our team has years of experience in developing diagnostic kits for a variety of applications, including neurodegenrative, cardiovascular diseases and autoimmune disorders. Learn more about our kit production services With our ASD/Prod services, we are dedicated to providing you with the highest quality results and customer support. Contact us today to discuss your research needs and how we can assist you in achieving your scientific goals. Back to the overview of our services Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2024/05/14/deadline-extended-to-apply-for-the-merscope-grant-program-in-collaboration-with-vizgen/
Deadline Extended | MERSCOPE® Platform Grant Program | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Deadline extended to apply for MERSCOPE® Platform Grant Program in partnership with Vizgen The deadline for our MERSCOPE® Platform Grant Program , in collaboration with Vizgen, has been extended. This extension offers researchers across Europe a valuable chance to leverage spatial transcriptomics in their field of research, for patient care and precision medicine enhancement. The MERSCOPE® Platform Grant Program empowers you with exclusive access to Vizgen’s Predesigned panels (PanNeuro Cell Type, PanCancer Pathways, Immuno-Oncology) for the MERSCOPE® Platform in our labs to conduct a single-cell spatial analysis project that will enable you to drive your research forward. This invaluable opportunity is further enriched by access to an expert data analysis consultation, ensuring that you obtain extensive omic data and deep insights from your tissue samples. For researchers in Europe eager to leverage state-of-the-art spatial transcriptomics services and technology, this Grant Program is tailor-made for you. You can win a 2-slide (FFPE) or 4-slide (FF) run of Vizgen’s Predesigned 500-gene panels for the MERSCOPE® Platform, provided by our genomics experts in our labs. Whether you’re investigating molecular underpinnings of disease, identifying novel therapeutic targets, or personalizing treatment strategies, spatial transcriptomics holds the key to revealing new insights and enhancing patient care. Don’t miss out on this opportunity, submit a short abstract (< 300 words) outlining your project’s objectives, methodologies, and anticipated outcomes and describing how you’d use the MERSCOPE® Platform. ( Grant Application Page ) Submissions are open until June 30th. The winner will be notified in September 2024. Share this article on your socials Go back to all news Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2024/04/26/firalis-molecular-precision-becomes-a-certified-olink-service-provider/
Firalis Molecular Precision is Certified as Olink Service Provider We value
your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve
personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept
All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All
Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently
and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all
cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as
"Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the
basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active
Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such
as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These
cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display.
Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like
sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting
feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics
Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the
website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number
of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display.
Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key
performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user
experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Firalis
Molecular Precision becomes a Certified Olink Service Provider. 04.26.24
Huningue, France – Firalis Molecular Precision (FMP), a CAP-accredited fast-
growing Contract Research Organization (CRO) and Contract Development and
Manufacturing Organization (CDMO), announces its development into a Certified
Olink Service Provider, showcasing its proficiency in using advanced
proteomics analysis tools. This certification, granted by Olink, a leader in
the field of proteomics technology, acknowledges Firalis Molecular Precision’s
capability in utilizing a range of panels for proteomics analysis, including
the Flex, Target 48 & 96, Explore HT, and Explore 384-plex panels. The
certification process involved rigorous evaluation of Firalis Molecular
Precision’s proteomics team and methodologies. Through their relentless
efforts, the team has successfully passed the Olink® concordance test ,
demonstrating adherence to Olink Analysis Service standards. This achievement
ensures the highest level of data accuracy and reliability in proteomics
analysis. This includes passing the test for the Olink® Explore HT, Olink®
Target 96, and Olink® Target 48 panels. “We are thrilled to achieve
certification as an Olink Service Provider,” said Aurélien Virciglio, Head of
proteomics laboratory at Firalis Molecular Precision. “This certification
validates our commitment to excellence in proteomics analysis and underscores
our dedication to providing our sponsors with the highest quality and tailored
solutions.” Firalis Molecular Precision’s proteomics services are invaluable
for clients seeking biomarker discovery and insights into the molecular
mechanisms underlying diseases to develop tailored treatments and personalized
healthcare strategies, leading to improved patient outcomes. For more
information about Firalis Molecular Precision’s proteomics services, visit
Proteomics Services . About Firalis Molecular Precision Firalis Molecular
Precision (FMP) is a fast-growing CRO & CDMO, providing advanced multi-omics
solutions and tailored contract research services to the Life Sciences sector.
With headquarters in Huningue, France, and a presence in Cambridge, Mass., FMP
is renowned for its commitment to innovation and excellence. Leveraging
cutting-edge technologies, FMP offers a comprehensive suite of bioanalytical
services encompassing biobanking, multiomics-driven analyses (including
genomics, proteomics, transcriptomics, lipidomics, and metabolomics), as well
as omic data analysis, assay development, and custom in vitro diagnostic (IVD)
kit manufacturing. FMP’s mission is to empower healthcare professionals,
researchers, and biopharmaceutical entities with the tools and solutions they
need to drive progress towards better patient care and a more personalized
medicine. Share this article on your socials Go back to all news Contact us
Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay
development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice
Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved.
Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2024/04/15/firalis-molecular-precision-announces-its-participation-in-swiss-biotech-day-2024/
Firalis Molecular Precision attends Swiss Biotech Day 2024. We value your
privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized
ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent
to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent
Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform
certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under
each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary"
are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic
functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary
cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as
providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies
do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display.
Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like
sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting
feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics
Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the
website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number
of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display.
Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key
performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user
experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Firalis
Molecular Precision attends Swiss Biotech Day 2024 in Basel, Switzerland.
04.15.24 Huningue, France – Firalis Molecular Precision (FMP), a CAP-
accredited fast-growing Contract Research Organization (CRO) and Contract
Development and Manufacturing Organization (CDMO), announces its upcoming
participation in Swiss Biotech Day 2024, taking place in Basel, Switzerland,
from April 22nd to April 23rd. Swiss Biotech Day serves as a valuable platform
for networking and collaboration in the life sciences community. With over
1,800 experts expected to attend, this year’s event promises fruitful
discussions and partnerships. FMP’s experts are eager to connect with peers,
startups, and mid-sized biotech firms to share insights, partner and drive
innovation together. FMP will use the event’s “Global Village” to strengthen
its connections with Switzerland as a thriving biotech hub. “We’re excited to
be part of Swiss Biotech Day and to collaborate with industry leaders to drive
innovation in healthcare and precision medicine,” said FMP’s CEO, David
Halter. “This event is a golden opportunity to showcase our expertise in
multi-omics and bioanalytical laboratory services, build partnerships, and
advance life sciences worldwide.” FMP invites all attendees to schedule a one-
to-one partnering meeting with its expert Business Developers at Swiss Biotech
Day 2024 and join the conversation through this link :
firalismolecularprecision.com/contact-us About Firalis Molecular Precision
Firalis Molecular Precision (FMP) is a fast-growing CRO & CDMO, providing
advanced multi-omics solutions and tailored contract research services to the
Life Sciences sector. With headquarters in Huningue, France, and a presence in
Cambridge, Mass., FMP is renowned for its commitment to innovation and
excellence. Leveraging cutting-edge technologies, FMP offers a comprehensive
suite of bioanalytical services encompassing biobanking, multiomics-driven
analyses (including genomics, proteomics, transcriptomics, lipidomics, and
metabolomics), as well as omic data analysis, assay development, and custom in
vitro diagnostic (IVD) kit manufacturing. FMP’s mission is to empower
healthcare professionals, researchers, and biopharmaceutical entities with the
tools and solutions they need to drive progress towards better patient care
and a more personalized medicine. Share this article on your socials Go back
to all news Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics
Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms &
Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision,
all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fmp-newsletter-sign-up/
FMP Newsletter Sign-up - Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We
use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or
content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our
use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences
We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions.
You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent
category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on
your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of
the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required
to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or
adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally
identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help
perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on
social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features.
No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how
visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on
metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No
cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and
analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a
better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Firalis
Molecular Precision Your partner in clinical testing and biomarker discovery
Sign up for our newsletter to get new and updated information on our
analytical services and cutting-edge technologies. Linkedin Twitter Envelope ©
2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/legal-information/
Legal Notice - Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use
cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or
content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our
use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences
We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions.
You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent
category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on
your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of
the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required
to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or
adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally
identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help
perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on
social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features.
No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how
visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on
metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No
cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and
analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a
better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Terms and
conditions for the use of Firalis Molecular Precision website Ownership of
Website This website is published by Firalis Molecular Precision, a French SA
corporation, registered with the INSEE, under the SIREN number: 443849096
whose head office is located at 17, Rue du Fort, Huningue FRANCE. Editorial
Director The Editorial Director of the website is the CEO of Firalis Molecular
Precision, Mr. Christophe Valat. Website Hosting The website is hosted by
Automattic, Inc, San Francisco, United-States General conditions of use The
website is subject to French law. The user acknowledges having read the
present general conditions of use and undertakes to respect them. Firalis
Molecular Precision reserves the right to modify this notice at any time. The
user therefore undertakes to consult it regularly. This site is accessible 24
hours a day, 7 days a week, except in case of maintenance work and
interventions necessary for the proper functioning of the site. In this case,
the interruption will be indicated by a warning on the home page or by any
other means. This interruption cannot in any case engage the responsibility of
Firalis Molecular Precision and does not give right to any compensation. In
the event that you access the Firalis Molecular Precision site from a country
other than France, you undertake to ensure that you also comply with any
locally applicable legislation. Content of the site The information provided
on the Firalis Molecular Precision site is purely indicative and is given for
information purposes only. Firalis Molecular Precision cannot guarantee the
accuracy or completeness of the information displayed on the site or its
updating. This information must be the subject of an appropriate complementary
analysis by the user. Firalis Molecular Precision cannot be held responsible
for any errors or omissions, nor for the unavailability of information and
services. Consequently, the user acknowledges that he uses this information at
his own risk. Firalis Molecular Precision cannot be held responsible for any
direct or indirect damage that may result from accessing or using the Firalis
Molecular Precision site, including, without limitation, inaccessibility, loss
of data and/or the presence of viruses on its site. Cookies Firalis Molecular
Precision respects the privacy of every individual who visits its website.
When you visit our website, a cookie may be automatically installed on your
browser. This is a small temporary file that is a string of characters that
stores information related to personalization functions and is used to record
the user’s navigation information for the sole purpose of improving the
quality of information on our website. Types of cookies Cookies that provide a
service specifically requested by the user or facilitate navigation.If you
choose to disable cookies on our site, you may not be able to enjoy the
benefits of the site. Modification of terms Firalis Molecular Precision
reserves the right to modify these Terms at any time without prior notice. Any
changes will be effective immediately upon posting on the Website. Your
continued use of the Website following the posting of revised Terms means that
you accept and agree to the changes. Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter
Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production
Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis
Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/privacy-policy/
Privacy Policy - Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use
cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or
content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our
use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences
We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions.
You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent
category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on
your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of
the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required
to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or
adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally
identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help
perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on
social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features.
No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how
visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on
metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No
cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and
analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a
better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Principles
of Personal Data Protection Website Personal Data Protection Notice Firalis
Molecular Precision (FMP) and its affiliated entities (“FMP,” “we,” or “us”)
are dedicated to upholding the rights and privacy of individuals with respect
to the processing of their personal data. In strict adherence to Regulation
(EU) 2016/679 of the European Parliament and of the Council of 27 April 2016,
known as the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), and other relevant
data protection laws applicable to our corporate group, FMP is committed to
maintaining the highest standards of data protection. This Data Protection
Notice (referred to as the “Notice”) is designed to inform you about how FMP
processes your personal data when you interact with FMP’s website (referred to
as the “Website”), including its contact forms. Your trust is of utmost
importance to us, and we encourage you to review this Notice to understand our
practices. Should you have any inquiries or require clarification, please feel
free to contact us at legal@firalis.com Data protection and civil liberties
Personal data collected through the contact form (name, first name, company,
email address, etc…) are intended solely for the use of Firalis Molecular
Precision, which is responsible for their processing and storage. In
accordance with the requirements of the European regulation n° 2016/679
relating to data processing, files and freedoms, the personal data collected
on the web site are subject to a declaration to the general management of
Firalis Molcular Precision. The data thus collected will not be transferred,
exchanged or rented to a third party. In accordance with the aforementioned
law, users are informed that they have the right to access, rectify and delete
data concerning them. This right can be exercised either directly on the site,
or by e-mail (legal@firalis.com), or by writing to Firalis Molecular Precision
– 17 rue du Fort, 68330 Huningue, France. Collected data Each form on the
website http://www.firalismolecularprecision.com , limits the collection of
personal data to the strict minimum. The personal data collected are processed
according to secure protocols. These data are processed on the following legal
bases : Within the framework of the execution of a contract. On the basis of
your consent. In order to meet the legal and regulatory obligations incumbent
on Firalis Molecular Precision. We may collect and process the following types
of personal information : Contact Information: This includes your name,
company name and email address. Communication Information: If you contact us,
we may keep a record of that correspondence. Website Usage Information: We
collect information about how you interact with our website, including pages
visited and the time spent on each page. Purpose of the processing We use the
personal data collected for the following main purposes: Marketing and
commercial prospecting operations, loyalty or personalized commercial
prospecting and the sending of personalized advertising offers. The processing
of information requests. The management of the exercise of the rights of the
persons concerned by our treatments. Your rights In accordance with the
regulations on personal data, you have the following rights: Right of access:
to know if your data is processed and to obtain communication of it (Article
15 of the RGPD). Right of rectification: to correct inaccurate data or to
complete your data (Article 16 of the GDPR). Right to erasure: erase your data
for a specific reason (Article 17 of the GDPR). Right to limitation of
processing: your data will be retained but no longer used for the purposes
previously mentioned (Article 18 of the GDPR). Right to data portability:
retrieve your data provided in order to transmit them to another company
(Article 20 of the RGPD). Right to object: to object to the processing of your
data (article 21 and 22 of the RGPD). Firalis Molecular Precision has
appointed a legal representative to ensure the protection of personal data and
the respect of the law in the company. You can contact him for any information
or to exercise your rights at the following address : Firalis Molecular
Precision – 17 rue du Fort, 68330 Huningue, France Or by e-mail at
legal@firalis.com Finally, you can contact the National Commission for
Information Technology and Civil Liberties (CNIL). In case of restriction or
non-execution of your rights on personal data or in case of absence of answer
of the person in charge of the treatment within one month as from the request,
you can seize the National Commission of Data processing and Freedoms, which
decides on this request within three weeks as from the date of reception of
the complaint. (Article 51 of the Data Protection Act – ref RGPD) Intellectual
property The present Website and the elements reproduced are the property of
Firalis Molecular Precision or are subject to a right of use or exploitation
to the benefit of Firalis Molecular Precision. The trademarks and logos (semi-
figurative trade name) of Firalis Molecular Precision are registered
trademarks. The general structure, software, texts, images, videos, sounds,
animations, and more generally all the information and contents appearing on
the site are subject to the legislation protecting copyright. Any
representation, reproduction, modification or alteration, in whole or in part,
of all or part of the site or its contents, by any process whatsoever, and on
any medium whatsoever, constitutes an infringement punishable under Articles l
335-2 and following of the French Intellectual Property Code. The databases
that may appear on the Website are protected by the provisions of the law of
July 1, 1998 transposing into French intellectual property law the European
directive of March 11, 1996 on the legal protection of databases. As such, FMP
expressly forbids any reuse, reproduction or extraction of any element of
these databases. The user is responsible for any unauthorized reuse,
reproduction or extraction. FMP reserves the right, immediately and without
prior notice, to delete any content: message, text, image, or graphic that
would contravene the laws and regulations in force and in particular the
regulations specified above. If you wish to use any of the contents of the
Website (text, image, etc.), you must obtain the express, prior and written
authorization of FMP, by writing to the address indicated in the paragraph
“Your rights” or by sending an e-mail to legal@firalis.com Updates to this
Notice Firalis Molecular Precision reserves the right to modify this Notice at
any time without prior notice. Any changes will be effective immediately upon
posting on the Website. Your continued use of the Website following the
posting of revised Notice means that you accept and agree to the changes.
Contact If you have any questions or concerns about this Notice or how we use
your personal information, please contact us at legal@firalis.com . Contact us
Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay
development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice
Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved.
Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/general-terms-and-conditions-of-sales/
General Terms and Conditions of Sales - Firalis Molecular Precision We value
your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve
personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept
All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All
Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently
and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all
cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as
"Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the
basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active
Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such
as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These
cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display.
Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like
sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting
feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics
Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the
website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number
of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display.
Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key
performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user
experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR General
Terms and Conditions of Sales ARTICLE 1. AREA OF APPLICATION – ENFORCEABILITY
The present General Terms and Conditions of Sales (hereafter referred to as «
GTS »), govern the contractual relationships (hereafter « the Contract »)
between Firalis Molecular Precision hereafter identified in the Offer (as
defined in article 2 below), hereafter referred to as « The Company » or « FMP
» and its customers, referred to as « the Customer », together referred to as
« the Parties », in connection with the providing of analytical testing
services (hereafter « the Analysis »). By signing the Quote established by the
Company, or by ordering referencing to such a Quote, the Customer: – Accepts
these GTS – Accepts that these GTS, with eventual specific conditions stated
in the Quote, constitute the contract between the parties, to the exclusion of
all other provision contained in any other document, unless otherwise
negotiated and stated in a specific written contract. Any exception to the
present GTS will have to be mentioned in the “Quote” (as it is defined below)
or be reported in a written document signed by a person duly entitled to
represent the Company. Should this not be the case, any provision of any kind
as proposed by the Customer, at whatever moment and under whichever form, that
would deviate from the present GTS will be rejected and considered void.
ARTICLE 2. ORDERS Any Analysis or any order of product generates the issuing
of a written offer by the Company (hereafter referred to as « the Quote » or «
the Offer») either on paper (fax or courier), or on an electronic support, to
which are attached the present GTS. The Offer being accepted by the Customer,
entailing acceptance of the present GTS, returned on paper or electronic
support, trigger conclusion of the Order. The Offer specifies for how long it
will be valid. Any ordering triggers the full acceptance without exceptions to
the present GTS. The Offer completes or may modify the present GTS and
represents as such the conditions applicable to the Contract. The execution of
the Analysis can only start, after the receipt by the Company of the Offer
accepted, if the Company has received the samples that have to be analysed as
well as the full set information identified in the Offer. Any additional
service requested by the Customer on samples received by the Company will
generate a new Offer and will be treated as a new Order that may also trigger
new execution terms. ARTICLE 3. PRICE AND PAYMENT CONDITIONS Prices are
established on the basis of the data provided by the Customer and for normal
conditions of execution of the service. The Analysis or the sale of products
are carried out at prices in force at the day of the Offer, price without tax.
Applicable taxes are those into force at the date of invoicing. Any taxes,
right or other provision to pay under the terms of French and Community
regulation, or from an importing country or from a transit country, will be
charged to the Customer. Except as otherwise mentioned in our Quotations,
Order Confirmations or Invoices, the payment is due within thirty (30) days
from the date of invoice, by bank transfer, at the payment address mentioned
on the Invoice. Any invoice which remains outstanding after due date will
carry interest at the rate of one percent (1%) per month or three times the
maximum interest rate permitted by applicable law, whichever is higher, and a
fixed compensation for recovery costs of an amount of € 40 (forty euros), with
the right for the Company to put on hold all orders in process and to ask for
the reimbursement of all costs incurred to recover the amounts due, exceeding
the amount of the recovery costs mentioned above. Any challenge of invoice by
the Customer will have to be notified to the Company by registered mail no
later than 30 days as from invoicing. ARTICLE 4. DUTIES OF CUSTOMER IN
DELIVERING SAMPLES OR MATERIALS The samples or materials must be in a
condition that makes the preparation of reports/analyses or the production of
ordered products possible without difficulty. The Company is entitled to
conduct an initial examination of the samples or materials to check their
condition before processing the samples, drawing up a report or using them in
production. In case of poor quality or quantity of the sample, the Company can
refuse to execute the service provision. The Customer duly informed could
proceed to the transmission of a new sample or a complementary sample. It is
the Customer’s responsibility to insure compliance with hazardous waste
regulations, including regarding information, transportation and disposal and
to inform the Company personnel or representatives about sample health and
safety concerns, including any known or suspected toxic. If it concerns a
clinical study, the Customer certifies that the samples have been collected in
the context of this study and that it obtained the patients’ consent. ARTICLE
5. PROPERTY RIGHTS ON SAMPLE MATERIAL The Customer keeps the ownership of the
samples. The Customer authorizes the Company to use free of charge the samples
to carry out the analysis, and will state in its order whether, after
analysis, the sample has to be returned, destroyed or kept in stock in such a
case the duration of the stock has to be fixed), the Customer fully bear the
cost of such choice. Unless on specific request included in the Offer (return
of the samples at the expense of the Customer, etc.) the samples will be
conserved during 3 months of the date of receipt of the analysis results by
the Customer, then destroyed. Should the samples be returned by the Company,
all transport, insurance and packaging costs will be paid by the Customer (to
include in the Quote if possible). The Company will not be liable in case of
deterioration of the sample during transport. The Company will not be liable
in case of deterioration of the sample. ARTICLE 6. DELIVERY DATES, TURNAROUND
TIME Delivery dates and turnaround times are stated in the Offer. In case
where the realization of the service assessment requires material or non-
material elements, in the Customer’s possession and that have to be forwarded
to the Company, the application of the deadlines expressed in the Quote only
start from the reception of these elements by the Company. Results are
generally sent via other electronic means, to the attention of the persons
indicated by the customer in the order, promptly after the analysis is
completed. The raw data will be forwarded to the Customer depending on the
modality specified in the Offer. The raw data, the laboratory notebook and
other documents or critical data associated to the project will be preserved
within the Company during 5 years. In case of subcontract, the subcontractor
originals reports justifying the results would be given upon demand from the
Customer. Any analysis is considered as fully carried out from the date of
provision of the deliverables and of a final report which shall meet the usual
quality criteria in this matter. ARTICLE 7. TRANSFER OF PROPERTY THE TRANSFER
OF PROPERTY AND THE RIGHT OF USE OF OUR WORK, ANALYSIS REPORT AND PRODUCTS
SHALL BE SUBJECT TO PRIOR FULL PAYMENT. Should the Customer wish to refer
under any form or support whatsoever to the accreditation or the analysis
report, he will have to ask upfront the authorization of the Company, which
will be free to determine whether it will be possible to be identified, and if
applicable the rules to be followed. The Customer guarantees the Company
against all consequences, of any nature whatsoever, of a publication/spread of
the analysis report, for instance in the case where it would cause prejudice
to a third party or to the Company, and will cover the Company any request for
indemnification to repair any damage which is resulting from such a
publication/spread. ARTICLE 8. LIMITED WARANTIES AND RESPONSABILITIES The
Company guarantees to the Customer that the Service is carried out in
accordance with the specifications stated in the Quote. For the realization of
the Service, the Company is held by an obligation of means. A preliminary
analysis report and/or an extract of report would be given upon demand from
the Customer. However, considering that it does not include all the requested
analysis, the report shall not involve the legal responsibility of the
Company. The Customer is responsible for the proper delivery of samples sent
to the Company for analyses. Unless otherwise specifically agreed in writing
by the Company, the Company accepts no responsibility for any loss or damage,
which may occur to any sample in transit. The Customer will at all times be
liable for the security, packaging and insurance of the sample from its
dispatch until it is delivered to the offices or the laboratories of the
Company. Unless explicitly agreed in writing by all parties, the contractual
relationship shall be exclusively between the Customer and the Company. There
shall be no third-party beneficiary or collateral warranty relating to any
order and the customer shall indemnify and hold the Company harmless from and
against any and all third-party claims in any way relating to the customer or
to the order by the customer. The Company (together with its workers, office
clerks, employees, representatives, managers, officers, directors, agents and
consultants and all The Company’s partners and affiliates), shall be liable
only in presence of a proven direct and immediate damage caused by the
Company’s misconduct in connection with the performance of an order and then,
only if the Company has received written notice thereof not later than six (6)
months after the date of the customer’s knowledge of the relevant claim. The
Company Indemnifying Parties shall not be liable for any indirect, direct or
consequential loss or damage (including, but not limited to, loss of business,
profits, goodwill, business opportunities or similar) incurred by the customer
or by any third party. ARTICLE 9. REPEATED ANALYSIS Objections to test results
can be made within thirty (30) days after the Customer receives the results.
However, unless it would appear that the results of the repeated analysis do
not match those of the first one, the Customer shall bear the costs of the
repeat testing or review. Furthermore, a repeated analysis will be possible
only if the Company has a sufficient amount of the original sample on hand
when it receives the Customer’s objection. Otherwise the customer will be
required to pay all costs, including sampling, transportation, analytical and
disposal costs for the repeat analysis. Any objections will be dealt with in
accordance with the provisions set out in the internal complaints management
procedure. This procedure is available on request at quality@firalis.com .
ARTICLE 10. FORCE MAJEURE The Company cannot be held liable for delays,
errors, damages or other problems caused by events or circumstances which are
unforeseen or beyond the Company’s’ reasonable control, or which result from
compliance with governmental requests, laws and regulations (including any
event as defined as force majeure by French Case Law, for instance, refusal of
accreditation, etc.). ARTICLE 11. CONFIDENTIALITY The Company commits to keep
the analysis report confidential and will not be allowed to use it or to
divulge it to any third party for any reason whatsoever, except with a view to
proving the execution of the work and obtain related compensation, or upon
request of a competent administrative authority or to execute a court
decision. The Company commits to keep confidential all technical, commercial,
financial or other information that would be communicated to it in the setting
of the execution of the analysis, and identified as being confidential by the
Customer. The Customer commits to keep confidential all technical, commercial,
financial or other information it may be aware of in the setting of the
execution of the analysis by the Company, as well as on the composition of
products and software delivered by the Company. ARTICLE 12. NEWSLETTER
SUBSCRIPTION Upon entering into a sales agreement with FMP, the Customer
consents to automatic subscription to the Company’s newsletter, utilizing the
email address provided during the transaction for communications related to
services, promotions, and company updates. The Customer retains the right to
opt-out at any time through the “unsubscribe” link in the newsletter or by
directly contacting the Company. The Company commits to safeguarding customer
privacy and complying with data protection laws, documenting and respecting
customer consent for newsletter subscription in accordance with legal
requirements. By signing the sales agreement, the Customer acknowledges and
agrees to the terms outlined in this newsletter subscription clause. The
Company commits to keep confidential all technical, commercial, financial or
other information that would be communicated to it in the setting of the
execution of the analysis, and identified as being confidential by the
Customer. The Customer commits to keep confidential all technical, commercial,
financial or other information it may be aware of in the setting of the
execution of the analysis by the Company, as well as on the composition of
products and software delivered by the Company. ARTICLE 13. IMPARTIALITY The
Company and all its employees undertake to perform their services
independently and impartially. The Customer shall refrain from any act
undermining the impartiality or independence of the Company or its employees.
ARTICLE 14. GOVERNING LAW AND JURISDICTION The Contractual Relationship
Between the Company and the Customer Is Subject to French Law. Any Litigation
Arising As to the Validity, Interpretation, Conclusion, Execution or
Termination of the Contract Shall Be Governed by the Commercial Court of the
Place Where the Legal Seat of the Company Having Accepted the Order in
Question Is Located, Which shall Have Exclusive Juridiction. Reproduction or
use of the laboratory’s COFRAC accreditation mark is prohibited. Contact us
Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay
development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice
Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved.
Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/
Bioanalytical Laboratory Services | Multi-omics | Firalis Molecular Precision, CRO & CDMO We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Your end-to-end partner, From biomarker discovery to IVD kit production. Trusted by biopharmaceutical organizations, researchers and healthcare professionals for providing a powerful multi-omics approach across the entire drug and diagnostic product development pipelines, with precision and regulatory expertise. Our approach Our commitment Our DNA At the core of our values lies a commitment to fostering collaboration and crafting tailored innovative solutions for academia, research organizations, and biopharmaceutical companies, recognizing the unique challenges and opportunities each sector presents. Unique solutions Swift turnaround times Steadfast collaboration Cost-effectiveness Regulatory compliance Innovative technology Global presence Client-centric approach Our services From state-of-the-art genomics and proteomics solutions to Mass Spectrometry assays, data science and ASD/Production, our cutting-edge services are all designed to accelerate your research and biomarker discovery journey. Bioanalytical Services Biobanking Genomics Proteomics Lipido-metabolomics Associated Services Bioinformatics & Biostatistics Assay Development & IVD kit Production Find the service that helps you meet your research goals Support throughout the whole process Discovery Pre-clinical Research Clinical Development Approval An essential step in drug development FMP plays a pivotal role in drug development’s discovery phase, leveraging advanced expertise and cutting-edge technologies to craft customized bioanalytical strategies for discovery programs. Leveraging a holistic multi-omic approach, we delve deep into biomarker/target discovery and validation, laying the foundation for robust disease understanding. Our expertise extends to elucidating the intricate mechanisms of action underlying various diseases, empowering pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies throughout this critical phase. Explore our drug discovery capabilities Laying the foundation - Investigating safety and efficacy before human trials In pre-clinical research, we offer comprehensive services from early to late stages. Our expertise includes biomarker studies, drug safety and efficacy assessments, drug concentration quantification, and custom assay development, providing tailored solutions for advancing biomedical science. Leveraging both in vitro and in vivo experiments, we rigorously evaluate the effects of drugs to ensure thorough understanding and informed decision-making throughout the drug development process. Explore our drug effect assessment capabilities Comprehensive support across trial phases In clinical development, our support spans phases 1 to 3, encompassing a wide array of services. We investigate short-term adverse reactions, evaluate drug activity, measure efficacy, and discover prognostic and diagnostic biomarkers. We also initiate CDx development, evaluate drug effects and adverse events, and validate drug response signatures and biomarkers clinically. Furthermore, we conduct CDx CoU validation and develop custom assays, ensuring comprehensive assistance throughout the clinical trial journey. Explore our solutions for clinical development Steadfast support for post-market surveillance In the post-approval phase, we remain steadfast in our commitment to ensuring the ongoing safety and efficacy of approved treatments. Our comprehensive post-market surveillance program includes diligent monitoring of long-term biomarker efficacy, safety profiles, and the balance of risks and benefits associated with the use of pharmaceutical products. Leveraging advanced technologies and methodologies, we conduct thorough assessments to identify any emerging concerns and promptly address them to safeguard patient well-being. Additionally, we undertake the production of CDx kits, facilitating the integration of personalized medicine approaches into clinical practice and enhancing patient care outcomes. Explore our solutions for post-market surveillance From samples to insights Uncovering insights requires going beyond data generation. It requires an approach that analyzes multiple layers of information simultaneously. Our team of experts can support you throughout your R&D from samples to insights. Study Planning Samples Collection – Kick off design – Scientific support ​ Sample Management Quality control – Labelling – Barcoding – Blinding LIMS Registry > Freezing (-4 to -150°C) > Monitoring (24/7) ​ Pre-Analytical Services​ Samples Aliquoting – Extraction Services – Custom Protocols ​ Sample Analysis & QC​ Genomics – Epigenomics – Transcriptomics – Proteomics – Metabolomics ​ Data Analysis​ Bioinformatics & ML – Statistics – Internal Data Storage ​ Insights Reporting​ Raw Data – Custom Analysis – Data Visualization ​ Scientific insights and news View all insights Deadline extended to apply for the MERSCOPE® Grant Program in collaboration with Vizgen To offer researchers across Europe a chance to leverage spatial transcriptomics in their research field, our MERSCOPE® Platform Grant Program's deadline has been extended until June 30... Read More Firalis Molecular Precision becomes a Certified Olink Service Provider Firalis Molecular Precision becomes a Certified Olink Service Provider, proving proficiency in using the Flex, Target 48 & 96, Explore HT, and Explore 384-plex panels for proteomics analysis... Read More Firalis Molecular Precision announces its participation in Swiss Biotech Day 2024 Firalis Molecular Precision announces its participation in Swiss Biotech Day 2024, in Basel, Switzerland, April 22-23, a platform for networking and collaboration in the life sciences community... Read More Partner with us Our experts are committed to providing you with strategic multi-omics solutions tailored to your research goals, in each and every therapeutic area. Get in touch Join us Want to help us drive progress in precision medicine by supporting researchers, biopharmaceutical organizations and healthcare professionals ? View job opportunities Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/services/
Services | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Notre approche Soutenir les entreprises, les chercheurs et les professionnels de la santé en leur fournissant les outils nécessaires pour faire progresser la médecine de précision. Des moyens adaptés et une approche holistique Nous apportons une expertise et des ressources spécialisées dans le cadre de la génération et de l'analyse de données génomiques, trasncriptomiques, protéomiques, métabolomiques et lipidomiques. Nous comptons sur une équipe diversifiée de scientifiques, d'ingénieurs et d'experts industriels possédant des connaissances approfondies dans des domaines thérapeutiques clés, des disciplines scientifiques et des capacités techniques. Notre équipe s'engage à fournir à nos clients des solutions stratégiques, économiques, personnalisées et globales pour répondre à leurs besoins en matière de recherche et de développement. Forts de plus de 15 ans d'expérience et d'une compréhension approfondie des dernières technologies, nous nous engageons à fournir à nos sponsors des résultats de la plus haute qualité avec des délais d'exécution courts. 0 sièges (en EU et aux US) 0 Experts PhD 0 mètres carré de laboratoire 0 années d'expérience Collaborer avec nous est la clé pour accélérer votre recherche, simplifier le processus de développement et optimiser les opérations de fabrication. Comment pouvons-nous soutenir vos projets de recherche ? Faire appel à nos services Nos solutions Des solutions génomiques et protéomiques au développement d'essais, en passant par l'analyse de données omiques et la production de kits personnalisés, nos services CRO et CDMO sont destinés à accélérer et à simplifier le processus de développement de traitements et de produits de diagnostic. Forts d'une expertise scientifique et d'une connaissance approfondie des dernières technologies, nos experts s'engagent à fournir des résultats de la plus haute qualité et les plus fiables possibles à nos clients. Services bioanalytiques Biobanque Génomique Protéomique Spectrométrie de masse Services associés Analyse des données Développement d'essais Production de kit de diagnostic in vitro Trouver le service qui correspond le plus à vos besoins Nous contacter CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés.


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/services/biobanque/
Biobanque | Conservation d'échantillons biologiques et chimiques | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Notre biobanque Une conservation sécurisée et à long terme de vos échantillons biologiques et chimiques dans des conditions optimales. Nous garantissons l'intégrité et la sécurité de vos échantillons. Au sein de notre biobanque, nous veillons à ce que vos échantillons biologiques et chimiques soient conservés en toute sécurité par le biais du respect strict de la chaîne du froid. Nous garantissons ainsi des résultats fiables et pratiques pour vos projets de recherche. NOS SERVICES Service de stockage et d'aliquotage Notre service offre une solution sûre et efficace pour stocker et gérer vos échantillons et garantir leur intégrité et leur stabilité. Nous disposons d’une très grande capacité de stockage pour un large éventail de types et de tailles d’échantillons, y compris les fluides corporels (BM, plasma, sérum, LCR, exomes, ARN, ADN…), les cellules et les tissus. Nous proposons également un service d’aliquotage pour vos échantillons. Ce service comprend l’étiquetage, l’emballage et la documentation des aliquotes pour faciliter le suivi et l’utilisation future : contrôle de la qualité, recherche et développement, ou tests. Service d'extraction d'acides nucléiques Nous proposons un service d’extraction d’ADN/ARN qui permet d’obtenir des acides nucléiques de haute qualité pour un large éventail d’applications. Nous utilisons des méthodes d’extraction manuelles et automatisées ainsi que différentes techniques pour isoler l’ADN ou l’ARN à partir de divers types d’échantillons (sang, tissus, cellules, etc.). Nous suivons des protocoles rigoureux pour garantir la pureté et l’intégrité des acides nucléiques extraits. Nous pouvons également personnaliser nos protocoles d’extraction pour répondre à vos besoins de recherche spécifiques, en faisant varier des paramètres tels que le type d’application en aval, le volume de l’échantillon et le rendement de l’extraction. Pourquoi opter pour nos services de biobanque ? Grande capacité de stockage Différents types d’échantillons sont stockés dans un espace dédié de 250 m². Température contrôlée Chambre froide, congélateurs, conteneurs d’azote liquide : 4°C, -20°C, -80°C, -150°C Système de suivi des échantillons Système d’information et de gestion des laboratoires (SLIMS), possibilité de suivi à l’aide d’un code-barres 2D unique, base de données régulièrement mise à jour. Système d'astreinte 24/7 Surveillance continue de la température (capteurs radio-émetteurs), générateurs d’alimentation électrique, alertes de détection d’intrusion Des normes de la plus haute qualité Pour répondre aux exigences spécifiques de nos clients, nous mettons en place un contrôle strict de la qualité et maintenons la traçabilité à chaque étape du cycle de vie de l’échantillon. Notre processus d’assurance de la qualité garantit que nous obtenons toutes les données conformément aux normes. ISO 9001 : pour un management de qualité ISO 20387 : pour un système de management de la qualité des centres de ressources biologiques et le contrôle de la qualité des ressources biologiques d’origine humaine, microbienne, végétale et animale. ISO 14001 : pour un système de management environnemental (SME) de haute qualité Nos pratiques d'assurance de la qualité Si vous souhaitez bénéficier de nos prestations de biobanking pour le stockage de vos échantillons Prenez contact avec un expert CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/services/genomiques/
Génomiques | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Génomiques Home Services Génomiques Nos services de génomiques Nous offrons une gamme de services de génomiques de pointe pour répondre à vos besoins de recherche. Notre équipe de scientifiques expérimentés s’engage à vous fournir des résultats de haute qualité et un soutien personnalisé tout au long de votre projet. Notre contribution à votre réussite Service de séquençage de nouvelle génération Notre service NGS utilise la technologie de séquençage dernière génération d’ Illumina pour vous fournir des données de séquençage précises et fiables. Nous proposons une variété d’applications de séquençage, notamment le séquençage du génome entier , le séquençage de l’exome , le séquençage de l’ARN et le séquençage ciblé . Notre équipe travaillera en étroite collaboration avec vous pour concevoir une stratégie de séquençage personnalisée qui correspond à vos objectifs de recherche. En savoir plus sur les services NGS que nous proposons Services de séquençage de cellule unique Notre service de séquençage de cellules unique permet une analyse à haute résolution des cellules individuelles. Nous utilisons des plateformes avancées basées sur des gouttelettes ou des plaques pour capturer et séquencer des cellules individuelles, ce qui vous permet d’analyser la variabilité d’une cellule à l’autre au sein de systèmes biologiques complexes. Nous proposons une gamme d’applications de séquençage de cellules uniques, notamment le transcriptome, l’épigénome et le profilage immunitaire. En savoir plus sur les services de séquençage de cellule unique que nous proposons Services de transcriptomique spatiale Notre service de transcriptomique spatiale utilise la technologie Vizgen pour fournir une cartographie spatiale à haute résolution de l’expression des gènes dans les échantillons de tissus . Cette technologie permet d’identifier des signatures moléculaires résolues dans l’espace et a des applications dans une série de domaines de recherche, notamment la biologie du développement, la recherche sur le cancer et les neurosciences. En savoir plus sur les services de transcriptomique spatiale que nous proposons Services de profilage de l'expression génique avec la technologie HTG Notre service de profilage de l’expression génique utilise le système HTG EdgeSeq , qui permet l’ analyse simultanée de centaines, voire de milliers de gènes à partir d’échantillons fixés au formol et inclus en paraffine (FFPE) ou de tissus fraîchement congelés . Cette technologie permet d’établir des profils d’expression génique très sensibles et spécifiques et est idéale pour les études de recherche clinique. En savoir plus sur les services HTG que nous proposons Services de RT-qPCR sur mesure Notre service de RT-qPCR personnalisé permet une quantification sensible et précise des niveaux d’expression des gènes. Nous proposons une large gamme de sondes TaqMan et de jeux d’amorces pour vos gènes d’intérêt spécifique, et nous pouvons vous conseiller sur la conception expérimentale et l’analyse des données. En savoir plus sur les services de RT-qPCR que nous proposons Dans nos services de génomique, nous nous engageons à vous fournir des résultats de la plus haute qualité. Contactez-nous dès aujourd’hui pour discuter de vos besoins en matière de recherche et de la manière dont nous pouvons vous aider à atteindre vos objectifs scientifiques. CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/services/genomiques/sequencage-nouvelle-generation/
Séquençage Nouvelle Génération | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Séquençage Nouvelle Génération Une expertise scientifique et des technologies de séquençage Illumina® de pointe qui génèrent des données génétiques de haute qualité. NOS SERVICES Séquençage du génome Le séquençage du génome entier (WGS) fournit une carte complète de l’ADN d’un organisme. Grâce à notre service, nous pouvons subvenir à vos besoins de WGS afin de déterminer les variantes génétiques qui peuvent être associées à une pathologie ou à d’autres traits phénotypiques. Le WGS peut être utilisé pour l’assemblage denovo lorsque votre génome d’intérêt est mal annoté. Epigénomiques L’épigénomique désigne une série de techniques utilisées pour analyser les modifications chimiques et les interactions entre l’ADN et les protéines afin de mieux comprendre les mécanismes moléculaires qui sous-tendent les maladies complexes et d’identifier des cibles potentielles pour une intervention thérapeutique. Séquençage ciblé Le séquençage ciblé est une technique qui permet de se concentrer sur des régions spécifiques du génome. Notre service de séquençage ciblé permet d’identifier les variantes génétiques associées à des pathologies ou à des caractéristiques spécifiques. Séquençage de l'ARN Le séquençage de l’ARN permet d’étudier l’expression des gènes et d’identifier de nouveaux transcrits. Notre service de séquençage de l’ARN fournit un transcriptome complet permettant d’identifier les gènes qui sont exprimés de manière différentielle dans diverses conditions. Séquençage du Génome Entier Methyl-Seq Cellule unique & Bulk ATAC-Seq CUT&RUN Séquençage de l’Exome Entier Panel de gènes personnalisé Essai de validation CRISPR Séquençage ARN Séquençage ARN non-codant Séquençage de l’exome Séquençage cellule unique (10X®) NOTRE PARC ANALYTIQUE Nos laboratoires sont équipés des technologies les plus performantes et innovantes provenant de Illumina® et dédiées au séquençage qui conduisent à : Une analyse plus rapide des échantillons et une réduction des coûts analytiques. Taille des données Durée d’exécution Nbre max de lectures par cycle Longueur maximale de lecture NextSeq 500 16-120 Gb 15-29 hr 130-400 M 2×150 bp NextSeq 2000 10-360 Gb 10-48 hr 100M-1.2 B 2×300 bp NovaSeq 6000Dx 80 Gb-6 Tb 13-<45 hr 800M-10 B x2 2×250 bp* NovaSeq X-Plus 265 Gb-16 Tb 13-48 hr 25 B x2 2×150 bp* * Possibilité de générer des séquences continues de 5-7 kb avec quelques lectures> 10 kb Pourquoi opter pour nos services de séquençage nouvelle génération ? Des résultats de haute qualité Nous utilisons des technologies de séquençage Illumina® à la pointe du progrès et nous n’utilisons que des réactifs et des équipements de la plus haute qualité pour garantir à nos partenaires les résultats les plus précis et les plus fiables. Une équipe compétente Nos experts en génomique possèdent une vaste expérience en séquençage et en analyse des données omiques et s’engagent à fournir un service et un soutien de qualité, tout au long de votre projet de recherche. Un délai d'exécution rapide Le temps est un facteur critique lorsqu’il s’agit de projets de recherche. C’est pourquoi nous nous efforçons de vous fournir des délais d’exécution rapides sans compromettre la qualité. Des solutions personnalisées Chaque projet de recherche est unique. C’est pourquoi nous proposons des solutions personnalisées adaptées à vos besoins spécifiques, de la préparation des échantillons à l’analyse des données. Si vous souhaitez bénéficier de nos services de Séquençage Nouvelle Génération avec la technologie Illumina® pour votre recherche Prenez contact avec l'un de nos experts CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/sequencage-de-cellules-uniques/
Séquençage de cellules uniques | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Séquençage de cellules uniques Explorez les profils d'expression génétique au niveau cellulaire, en combinant les données d'expression génique avec les marqueurs de surface, les fréquences des clones TCR et BCR, ou l'analyse de la chromatine ouverte. Notre service de séquençage de cellules uniques utilise la technologie de pointe de 10x Genomics® - Chromium iX - fournissant des données de haute qualité. Nous employons trois protocoles spécifiques - 3'/5' et Fixed Flex - révélant des informations sur les mécanismes transcriptionnels et la régulation génique. Cette approche diversifiée permet des analyses fines, mettant en évidence la dynamique de l'expression génique et les processus biologiques régulés par l'ARN. PRINCIPE DE LA TECHNOLOGIE Next GEM DE 10x Genomics La technologie Next GEM de 10x Genomics® repose sur la microfluidique pour diviser les cellules individuelles en minuscules gouttelettes, où chaque gouttelette est chargée d’amorces à code-barres uniques qui permettent l’identification des cellules individuelles pendant le séquençage. Cette technologie permet l’analyse à haut débit de milliers de cellules individuelles, ce qui permet une compréhension plus complète de l’hétérogénéité cellulaire. Schéma du principe de la technologie Next GEM de 10x Genomics® NOS SERVICES Préparation des échantillons Nous offrons un soutien complet pour l’isolement, la dissociation et la préservation des cellules, assurant ainsi la préparation de suspensions unicellulaires de la plus haute qualité en vue du séquençage ultérieur. Préparation des librairies Nous préparons les librairies en utilisant la plateforme de 10x Genomics, englobant l’encapsulation cellulaire, le marquage par codes-barres et la synthèse de l’ADNc. Notre service intègre des contrôles de qualité pour assurer l’utilisation exclusive de librairies de haute qualité lors du séquençage. Séquençage Nous proposons un séquençage à haut débit sur les plateformes Illumina pour générer des données de séquençage de cellules uniques de haute qualité. Analyse de données Nous fournissons une analyse complète des données de séquençage de cellules uniques, y compris le contrôle de la qualité, l’alignement, la quantification de l’expression des gènes et l’analyse de regroupement pour identifier les sous-populations cellulaires et les gènes marqueurs. Pourquoi opter pour notre service de séquençage de cellules uniques ? Une analyse complète de l'hétérogénéité cellulaire Notre service permet une analyse complète de l’hétérogénéité cellulaire, permettant l’identification de sous-populations cellulaires et de gènes marqueurs que les approches traditionnelles de séquençage en masse n’auraient pas permis d’identifier. Une équipe compétente Nos experts en séquençage et en analyse bio-informatique vous assistera tout au long du processus de séquençage, de la préparation des échantillons à l’analyse des données, afin de garantir la réussite de votre projet de recherche. Des données de qualité Nous utilisons une technologie de pointe et des mesures de QC pour garantir des données de haute qualité, qui sont essentielles pour l’analyse en aval. Vous souhaitez en savoir plus sur nos services de séquençage de cellules uniques utilisant la technologie de 10x Genomics® Parlez à l'un de nos experts en génomique CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/services/genomiques/services-de-transcriptomique-spatiale/
Services de Transcriptomique spatiale​ | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Transcriptomique spatiale Une technologie de pointe de Vizgen et une expertise scientifique permettant d'étudier l'organisation spatiale des molécules biologiques dans vos échantillons de tissus. Firalis Molecular Precision se positionne comme l'un des principaux prestataires de services en Europe pour la plateforme MERSCOPE® de Vizgen. Nos services de transcriptomique spatiale aident les chercheurs à obtenir des données d’expression génique à haute résolution et au niveau spatial à partir d’échantillons de tissus, ce qui leur permet de mieux comprendre les relations entre les gènes, les cellules et les tissus. La transcriptomique spatiale La transcriptomique spatiale est une technique qui permet d’obtenir des données sur l’expression des gènes dans un contexte spatial. En effet, elle permet la détection simultanée de milliers de gènes au sein d’un échantillon de tissu, tout en préservant leur organisation spatiale originelle. Cette approche est applicable dans les domaines de la biologie, de la médecine et de la découverte de médicaments. Nous utilisons la technologie brevetée MERFISH de Vizgen, qui permet de détecter jusqu'à 500 gènes/panel dans un échantillon de tissu unique. La technologie MERFISH offre une haute résolution spatiale, permettant la visualisation des modèles d’expression génique au niveau d’une cellule unique. Nos experts en génomique s’appuient sur cette technologie de pointe pour offrir un service de bout en bout, allant de la préparation des échantillons et de la génération des données à l’analyse et à la visualisation. Nous fournissons également des solutions d’analyse de données personnalisées afin de faciliter l’exploitation des données générées, par les chercheurs. Nos services d'analyse des données omiques Principe de la technologie MERFISH MERFISH est une technologie transcriptomique basée sur l’imagerie qui mesure à la fois l’expression et l’information spatiale de l’ARN dans des cellules individuelles à partir de coupes de tissus. Le MERFISH de Vizgen permet une mesure massive et multiplexée de molécules uniques par FISH. Les espèces d’ARN individuelles sont marquées par des codes-barres à travers le marquage combinatoire d’oligonucléotides. Des séries séquentielles d’hybridation d’oligonucléotides et d’imagerie par microscopie à fluorescence à haute résolution mesurent les codes-barres pour une quantification de l’ARN à résolution spatiale pouvant aller jusqu’à 500 gènes. Pour réaliser une analyse MERFISH, les échantillons de tissus sont d’abord fixés. Ils sont ensuite hybridés avec des sondes d’ADN spécialement conçues à cet effet. Les échantillons sont ensuite visualisés à l’aide d’un microscope à fluorescence. Chaque ARN est identifié et localisé sur la base de sa combinaison unique de signaux fluorescents. Lire l'article sur " Spatially resolved, highly multiplexed RNA profiling in single cells " (en anglais) Pourquoi opter pour nos services de transcriptomique spatiale ? Une équipe d'experts formée Notre équipe possède une vaste expérience dans le séquençage et l’analyse de données omiques. Nous fournissons une assistance tout au long du processus de séquençage, de la préparation des échantillons à l’analyse des données, afin de garantir la réussite du projet. Des données et des analyses de haute qualité Nous utilisons des technologies de pointe et des mesures de contrôle de la qualité pour garantir des données de haute qualité et nous travaillons en étroite collaboration avec nos clients pour veiller à ce que leurs objectifs de recherche soient atteints. Des prix compétitifs Nous proposons des prix compétitifs pour notre service de transcriptomique spatiale afin de permettre un large accès à cette puissante technologie. Prestataire de services certifié Nous sommes le premier prestataire de services en Europe pour la plateforme MERSCOPE® de Vizgen. Bénéficiez de notre expertise scientifique et de la technologie MERSCOPE pour obtenir des données d'expression génique de haute qualité, résolues dans l'espace, à partir de vos échantillons. Parlez à l'un de nos experts CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/services/genomiques/services-de-rt-qpcr-sur-mesure/
RT-qPCR sur mesure​ | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN RT-qPCR sur mesure Une analyse précise et fiable pour vos analyses d'un seul gène ou de plusieurs gènes sur un grand nombre d'échantillons. Notre champ d'analyses Nos experts emploient les technologies les plus avancées pour une analyse performante, à haut débit, rentable et précise des gènes. Nbr d’échantillons/ tests RUO IVDR Informations sur le fabricant CFX 96 96 échantillons / tests En savoir plus QS5-DX™ 96 échantillons / tests En savoir plus CFS Opus 96 - Dx 96 échantillons / tests En savoir plus Biomark™ HD 96 échantillons / 96 tests En savoir plus Principe de la RT-qPCR La RT-qPCR (Reverse Transcription Quantitative Polymerase Chain Reaction) est une technique de biologie moléculaire utilisée pour mesurer la quantité de molécules d’ARN présentes dans un échantillon. La technique consiste à convertir l’ARN en ADN complémentaire (ADNc) par transcription inverse. Ensuite, l’ADNc est amplifié par PCR (Réaction en Chaîne de la Polymérase) avec des sondes fluorescentes (SYBR Green ou TaqMan). La quantité de fluorescence produite est directement proportionnelle à la quantité d’ADNc présente dans l’échantillon, ce qui permet une analyse quantitative des niveaux d’expression des gènes. Pourquoi opter pour nos services de RT-qPCR sur mesure ? Nos services de RT-qPCR sur mesure répondent aux besoins des chercheurs ayant besoin d’une analyse précise et fiable de l’expression des gènes dans le cadre de leurs expériences. Que vous étudiiez l’expression des gènes dans les cellules cancéreuses, le rôle de gènes spécifiques dans les maladies (variations génétiques telles que SNP ou CNV ou profilage des miARN et phénotypage des maladies) ou que vous développiez de nouveaux tests de diagnostic moléculaire, nos services vous aideront à atteindre vos objectifs de recherche. Des services sur-mesure La conception des amorces, l’isolement de l’ARN, la synthèse de l’ADNc et l’analyse par PCR font partie des services sur-mesure que nous proposons. Une équipe compétente Notre équipe de génomique dispose d’une expérience et de formations approfondies en RT-qPCR. Nous vous assistons tout au long du processus, de la préparation des échantillons à l’analyse des données, afin de garantir la réussite de votre projet de recherche. Données de haute qualité Nos experts se servent de plateformes de pointe pour effectuer la RT-qPCR avec une sensibilité et une spécificité élevées. Nous vous fournissons une analyse et une interprétation personnalisées des données. Bénéficiez de notre expertise scientifique et de nos plateformes de RT-qPCR au laboratoire pour faire avancer votre projet de recherche Contactez un de nos experts en génomique CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/services/proteomique/
Services de protéomiques | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Protéomique Home Services Protéomique Nos services de protéomiques Nous sommes l’un des leaders dans la fourniture de solutions protéomiques de haut niveau. En fait, nous offrons une gamme de services pour répondre aux besoins des chercheurs et des cliniciens dans divers domaines. Notre portefeuille de services comprend certaines des technologies les plus avancées et les plus fiables disponibles aujourd’hui. Notre contribution à votre réussite Services d'immunoessais Nous disposons des dernières technologies pour vous aider à détecter et à quantifier avec précision les biomarqueurs protéiques dans vos échantillons. Nous utilisons les plateformes Ella Simple Plex Protein, MESO Sector 600MM, Ensight et Bio-Rad Luminex BioPlex 200 . Ces plateformes offrent une sensibilité , une spécificité et une rapidité exceptionnelles. En fait, elles réalisent des immunodosages multiplex pour jusqu’à 80 analytes dans un seul échantillon , ce qui nous permet d’analyser efficacement et facilement de grandes cohortes d’échantillons. En savoir plus sur les services d'immunoessais que nous proposons Quanterix™ : technologies SIMOA® Nos services utilisent les plateformes Quanterix™ SP-X et SR-X afin d’offrir une approche très sensible et fiable pour détecter et quantifier les biomarqueurs protéiques dans différents types d’échantillons, avec la capacité de mesurer les protéines à faible abondance qui sont souvent manquées par d’autres méthodes d’immunodosage traditionnelles. En savoir plus sur les services Quanterix™ que nous proposons Olink® technology Nous utilisons les plateformes Olink® Explore, Target et Flex pour fournir une analyse hautement multiplexée des biomarqueurs protéiques pour une large gamme de types d’échantillons. Grâce à ces technologies, nous pouvons passer d’une analyse exploratoire à une quantification absolue en personnalisant les panels. Les plateformes Olink® nous permettent de mesurer simultanément dans un seul échantillon jusqu’à 1 248 (Target) ou 3072 (Explore) protéines . En savoir plus sur les services Olink® que nous proposons Notre service de protéomique s’engage à vous fournir des résultats de la plus haute qualité et à vous offrir une assistance à la clientèle. Contactez nous dès maintenant pour discuter de vos besoins en matière de recherche et de la manière dont nous pouvons vous aider à atteindre vos objectifs de recherche. CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/services/proteomique/olink-identification-de-proteines-a-grande-echelle/
Identification de protéines à grande échelle | Technologie Olink | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Identification de protéines à grande échelle Notre service s'appuie sur les panels Olink® Explore, Target et Flex, qui fournissent une vue d'ensemble des niveaux d'expression des protéines dans les échantillons biologiques. Firalis Molecular Precision se positionne comme un prestataire certifié pour la technologie Olink® et le premier prestataire habilité en France. Technologie Olink® La technologie Olink® permet d’étudier l’expression des protéines et d’acquérir une compréhension approfondie des processus biologiques. Notre service dispose de trois panels Olink® différents : Olink® Explore et Explore HT, Olink® Target (96 et 48) et Olink® Flex . La détection des protéines est réalisée par Proximity Extended Assay (PEA), une approche sensible et à haut débit. En PEA, des paires d’anticorps marqués par des oligonucléotides sont utilisées pour capturer et détecter les protéines cibles, et la proximité des anticorps conduit à la formation d’un amplicon d’ADN qui peut être quantifié par qPCR ou par séquençage de nouvelle génération (NGS). Principe du Proximity Extended Assay (PEA) En savoir plus sur la technologie PEA Panel Olink® Explore Cette plateforme de découverte de biomarqueurs protéiques à haut débit, utilisant la technologie PEA d’Olink® et la lecture NGS sur les appareils Illumina®, permet de mesurer finement des milliers de protéines plasmatiques humaines avec un volume d’échantillon minimal. L’Olink® Explore 3072 donne accès à la librairie protéique complète d’Olink® d’environ 3000 tests, convenant aux études protéomiques exploratoires et multi-omiques. Pour les projets plus spécialisés, il est possible de choisir un ou plusieurs des huit panels Explore 384-plex de la librairie Explore 3072. 3072 cibles testées à travers 8 kits 384-plex (sélection de panels personnalisable, de 1 à 8 panels) : Olink® Explore 384 Cardiométabolique & Cardiométabolique II Olink® Explore 384 Inflammation & Inflammation II Olink® Explore 384 Neurologie & Neurologie II Olink® Explore 384 Oncologie & Oncologie II En savoir plus sur le panel Olink® Explore Panel Olink® Explore HT Une avancée significative dans la protéomique de nouvelle génération La protéomique est essentielle pour la compréhension des pathologies et pour accélérer la détection de biomarqueurs protéiques. Avec le panel Olink® Explore HT, la solution pour la découverte de biomarqueurs protéiques à haut débit, nous sommes en mesure de mesurer plus de 5,400 biomarqueurs protéiques en seulement 2µl d’échantillon avec précision, rapidité et qualité, dévoilant le protéome humain de manière instantanée et fournissant des données plus complètes à nos clients. Nous contacter En savoir plus Panel Olink® Target Les panels Olink® Target 96 & 48 offrent des immunodosages multiplexés qui facilitent la découverte de biomarqueurs protéiques ciblés. En identifiant plusieurs protéines formant une signature, nous pouvons prendre des décisions plus éclairées et mieux avancer dans la recherche de biomarqueurs protéiques humains sans compromettre la qualité ou la performance des données. Cette approche est plus puissante et plus fiable que celle qui consiste à se concentrer sur une seule protéine. Les analyses protéomiques utilisant le panel Olink® Target 48 sont réalisées dans des conditions de BPLC. Olink® Target 96 Limite de détection inférieure au pg/mL avec seulement 1 µL d’échantillon par panel. 15 panels spécifiques à une pathologie avec plus de 1100 marqueurs. 92 biomarqueurs de protéines humaines mesurés simultanément, jusqu’à 88 échantillons dans un panel. 14 panels axés sur les pathologies humaines et 1 panel pour la recherche exploratoire sur les souris sont également proposés. Olink® Target 48 Mesure simultanée de 45 biomarqueurs protéiques humains associés à l’inflammation et reconnus. Nécessite seulement 1 µL d’échantillon. Les résultats sont rapportés en unités de concentration standard (pg/mL) ou en unités NPX. Olink® Target 48 Mouse Cytokine Permet de mesurer 43 biomarqueurs à partir de seulement 1 µL d’échantillon. Surveillance de l’inflammation et de la réponse immunitaire. Réalisation d’études longitudinales sur la même souris (plusieurs échantillons de sang), afin d’éviter d’expérimenter sur un grand nombre de souris. En savoir plus sur le panel Olink® Target 96 & 48 Panel Olink® Flex Olink® Flex est un outil personnalisable qui permet d’assembler un ensemble de biomarqueurs comprenant jusqu’à 21 protéines humaines. Ceci est rendu possible par la capacité de choisir parmi un pool d’environ 200 biomarqueurs protéiques pré-validés, qui peuvent être combinés de diverses manières. Les analyses protéomiques utilisant le panel Olink® Flex sont réalisées dans des conditions de BPLC. Librairie de tests modulable à la pointe du progrès. De 15 à 21 tests par panel, 40 échantillons par kit. Lecture en quantification absolue. 200 biomarqueurs protéiques axés sur l’inflammation. En savoir plus sur le panel Olink® Flex Pourquoi opter pour nos services d'identification de protéines via la technologie d'Olink® ? Diverses matrices biologiques Mesure dans des matrices biologiques variées : Sérum, plasma EDTA, plasma citrate, plasma héparine. Analyse hautement multiplexée des protéines Permettant de mesurer simultanément des centaines de protéines dans un seul échantillon et par conséquent, d’économiser du temps et de l’argent par rapport aux méthodes traditionnelles qui nécessitent des mesures séparées pour chaque protéine. Une équipe compétente Nos experts en protéomique ont une expérience et une connaissance approfondies des outils Olink® et s’engagent à vous fournir le meilleur service et un soutien sans faille tout au long de votre projet de recherche. Bénéficiez de notre expertise scientifique en protéomique et de plateformes de pointe au laboratoire pour faire avancer votre projet de recherche Prenez contact avec l'un de nos experts en protéomique CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/immunoessais-quantification-absolue-des-proteines/
https://resources.bio-techne.com/bio-techne-assets/docs/literature/simple-plex-ella-instrument.pdf?_ga=2.22432306.840408754.1682323520-792264242.1682323520&_gac=1.249840372.1682323520.CjwKCAjw0ZiiBhBKEiwA4PT9zx1Iqx3YpOnpezKIhSy9uu8bmbcQE5eL8CI9-4xG02SPLTAy3nt_choCW-sQAvD_BwE&_gl=1*1f4f5nl*_ga*NzkyMjY0MjQyLjE2ODIzMjM1MjA.*_ga_CYEWFH8CXG*MTY4MjMyMzUyMC4xLjAuMTY4MjMyMzUyMC42MC4wLjA.
Immunoassays Ella Precision Multiplexing Made Simple2 Introducing A benchtop automated  ELISA platform for consistent  biomarker detection Immunoassays come with many challenges. Even after hours  spent in the lab performing manual reagent additions and  analyzing data, results are often inconsistent and unreliable. The automated Ella™ platform brings a higher level of  precision and minimal training, increasing your productivity  in the lab. Utilizing a unique microfluidic cartridge design, the  Ella platform’s Simple Plex™ assays are fast, hands-free,  reproducible, and available for plexing up to 8 analytes. Ella online   |  bio-techne.com/ instruments/simple-plexElla Automation minimizes user error Large dynamic range Precise, reproducible results Easily transfer to another site Factory-generated standard curves Fits on your benchtop3 Automated instrument Once the immunoassay run is initiated, Ella proceeds from  start to finish without the need for manual intervention.  Ella  pneumatically interfaces with the Simple Plex assay cartridge  to perform all reagent additions, wash steps, and incubations  under precisely controlled conditions. Cartridge using   microfluidic technology Ella performs immunoassays inside a consumable  microfluidic Simple Plex assay cartridge. Similar to a  pre-kitted ELISA, all reagents including matched antibody  pairs have been validated. But with Ella, the reagents are  pre-loaded onto a cartridge for ease of use. No standard curve preparation is needed. Running an assay  simply requires adding diluted samples and wash buffer  to the cartridge before placing the cartridge inside the Ella  instrument. Inside each fluidic channel are multiple glass nanoreactors  (GNRs) coated with capture antibody, providing built-in  replicate measurements for each analyte.  With preloaded  factory-calibrated standard curves, fully analyzed data is  available in less than 90 minutes. 3How the Ella platform works Coated with  capture   antibody3 GNRsIFN  gammaTFN   alpha IL-6Fluor SampleIL-8 Running  BufferWaste 4Less work,   more flow. Hands-off, automated   immunoassays In the race to discovery, there’s no time to lose. The  Ella platform eliminates the tedious setup and lengthy  incubations typical of traditional plate-based immunoassays.  The automated microfluidic cartridge design minimizes user  error while ensuring highly precise and reproducible results  across multiple users and sites. Explore solutions bio-techne.com/reagents/simple-plex-immunoassaysMultiplex without   cross-reactivity Traditional multiplex assays can be prone to cross-reactivity  and interference resulting in sub-par or erroneous data. The  Ella platform eliminates these issues by separating targets  into four parallel channels for a maximum of only two assays  being carried out in a common environment. Create your  own multiplex panel of up to 8 analytes from a validated list  of 250+ targets with flexible cartridge options. Review fully  analyzed results475 min Place cartridge   in Ella and  process run315 min Scan barcode1 Add sample   Add wash buffer25More data from   smaller samples  Whatever your area of research, getting the most data  possible from your samples is critical. Simple Plex assay  cartridges with up to 8 multiplexed assays are available,  offering replicate results all from just 25 µL of sample. Each  sample loaded onto the cartridge is assayed in replicate  GNRs automatically, eliminating the need to load technical  replicates on the cartridge. 2.5 to   25µL 50µL 3X triplicate results   per sampleof sample of diluted  sample High sensitivity with   sub-picogram level detection  Ella assays use a fluorescent detection system to deliver  excellent low-end sensitivity to detect low expressing  proteins and provide a broad dynamic range. This allows  samples containing high and low abundance of analyte to  be assayed at a common dilution, reducing the need to rerun  samples or perform dilution series. Testing across 3 sites, 11 users and 9 Ella instruments. 4 different assays were  processed for CCL2, IL-6, TNF alpha and VEGF-A. Eight unique serum  samples with 2 controls for a total of 704. Superior reproducibility Achieving immunoassay reproducibility with traditional  ELISAs and multiplexing platforms can be challenging due  to the multiple manual steps and increased opportunity for  error. The Ella platform’s hands-free automation eliminates  these sources of variability to deliver exceptional precision  and accuracy. When the time comes to transfer or expand your study to  other labs or a contract research organization, the benchtop  automation makes it easy. The simple load-and-go workflow,  built in standard curves, and precisely controlled automation  help ensure consistent results no matter the lab, instrument,  or operator.6 6Cartridges Therapeutic areas Ella assay menu of 250+ validated targets span application  areas for pre-clinical, clinical research, trials, monitoring to  bio-therapeutic manufacturing.   • Cell and Gene Therapy • Bioprocessing • Neuroscience • Cancer • Immunology Powered by R&D Systems Developed by R&D Systems, manufacturer of the gold  standard Quantikine ™ family of ELISAs, Simple Plex  assays feature top quality antibody and protein reagents for  consistent and accurate biomarker detection.  Whether you’re simply looking for the highest quality  immunoassay solution, or are a traditional ELISA user  looking to reap the benefits of automation, the Ella platform  delivers data you can trust from a brand you know. Scan barcode on cartridge to access the calibration  curve associated with your assay.Ella 0.1 11 0 100 10001 000010100100010000 1 0.1Signal (RFU) Concentr ation (pg/mL)ULOQ LLOQ7 7Flexible  Cartridge  Format  Options Use your own   reagents Up to 48 samples 1 Assay 3 Replicates 48xDIG Design Your Own Fast + scalable Up to 72 samples 1 Assay 3 Replicates 72x1 Single PlexUp to 8 assays for  higher plexing Up to 32 samples 8 Assay 2 Replicates 32x8 Multiplex Up to 4 assays in  separate channels Up to 32 samples 4 Assay 3 Replicates 16x4 32x4Global   info@bio-techne.com   bio-techne.com/find-us/distributors    North America   TEL 800 343 7475   Europe | Middle East | Africa   TEL +44 (0)1235 529449   China   info.cn@bio-techne.com   TEL +86 (21) 52380373 For research use or manufacturing purposes only. Trademarks and registered  trademarks are the property of their respective owners.Bio-Techne®   |  R&D Systems™    Novus Biologicals™    Tocris Bioscience™    ProteinSimple™    ACD™     ExosomeDx™     Asuragen®  Contact UsWhere  Science   Intersects  Innovation™STRY0309436_IBU_BR_Ella Spring 2023_CZ


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/immunoessais-quantification-absolue-des-proteines/
Quantification absolue | Biomarqueurs | Immunoessais multiplexés We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Quantification absolue de biomarqueurs Des plateformes et une expertise scientifique contribuant à l'évolution de divers domaines thérapeutiques, en proposant des analyses de cytokines, de biomarqueurs de substitution et la validation de biomarqueurs. NOTRE PORTEFEUILLE DE SERVICES Bio-Rad® Luminex Bio-Plex 200 Le Luminex Bio-Plex 200 de Bio-Rad est un système de test immunologique multiplexé permettant de détecter jusqu’à 100 analytes dans un seul échantillon de faible volume avec une haute sensibilité (pg/ml). Cette plateforme offre une spécificité élevée, ce qui la rend adaptée aux études de biomarqueurs à grande échelle et à l’analyse ciblée des protéines. En savoir plus sur la plateforme Luminex Bio-Plex 200 MSD MESO Sector 600MM Le MESO Sector 600MM, imageur de plaques ultra-sensible à grande capacité et détection ECL, est un système de test immunologique multiplexé qui garantit des performances analytiques optimales. Jusqu’à 10 analytes par puits peuvent être analysés, avec une limite de détection de l’ordre du pg/ml. Cette plateforme offre une sensibilité élevée et une large gamme de tests, ce qui la rend idéale pour la découverte de biomarqueurs et les études de validation. En savoir plus sur la plateforme MESO S 600MM Simple Plex Ella ProteinSimple Ella est une plateforme ELISA entièrement automatisée qui permet l’ analyse multiplexée et multi-analytes des protéines, jusqu’à 8 analytes simultanément en moins de 90 minutes. Elle offre une excellente sensibilité et une grande précision, permettant la détection de biomarqueurs peu abondants dans une variété de types d’échantillons. En savoir plus sur la plateforme ProteinSimple™ Ella ELISA Ensight ELISA ENSIGHT est un lecteur de plaques multimode puissant et polyvalent conçu pour simplifier la mesure d’essais biochimiques. Équipé d’un ensemble de fonctions de pointe, il offre des performances et une précision exceptionnelles. Que vous réalisiez des tests ELISA ou des dosages avec la technologie alphascreen, ce lecteur de plaques est la solution idéale pour vos besoins en matière de recherche. En savoir plus sur la plateforme ELISA Ensight NOTRE CHAMP D'ANALYSES Principe Débit de l’échantillon Vitesse d’analyse Sensibilité Simple Plex Ella Essai immunologique basé sur une cartouche microfluidique Jusqu’à 32-72 échantillons 90 minutes pour un maximum de 8 cibles Jusqu’au Femtogramme/mL MESO Sector 600MM Test immunologique par électrochimiluminescence Jusqu’à 40 échantillons en duplicata 4-5 heures pour un essai Jusqu’au Sub-picogramme/mL Bio-Rad Luminex Bioplex 200 Essai immunologique multiplex à base de billes Jusqu’à 40 échantillons en duplicata 4-5 heures pour un essai Jusqu’au Sub-picogramme/mL ELISA Ensight Enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA) Jusqu’à 40 échantillons en duplicata 4-5 heures pour un essai Jusqu’au Picogramme/mL Pourquoi opter pour notre service de détection de biomarqueurs à grande échelle ? Résultats de haute qualité Notre technologie est à la pointe du progrès et nous n’utilisons que des réactifs et des équipements de la plus haute qualité afin de vous garantir les résultats les plus précis et les plus fiables. Une équipe compétente Notre équipe possède une grande expérience dans le domaine de la protéomique et de l’analyse des données. Nous nous engageons à vous fournir le meilleur service et le meilleur soutien tout au long de votre projet. Délai d'exécution rapide Les délais sont cruciaux lorsqu’il s’agit de projets de recherche. C’est pourquoi nous nous efforçons de vous fournir des délais d’exécution rapides tout en respectant les exigences de qualité. Services sur-mesure Chaque projet de recherche est unique. C’est pourquoi nous proposons des solutions personnalisées adaptées à vos besoins spécifiques, de la préparation des échantillons à l’analyse des données. Bénéficiez de notre expertise scientifique, de notre environnement de qualité et de nos plateformes de pointe au laboratoire pour votre projet de recherche Contactez un de nos experts en protéomique CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/spectrometrie-de-masse/
Spectrométrie de Masse | Analyse, quantification & caractérisation | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Services de dosage par spectrométrie de masse Une gamme de services d'identification de petites molécules pour soutenir votre recherche. Nos services Services de lipido-métabolomique Notre équipe utilise les technologies de pointe de la spectrométrie de masse (MS) pour identifier et quantifier les mélanges de lipides et de métabolites avec une sensibilité et une précision élevées. Nos services comprennent la préparation des échantillons, l’analyse, l’interprétation et l’analyse des données, ainsi qu’un rapport complet des résultats, le tout dans un protocole personnalisé qui répond à vos besoins spécifiques en recherche. En savoir plus sur nos services de lipido-métabolomique Services de spectrométrie de masse pour la R&D Les composés inconnus de petite taille, tels que les métabolites, les produits naturels et les composés synthétiques présents dans vos échantillons sont identifiés et analysés avec précision par notre équipe. Nos services comprennent la préparation des échantillons, le développement de méthodes, l’interprétation et l’analyse des données, ainsi qu’un rapport complet des résultats. En savoir plus sur nos services de SM pour la R&D Avec nos services de dosage de spectrométrie de masse, nous nous engageons à vous fournir des résultats de la plus haute qualité et à vous offrir une assistance complète. Demander un devis CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/lipidomique-metabolomique/
Quantification de métabolites et lipides | Kit AbsolutelDQ p400 HR | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Services de lipido-métabolomique Nous sommes certifiés pour l'utilisation du kit AbsoluteIDQ® p400 HR de Biocrates, une solution de pointe pour l'analyse métabolomique. Notre équipe se spécialise dans la quantification et l’identification avec précision de petites molécules dans divers échantillons biologiques, en tirant parti des capacités avancées du kit AbsoluteIDQ® p400 HR de Biocrates. Notre expertise couvre la détection et la quantification des métabolites et des lipides dans diverses matrices biologiques, y compris le sérum, le plasma, le LCR, l’urine et la salive, en utilisant des protocoles d’extraction personnalisés pour obtenir des résultats optimaux. Le kit AbsoluteIDQ® p400 HR de Biocrates permet la détection et la quantification de 407 métabolites dans des volumes d’échantillons aussi faibles que 10µL, y compris 21 acides aminés, 21 amines biogènes, 1 hydrate de carbone, 55 carnitines (acyl), 24 lysophosphatidylcholines, 172 phosphatidylcholines, 31 sphingomyélines, 9 céramides, 14 esters de cholestérol, 18 diglycérides et 42 triglycérides. En savoir plus sur le kit AbsoluteIDQ® p400 HR Une gamme complète de services utilisant le kit AbsoluteIDQ® p400 HR de Biocrates. Découverte de biomarqueurs Identification de biomarqueurs potentiels pour diverses pathologies en utilisant l’analyse métabolomique. Découverte de médicaments Développement de nouveaux médicaments en identifiant des cibles potentielles et en évaluant l’efficacité des médicaments via l’analyse métabolomique. Études toxicologiques Analyse des changements métabolomiques en réponse à diverses toxines et aide à l’identification de mécanismes toxicologiques potentiels. Études nutritionnelles Évaluation des effets de différents régimes et interventions nutritionnelles sur les voies métaboliques via l’analyse métabolomique. Prenez contact avec un de nos experts si l'un des services que nous proposons correspond à vos besoins de recherche. Pourquoi opter pour nos services de lipido-métabolomique ? Diverses matrices Quantification dans plusieurs matrices biologiques telles que le sérum, le plasma, le LCR, l’urine, la salive avec des protocoles adaptés. Solutions sur-mesure Chaque projet de recherche est unique. C’est pourquoi nous proposons des solutions personnalisées adaptées à vos besoins spécifiques, de l’analyse des échantillons à l’analyse des données. Équipe qualifiée Notre équipe possède une vaste expérience dans l’analyse lipidomique et métabolomique et s’engage à vous fournir le soutien dont vous avez besoin tout au long de votre projet. Délai d'exécution rapide Le temps est un facteur critique lorsqu’il s’agit de projets de recherche. C’est pourquoi nous nous efforçons de vous fournir des délais d’exécution rapides sans compromettre la qualité. Contactez-nous pour en savoir plus sur nos services de lipido-métabolomique et sur la manière dont nous pouvons vous aider à atteindre vos objectifs de recherche. CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/spectrometrie-de-masse-pour-la-rd-sur-mesure/
Spectrométrie de masse pour la R&D | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Notre service de spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Nous sommes spécialisés dans l’analyse, la quantification et la caractérisation des APIs , des oligosaccharides et des petits produits chimiques synthétiques , même dans les matrices les plus complexes telles que les matrices à forte teneur en matières grasses. Nous sommes en mesure de vous aider à répondre à vos besoins en matière de R&D, en vous fournissant des résultats de haute qualité grâce à une méthodologie entièrement personnalisée tout au long de votre projet. Service de caractérisation moléculaire Notre service de spectrométrie de masse propose la caractérisation et l’identification de produits chimiques avec deux spectromètres de masse ( TSQ™ 9000 et Orbitrap Q Exactive™ ). Grâce à notre base de données interne unique, nous pouvons fournir à nos clients des informations précieuses sur des problématiques spécifiques : Identification des impuretés dans votre processus Dépistage des impuretés dans l’API Détermination des substances extractibles (extractables)* et relargables (leachables)**. Identification des résidus de pesticides et de médicaments (plus de 800 disponibles et plus sur demande) *Extractibles (Extractables) sont des composés qui peuvent être extraits des composants élastomères, plastiques ou de revêtement du récipient et du système de fermeture en présence d’un solvant approprié. **Relargables (Leachables) sont des composés qui s’échappent des composants en plastique élastomère ou de revêtement du récipient et du système de fermeture à la suite d’un contact direct avec la formulation du produit pharmaceutique. Service de développement et de validation de méthodes de spectrométrie de masse Nos services de développement et de validation de méthodes analytiques en spectrométrie de masse sont conçus pour garantir les meilleures performances de votre méthode. Notre équipe utilise un équipement et des techniques de pointe pour développer et valider des méthodes pour une variété d’applications, dans les domaines pharmaceutique, biologique et des dispositifs médicaux. Nos services peuvent inclure : Services de bibliographie Développement et validation de méthodes (ICH Q2 / Q10) Évaluation de la stabilité Détermination LOG(P) / LOGkow Tests analytiques et dépannage. Nous nous engageons à fournir des solutions de haute qualité, fiables et rentables à nos clients, en les aidant à atteindre leurs objectifs et à garantir la sécurité et l’efficacité de leurs produits. Notre champ analytique x Type Instrument Gamme de masse Précision de la masse Sensibilité Source d’ionisation Mode balayage Applications Thermo Scientific Q Exactive™ and Q Exactive Focus™ systems Spectromètre de masse précis à haute résolution m/z 50-6,000 ±1 ppm Faible teneur en picogrammes Heated Electrospeay Ionization (HESI) Analyse complète, MS/MS ciblée, MS/MS en fonction des données Protéomique, métabolomique, lipidomique, analyse alimentaire et environnementale Thermo Scientific TSQ™ 9000 Triple Quadrupole system Spectromètre de masse à triple quadripôle m/z 10-2,000 ±0.1-0.5 Da Faible teneur en femtogrammes Advanced Electron Ionization (AEI) SRM, MRM, SIM Analyse quantitative, découverte et développement de médicaments, recherche clinique Pourquoi opter pour nos services de SM sur mesure pour la R&D ? Haute qualité Nos technologies sont à la pointe du progrès et nous n’utilisons que des réactifs et des équipements de la plus haute qualité afin de vous garantir les résultats les plus précis et les plus fiables. Prix compétitifs Nous offrons nos services à un prix compétitif sans compromettre la qualité, car nous comprenons l’importance de ce facteur dans tout projet de recherche. Équipe compétente Notre équipe d’experts possède une vaste expérience dans l’identification de petites molécules. Nous nous engageons à vous fournir le meilleur service et le meilleur soutien tout au long de votre projet. Délai d'exécution rapide Nous nous efforçons de vous fournir des délais d’exécution rapides car nous comprenons que le temps est un facteur critique lorsqu’il s’agit de projets de recherche. Solutions sur mesure Nous savons que chaque projet de recherche est unique. C’est pourquoi nous proposons des solutions personnalisées adaptées à vos besoins spécifiques, de l’analyse d’échantillons au développement de méthodes. Nos services d’identification de petites molécules sont conçus pour fournir des services analytiques de haute qualité aux chercheurs, aux sociétés pharmaceutiques et aux institutions académiques. Contactez-nous dès maintenant pour en savoir plus sur nos services et sur la manière dont nous pouvons vous aider à atteindre vos objectifs de recherche. Vous souhaitez en savoir plus sur nos autres services d'analyse SM ? Cliquez ici ! CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/science-des-donnees/
Bio-informatique et biostatistiques | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Exploitation des données Home Exploitation des données Nos services de bio-informatique et de biostatistiques Nous fournissons des services de bio-informatique et de biostatistiques pour tous les types de données multi-omiques, telles que RNA-seq, scRNA-seq, DNA-seq, et plus encore. Grâce à notre expertise en calcul haute performance , nous pouvons vous aider à analyser et à interpréter vos données omiques rapidement et avec précision. Notre contribution à votre réussite Analyse bio-informatique Nos services de bio-informatique comprennent l’analyse de diverses données – omiques, y compris la génomique, la transcriptomique, la protéomique et la métabolomique. Nous utilisons des outils et des techniques de pointe pour traiter et analyser des ensembles de données vastes et complexes , afin de vous aider à comprendre les mécanismes biologiques sous-jacents à vos données. Nos services bioinformatiques comprennent : Analyse de séquences Analyse de l’expression génétique Analyse du Pathway Analyse des variants Annotation Visualisation des données Nous proposons des analyses primaires et secondaires automatisées pour traiter rapidement et précisément vos données omiques. Nos pipelines automatisés peuvent prendre en charge des tâches telles que le contrôle de la qualité, l’alignement des lectures et la quantification de l’expression génique, ce qui vous permet de consacrer plus de temps à des analyses plus approfondies. Nous proposons également des analyses tertiaires sur mesure vous permettant de mieux cerner vos données omiques. Notre équipe collaborera avec vous pour développer des pipelines d’analyse adaptés à vos questions et objectifs de recherche spécifiques. Détails sur les services Génomique : Séquençage du génome entier (WGS)/Séquençage de l’exome entier (WES) Détection des polymorphismes nucléaires simples (SNP) somatiques et germinaux et des insertions/délétions de bases (Indels) Analyse des fusions de gènes Études d’association à l’échelle du génome (GWAS) sur de grandes cohortes Épigénomique : Méthylome Identification des sites de méthylation Détection des bases de cytosine différentiellement méthylées Identification des régions de liaison aux protéines Transcriptomique : Analyse de l’ARN, résultats de la RT-qPCR Analyse des ARN non codants : panels de lncRNA (kits propriétaires NeuroLINCs et Fimics) ou de miRNA (kit HTG EdgeSeq WTA), et d’ARNm codants (kit propriétaire BIOPRED) Analyse des voies/termes de l’ontologie du gène (GO) Analyse de l’expression génétique différentielle Identification de nouveaux transcrits scRNA-seq : de la plateforme 10X Genomics Caractérisation des sous-types et de l’abondance des cellules Caractérisation des types de cellules peu communs Identification de biomarqueurs cellulaires Transcriptomique spatiale : Analyse des données d’imagerie et de transcriptomique sur le logiciel MERSCOPE Vizualizer Clustering et détection de types cellulaires Découverte de biomarqueurs ARN Localisation spatiale des types de cellules Analyse de premier niveau des données omiques : Données brutes Assurance de la qualité/contrôle de la qualité (AQ/CQ) Alignement/pseudo-alignement sur la référence choisie QA/QC après l’alignement Génération de matrices de comptages bruts et normalisés Analyse personnalisée des données omiques en fonction de questions biologiques ou cliniques Soutien à la conception expérimentale, en accord avec les questions biologiques Développement de logiciels personnalisés et de pipelines (R, python, NextFlow) Consultation sur divers projets R&D Omics Calcul Haute Performance (CHP/HPC) Notre infrastructure calcul haute performance fournit la puissance de calcul nécessaire à l’analyse d’ensembles de données omiques à grande échelle, ce qui nous permet de traiter et d’analyser vos données de manière rapide et efficace. Grâce à nos ressources informatiques de pointe, nous sommes en mesure de traiter les projets bio-informatiques les plus complexes. Pourquoi opter pour nos services de bio-informatique et de biostatistiques ? Performances de haute qualité Nous respectons des procédures strictes de contrôles de qualité afin de garantir la précision et la fiabilité de nos analyses. Une équipe compétente Notre équipe d’experts en bioinformatique dispose d’une solide expérience dans l’analyse d’un large éventail de données omiques. Confidentialité Nous prenons toutes les mesures nécessaires pour garantir la sécurité et la protection de vos données. Des solutions sur mesure Chaque projet est unique, c’est pour cela que nous adaptons nos services pour répondre à vos besoins spécifiques. Nous travaillons en étroite collaboration avec vous pour nous assurer que notre analyse et notre interprétation sont pertinentes par rapport à votre problématique de recherche. Notre équipe possède l’expertise et le savoir-faire nécessaires pour vous aider à donner un sens à vos données omiques. Nous pouvons vous fournir les outils et les ressources dont vous avez besoin pour atteindre vos objectifs de recherche. Contactez-nous dès maintenant pour en savoir plus sur la contribution que nous pouvons apporter à vos projets bioinformatiques. Autres services que nous proposons CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/services/developpement-dessais-production/developpement-dessais/
Développement d'essais | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Développement d’essais Nos services de développement d'essais Nos services de développement d’essais sont conçus pour répondre à vos objectifs de recherche spécifiques. Du développement d’immunoessais à la caractérisation cinétique des interactions moléculaires via la technologie de pointe Bio-Layer Interferometry (BLI) , nous offrons une large gamme de services pour répondre à vos besoins. Notre contribution à votre réussite Développement d'immunoessais Notre société propose le développement d’immunoessais pour des tests très sensibles et reproductibles qui sont rigoureusement validés pour des applications de recherche uniquement (RUO) et de diagnostic in vitro (IVD) . Nos services de développement d’immunoessais comprennent le développement d’essais ELISA (Enzyme-Linked ImmunoSorbent Assay) avec l’option supplémentaire du multiplexage , qui permet la détection simultanée de plusieurs cibles dans un seul échantillon. Nos services de développement d’essais comprennent: Conception et optimisation des essais : Nous travaillons en étroite collaboration avec vous pour mettre au point un essai qui réponde à vos besoins et offre une sensibilité, une spécificité et une reproductibilité optimales. Sélection d’anticorps : Nous vous offrons la possibilité d’utiliser vos propres analytes et votre propre bibliothèque d’anticorps, ou nous pouvons les produire pour vous. Nous sélectionnons avec soin la combinaison d’anticorps la plus optimale pour votre essai. Validation des essais : Chaque essai fait l’objet d’une validation approfondie afin de garantir son exactitude, sa précision et sa fiabilité. Contrôle de qualité personnalisé : Nous déterminons la meilleure gamme étalon, la dilution minimale requise (DMR) et les contrôles clés pour l’essai. Assistance technique : Notre équipe fournit une assistance technique complète et des conseils tout au long du processus de développement et après l’achèvement de l’essai. Personnalisation : Nous proposons des services de développement d’essais personnalisés pour répondre à vos besoins et exigences uniques. Caractérisation cinétique avec la technologie BLI (Bio-Layer Interferometry) Notre technologie BLI (Bio-Layer Interferometry) permet de réaliser la caractérisation des interactions moléculaires , la caractérisation des interactions avec les anticorps , la quantification des protéines et la caractérisation des interactions protéine-protéine . Grâce à cette technologie, nous pouvons mesurer la cinétique de liaison, l’affinité et la spécificité des molécules, ainsi que déterminer la concentration des protéines en solution. Nos services comprennent le développement, l’optimisation et la validation d’essais pour vos besoins spécifiques. Principaux avantages du système Octet BLI : Débit plus élevé (jusqu’à 96 échantillons). Analyse en temps réel Analytes sans étiquette Analyse automatisée Compatibilité avec les échantillons bruts : les analytes peuvent être mesurés dans des matrices brutes telles que le surnageant cellulaire ou les lysats. Pourquoi opter pour nos services de développement d'essais ? Solutions sur mesure Nous savons que chaque projet de recherche est unique. C’est pourquoi nous adaptons le processus à vos besoins. Haute qualité Nous prenons la qualité au sérieux et nous veillons à ce que tous nos services soient fournis selon les normes de qualité les plus élevées. Nous effectuons un contrôle de qualité rigoureux à chaque étape du développement afin de nous assurer que le produit final répond à vos attentes. Équipe expérimentée Notre équipe d’experts possède une vaste expérience en matière de production et de développement d’essais. Nous fournissons une assistance tout au long du processus afin d’assurer la réussite du projet. Des prix compétitifs Nous proposons des prix compétitifs pour notre service de production afin de permettre un large accès à des essais de haute qualité. Notre équipe de scientifiques et de techniciens expérimentés se consacre à fournir des services de développement d’essais de haute qualité qui répondent à vos exigences spécifiques. Contactez-nous dès aujourd’hui pour en savoir plus sur nos services et sur la manière dont nous pouvons vous aider à atteindre vos objectifs de recherche. En savoir plus sur nos autres services Développement d'essais/Production CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/production-de-kits-sur-mesure/
Production de kits sur mesure | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Production de kits sur mesure Nos services de production de kits sur mesure Chez Firalis Molecular Precision, nous excellons dans la production de kits de diagnostic personnalisés de haute qualité, grâce à notre process certifié ISO 13485 . Nos services comprennent la production de kits ELISA , de biochimie et de biologie moléculaire sur mesure . Collaboration personnalisée soit de bout en bout soit à chaque étape du développement, de la certification et de la production de kits in vitro Services de production de kits ELISA Nous offrons une solution intégrale pour le développement de kits ELISA (Enzyme-Linked Immunosorbent Assay) sur mesure. Nous travaillons en étroite collaboration avec vous pour industrialiser la production conformément à la norme ISO 13485 , en adaptant les kits à vos besoins spécifiques. Que ce soit pour la détection de biomarqueurs, le diagnostic de maladies ou le dépistage de médicaments , les kits ELISA personnalisés que nous produisons permettent une détection robuste et sensible de l’analyte cible. Pour découvrir nos services de développement d'essais Cliquez ici Pour en savoir plus sur nos services de production de kits ELISA Merci de nous contacter Services de production de kits de biologie moléculaire à façon Nous fournissons également des services de production et d’industrialisation de kits de biologie moléculaire sur mesure, conformes à la norme ISO 13485 , pour des applications de réaction en chaîne de la polymérase quantitative (qPCR) et de séquençage de cibles (NGS). Les kits que nous produisons permettent une détection précise et sensible des acides nucléiques , adaptée à l’analyse de l’expression des gènes, au génotypage des SNP et à l’identification des pathogènes. Pour l’application de vos kits, profitez de nos technologies pionnières en biologie moléculaire, notamment le séquençage du génome entier, le séquençage ciblé, la métagénomique et la transcriptomique. Pour découvrir nos services de séquençage Cliquez ici Pour découvrir nos services de qPCR Cliquez ici Pour en savoir plus sur nos services de production de kits de Biologie Moleculaire Merci de nous contacter Pourquoi opter pour nos services de production de kits sur mesure ? Solutions personnalisées Chaque projet de recherche est unique, nous en sommes conscients. C’est pourquoi nous adaptons le processus à vos besoins. Haute qualité Nous prenons la qualité au sérieux et c’est pourquoi nous effectuons un contrôle de qualité rigoureux à chaque étape du processus de production du kit afin de nous assurer que le produit final répond à vos attentes et que tous nos services sont fournis selon les normes de qualité les plus élevées. Une équipe compétente Notre équipe a une solide expérience de la production de kits et est prête à fournir une assistance tout au long du processus afin de garantir la réussite du projet. Prix compétitifs Nous proposons des prix compétitifs pour notre service de production de kits afin de permettre un large accès à des kits de biologie moléculaire et d’immunoessais personnalisés de haute qualité. Norme de qualité Certifiés ISO 13485 : Nous avons obtenu la certification ISO 13485, ce qui témoigne de notre engagement à industrialiser et à produire des kits de diagnostic dans le cadre de systèmes de gestion de la qualité très stricts. Nous adhérons aux normes les plus strictes en matière de contrôle de la qualité et suivons des protocoles rigoureux pour garantir la précision, la fiabilité et la reproductibilité des kits que nous développons. En respectant ces normes, nous donnons à nos clients l’assurance que nos kits sont fiables et dignes de confiance pour leurs besoins de diagnostic. Notre équipe travaillera en étroite collaboration avec vous tout au long du processus, depuis la conception initiale et l’évaluation de la faisabilité jusqu’à la fabrication du kit et au contrôle de la qualité. Nous accordons une grande importance à votre contribution et nous nous efforçons de répondre à vos besoins spécifiques afin de garantir un partenariat fructueux. Si vous êtes intéressé par nos services de production de kits de diagnostic in vitro personnalisés ou si vous avez des questions, n’hésitez pas à nous contacter . Retour à la présentation de nos services de ASD et Production CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/services-de-production-de-materiel-biologique/
Production de matériel biologique​ | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Production de matériel biologique​ Home Production de matériel biologique​ Notre service de production de matériel biologique Chez Firalis Molecular Precision, nous sommes spécialisés dans la fourniture de services de production de matériel biologique de haute qualité à des clients universitaires et industriels. Nos services comprennent le développement de lignes cellulaires personnalisées, la production de protéines recombinantes, la production d’anticorps, etc. Nos services pour vous aider à réussir Développement de lignées cellulaires sur mesure Nous proposons des services de développement de lignées cellulaires sur mesure, adaptés à vos besoins spécifiques. Notre équipe d’experts possède une vaste expérience dans la création de lignées cellulaires stables à l’aide de diverses techniques de transfection. Les lignées cellulaires développées ont diverses applications, telles que l’édition de gènes, le criblage à haut débit et l’expression de protéines. Production de protéines recombinantes Toutes les protéines ne sont pas disponibles dans le commerce et la production de protéines sur mesure peut s’avérer complexe. Pour produire des protéines de haute qualité pour votre recherche à un prix raisonnable, envisagez de faire appel à notre service de production de protéines recombinantes. Nous disposons d’une expertise dans divers systèmes d’expression, y compris les cellules bactériennes et mammaliennes. Notre équipe peut produire des protéines en petites quantités pour des recherches préliminaires ou en grandes quantités pour des applications à l’échelle industrielle. Pour garantir la bonne qualité des protéines produites et purifiées, nous procédons à une caractérisation par western blot. Production d'anticorps Dès réception de vos lignées cellulaires, nous sommes en mesure de vous accompagner tout au long du processus de génération d’anticorps : production, purification et caractérisation . En fait, nous fournissons une solution complète pour générer des anticorps monoclonaux et polyclonaux de haute affinité qui reconnaissent spécifiquement votre cible d’intérêt en utilisant des systèmes eucaryotes. Un service adaptable à votre projet Nous vous apportons notre expertise pour choisir la meilleure stratégie et vous accompagner tout au long de votre projet : Choisir le système d’expression le mieux adapté à votre projet (bactéries ou mammifères) Conception du vecteur d’expression Sélectionner la lignée cellulaire (transfection transitoire ou lignée cellulaire stable) Purifiez votre protéine d’intérêt. Un process l'échelle de vos besoins FMP traite une large gamme d’outils de culture cellulaire qui répondent à vos besoins, allant de la production à petite échelle dans des flacons de culture cellulaire, à la production transitoire mais robuste dans Expi293™ Expression System jusqu’à la production à grande échelle en utilisant le bioréacteur à fibres creuses Fibercell Systems Inc . Nous pouvons également produire et purifier des anticorps à partir de cultures cellulaires d’hybridomes déjà existantes. Purification des protéines/anticorps Nos services de purification des protéines utilisent des équipements et des techniques de pointe pour fournir des protéines pures de haute qualité pour vos besoins de recherche. Nous utilisons le système de purification des protéines AKTA pure , qui permet une séparation précise et efficace des protéines à l’aide de diverses méthodes de chromatographie. En outre, nous proposons des colonnes de purification d’anticorps HiTrap Protein A ou G HP , qui offrent une spécificité et une sélectivité élevées pour la purification des anticorps. Notre équipe de scientifiques expérimentés travaillera en étroite collaboration avec vous pour déterminer la meilleure approche pour vos besoins en matière de purification de protéines et s’assurera que le produit final répond à vos spécifications. Grâce à nos services fiables et efficaces, vous pouvez nous faire confiance pour vous fournir les protéines pures dont vous avez besoin pour votre R&D. Le stockage à long terme des protéines peut être un problème, et la lyophilisation peut être une solution. Ainsi, en plus de fournir un service de purification, FMP peut lyophiliser vos protéines à l’aide d’un appareil LSC Alpha 2-4. Pourquoi opter pour nos services de production de matériel biologique ? Solutions sur mesure Nous savons que chaque projet de recherche est unique. C’est pourquoi nous adaptons le processus à vos besoins. Haute qualité Nous prenons la qualité au sérieux et c’est pourquoi nous effectuons des contrôles de qualité rigoureux à chaque étape du processus de production afin de nous assurer que le produit final répond à vos attentes et que tous nos services sont fournis selon les normes de qualité les plus élevées. Équipe expérimentée Notre équipe d’experts possède une vaste expérience en matière de production et de développement d’essais et est prête à fournir une assistance tout au long du processus afin d’assurer la réussite du projet. Prix compétitifs Nous proposons des prix compétitifs pour notre service de production afin de permettre un large accès à du matériel biologique de haute qualité. Si vous avez des questions ou si vous souhaitez discuter de votre projet avec nous, n’hésitez pas à nous contacter . Notre équipe est toujours prête à vous aider dans vos recherches. Vous souhaitez en savoir plus sur nos autres services ASD/Prod ? Cliquez ici ! CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/affaires-reglementaires/
Affaires réglementaires | Services | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Affaires réglementaires En nous focalisant sur l'excellence réglementaire, nous permettons à nos clients de mettre sur le marché leurs kits de diagnostic IVD en toute sécurité et dans le respect de la réglementation. Notre département des affaires réglementaires s’engage à guider nos clients à travers les processus réglementaires des marchés de l’UE et des États-Unis, en fournissant un soutien au marquage CE ou au processus de soumission à la FDA. Grâce à notre vaste expertise dans divers domaines thérapeutiques, phases de développement et industries, ainsi qu’à notre connaissance approfondie des environnements réglementaires, nous aidons nos clients à commercialiser leurs kits de diagnostic in vitro en toute confiance. CE QUE NOUS OFFRONS Conformité réglementaire S’assurer que le kit IVD est conforme aux réglementations pertinentes dans les régions où il sera commercialisé, telles que la FDA aux États-Unis, la directive CE dans l’Union européenne, ou d’autres réglementations nationales ou internationales. Évaluation des risques Effectuer une évaluation approfondie des risques associés au kit IVD, y compris les risques liés à la santé des patients, à la précision des résultats et à la sécurité de l’utilisateur. Validation du processus Valider les processus de fabrication, d’assemblage et de contrôle de la qualité pour garantir la fiabilité et la reproductibilité des résultats du kit IVD. Études cliniques Participation, en concertation avec le client, au suivi des études cliniques pour évaluer les performances du kit IVD, notamment sa sensibilité, sa spécificité et sa précision dans le diagnostic des maladies ou des conditions médicales cibles. Étiquetage et documentation Élaborer un étiquetage complet et des documents d’accompagnement, y compris les instructions d’utilisation, les mises en garde, les précautions et les contre-indications, conformément aux exigences réglementaires. Vérification de la qualité Mettre en place des systèmes de contrôle qualité pour surveiller la fabrication du kit IVD, s’assurer de la conformité aux spécifications et détecter les éventuels problèmes de qualité. Gestion des changements Gérer les modifications apportées au kit IVD tout au long de son cycle de vie, en s’assurant que ces changements sont documentés, évalués pour leur impact réglementaire et mis en œuvre de manière appropriée. Communication avec les autorités réglementaires Interagir avec les autorités réglementaires compétentes pour obtenir les approbations nécessaires et maintenir une communication transparente sur les aspects réglementaires du kit IVD. Ces services garantissent que votre kit de DIV est conforme aux normes réglementaires, qu’il fonctionne efficacement et qu’il est mis sur le marché avec fiabilité et respect des réglementations. Si vous souhaitez bénéficier du soutien et de l'expertise de notre équipe réglementaire pour la mise sur le marché de votre kit de diagnostic Contactez un de nos experts CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés.


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/le-groupe/a-propos-de-nous/
A propos de nous | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN À propos de Firalis Molecular Precision Un prestataire de solutions multi-omiques de pointe et de services de recherche contractuelle adaptés aux besoins du secteur des sciences de la vie, en plein essor. Un partenaire global. Firalis Molecular Precision (FMP) est une CRO (Contract Research Organization) équipée de technologies analytiques de pointe au service des organisations pharmaceutiques et de biotechnologie, de la recherche académique et des organismes de santé. FMP opère dans 2 bureaux (Huningue, France au cœur de la BioValley et Cambridge, USA) et dispose d’une équipe de plus de 40 experts ayant les connaissances appropriées et l’expertise scientifique pour comprendre les besoins de nos clients et fournir des solutions sur-mesure dans plusieurs domaines thérapeutiques, notamment l’oncologie, la neurologie, l’immunologie et la cardiologie. Dans ses laboratoires de 4000 m², FMP propose des services bioanalytiques (génomique, protéomique, transcriptomique, métabolomique), une infrastructure de biobanque, le développement d’essais, l’analyse de données et des installations de production. Un soutien à chaque étape. Grâce à l’implémentation d’un panel de technologies innovantes et à notre vaste expérience scientifique, nous nous engageons à vous apporter le soutien dont vous avez besoin pour vos projets de recherche en développement de traitements thérapeutiques ou de produits de diagnostic. Nos solutions multi-omiques personnalisées sont développées dans un environnement de haute qualité et avec précision. Nous nous efforçons de fournir des délais d’exécution rapides, car nous comprenons l’importance du temps dans le cadre des projets de recherche. Nos experts. Avec une équipe composée d’experts en multi-omique (génomique, protéomique, lipidomique et métabolomique), en science des données et en gestion, nous nous engageons à offrir à nos clients des résultats optimaux. Forts de leurs connaissances, compétences et expériences, nos experts utilisent efficacement notre technologie de pointe pour analyser minutieusement les données omiques collectées et proposer des solutions stratégiques sur mesure répondant aux besoins spécifiques de nos clients. Leur collaboration, leur esprit d’innovation et leur engagement à repousser les limites garantissent que leur travail soit toujours à la hauteur, voire dépasse les normes établies. Qui nous soutenons. Au cœur de nos activités se trouve la volonté de concevoir des services adaptés aux besoins des différents acteurs du secteur des sciences de la vie. Notre équipe, qui possède plus de 15 ans d’expérience, a acquis des connaissances approfondies grâce auxquelles nous avons pu servir plus de 120 clients à travers le monde, en leur proposant des solutions innovantes pour leurs projets de recherche. Plus précisément, nous soutenons Les entreprises pharmaceutiques et de biotechnologie, qu’elles soient émergentes, de taille moyenne ou grande. Les chercheurs universitaires. Les professionnels de la santé. Un engagement pour la plus haute qualité. Nous nous engageons résolument à fournir une qualité exceptionnelle dans chacun des services multi-omiques que nous proposons, dans le but de faire progresser la médecine de précision dans tous les domaines thérapeutiques. En savoir plus Échangez avec l'un de nos experts au sujet de vos projets de recherche. CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés.


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/le-groupe/gestion-de-la-qualite-et-normes/
Gestion de la qualité et normes | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Notre système de gestion de la qualité Les normes de qualité sont au cœur de notre travail. Nous nous engageons à respecter les normes les plus strictes dans toutes nos activités, car nous comprenons l'importance de la qualité dans le domaine de la recherche scientifique. Quelques unes de nos activités sont réalisées à l’aide du système de gestion de la qualité de notre maison mère, étant certifié/accrédité pour certaines normes générales et techniques. ISO 9001:2015 Certificat N° 2014/58992.7 Cette norme définit les critères d’un système de gestion de la qualité. Elle repose sur certains principes de gestion de la qualité, notamment une forte orientation client, la motivation et l’implication de la direction générale, l’approche par processus et l’amélioration continue. La norme ISO 9001 garantit que nos clients bénéficient de services de haute qualité. ISO 14001:2015 Certificat N° 2022/100533.1 Cette norme spécifie les exigences relatives à un système de management environnemental qu’une organisation peut utiliser pour améliorer ses performances environnementales. Conformément à la politique environnementale de l’organisme, les résultats escomptés d’un système de management environnemental sont l’amélioration des performances environnementales, le respect des obligations de conformité et la réalisation des objectifs environnementaux. ISO 13485:2016 Certificat n° 2014/58993.6 Cette norme spécifie les exigences pour qu’un système de gestion de la qualité démontre son aptitude à fournir des dispositifs médicaux et des services associés qui répondent constamment aux exigences des clients et aux exigences réglementaires applicables. Cela comprend la conception et le développement, la production, le stockage et la distribution, l’installation ou l’entretien d’un dispositif médical, ainsi que la conception et le développement ou la fourniture d’activités associées (par exemple, l’assistance technique). ISO 20387:2018 Certificat N°2024/108791.1 Il s’agit d’une norme internationale qui spécifie les exigences en matière de compétence, d’impartialité et de fonctionnement cohérent des biobanques impliquées dans la collecte, le traitement, le stockage et la distribution de matériel biologique et de données associées à des fins de recherche et de développement. La conformité à l’ISO 20387 signifie l’adhésion aux meilleures pratiques relatives à la mise en place de biobanques, renforçant ainsi la crédibilité et la fiabilité des services de biobanques et l’intégrité de la recherche scientifique. CAP Laboratory Accreditation CAP Number : 9211908 / AU-ID : 2161952 L’accréditation CAP est un programme proposé par le College of American Pathologists qui évalue la qualité et la précision des laboratoires médicaux et s’assure qu’ils répondent à des normes rigoureuses en matière de tests et de diagnostics. Nous sommes le premier laboratoire en France à obtenir l’accréditation CAP , ce qui souligne notre engagement à respecter les normes les plus strictes en matière de qualité, de précision et de fiabilité des services de laboratoire. Nous nous engageons à fournir une qualité optimale à chaque aspect de nos services multi-omiques, pour faire progresser la médecine de précision dans tous les domaines thérapeutiques. Prendre contact avec un expert de la qualité CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/recrutement/
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/wp-content/uploads/2023/09/Job_Description_FMP_Comptable.pdf
A 17-35 Rue du Fort   F-68330 H uningue     Firalis Molecular Precison est une société de biotechnologie dont la mission est la recherche et le développement de  biomarqueurs pour la mise au point d’outils de diagnostic in -vitro (DIV), afin d’améliorer la prise en charge des patients  et  d’aider les médecins dans les décisions thérapeutiques. Avec une forte expertise et un environnement de qualité extrême  (ISO 9001, ISO 13845, ISO 17025 et NF S 96 -900), Firalis fabrique des kits RUO et DIV et propose une gamme complète de  services de biomarqueurs alla nt de la recherche aux essais cliniques dans des domaines thérapeutiques clés (maladies  cardiovasculaires, neurodégénératives et inflammatoires). Situé à Huningue, son siège social comprend plus de 2000 m2  de laboratoires R&D et de production.   Pour renforc er le service Comptab le et Financier  de notre entreprise, nous recherchons :   UN(E) COMPTABLE   Description de l'emploi   Sous la responsabilité du Directeur Administratif et Financier, vos missions principales consisteront à  :   Participer au reporting mensuel d es activités et contrôler les résultats budgétaires ;    Préparer des situations intermédiaires et clôtures mensuelles ;    Réaliser le reporting financier des projets subventionnés ;    Assurer le suivi des postes clients et fournisseurs ;    Veiller au suivi des bud gets pour les différentes "Business Units" ;    Suivre l’efficience de l’activité opérationnelle des différentes « Business Units » ;    Être en charge du suivi et de l’analyse de la gestion des stocks ;    Participer au déploiement, au suivi et à l’établissement d es KPI pertinents au bon déroulement de l’activité  commerciale et opérationnelle ;    Contribuer à l'amélioration continue du processus en place et à l’automatisation de certaines tâches.   Votre profil    Diplôme de Comptabilité et de Gestion (DCG) avec une préfé rence pour la comptabilité  et/ou le contrôle de  gestion  ;   Expérience de 2 ans minimum en entreprise ;    Capacités d’expression et de compréhension en Anglais, écrites au minimum ;    Maîtrise des fonctions avancées sur Excel ;    Capacités d’organisation, de suivi  des tâches et des priorités (respect des échéances données) ;    Travail consciencieux et rigoureux ;    Capacité de travailler en équipe ;    Flexibilité du temps de travail pour respecter les échéances et adaptation à différentes situations.   Les plus  : toutes c onnaissance s des logiciels EBP Comptabilité, EBP Gestion Commerciale, M -Files, SILAE .    2 bonnes raisons de nous rejoindre    Intégrer une  PME dynamique à taille humaine au sein de laquelle vous allez pouvoir intervenir sur différentes  thématiques  ;   Évoluer da ns un environnement où  l’innovation  et l’amélioration continue  sont au cœur de nos produits et  process .    Vous souhaitez nous rejoindre ?  Dans ce cas -là, envoyez -nous  votre  CV accompagné d’une  lettre  de motivation  à :  careers@firalis.com  


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/recrutement/
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/wp-content/uploads/2023/09/Job_Description_FMP_Directeur-etudes-BPL.pdf
A 17-35 Rue du Fort  F-68330 Huningue     Firalis Molecular Precison est une société de biotechnologie dont la mission est la recherche et le développement de  biomarqueurs pour la mise au point d’outils de diagnostic in-vitro (DIV), afin d’améliorer la prise en charge des patients et  d’aider les médecins dans les décisions thérapeutiques. Avec une forte expertise et un environnement de qualité extrême  (ISO 9001, ISO 13845, ISO 17025 et NF S 96-900), Firalis fabrique des kits RUO et DIV et propose une gamme complète de  services de biomarqueurs allant de la recherche aux essais cliniques dans des domaines thérapeutiques clés (maladies  cardiovasculaires, neurodégénératives et inflammatoires). Situé à Huningue, son siège social comprend plus de 2000 m2 de  laboratoires R&D et de production.  Pour renforcer le département « Biomarker Science » de notre entreprise, nous recherchons :  UN DIRECTEUR D’ÉTUDES BPL EN GÉNOMIQUE (H/F)  Description de l'emploi  Sous la responsabilité hiérarchique du Directeur des Opérations, vos missions principales consisteront à :   Être responsable de la rédaction des plans d’études et tout amendement qui leur seraient apportés ;   Assurer la diffusion des plans d’étude et amendements auprès des personnes concernées ;   Veiller au respect du plan d’étude ;   Travailler en étroite collaboration avec le Chef de Laboratoire de Génomique et la Chef du département Qualité ;   Être responsable de la conduite technique de l’étude et de son suivi ;    Évaluer et répertorier l’incidence sur la qualité et l’intégrité de l’étude de toute déviation au plan d’étude et aux  procédures opératoires ;   Prendre des mesures correctives appropriées si nécessaire ;   Veiller à ce que toutes les données obtenues soient pleinement enregistrées et étayées par tous les documents utiles ;   Être responsable de l’interprétation des résultats, de la rédaction du rapport d’étude (en collaboration avec les  services annexes) et de la validité des données présentées ;   Etablir les rapports intermédiaires et valider les rapports finaux des études ;   En étroite relation avec les équipes commerciales être responsable de l’information du client tout au long du  déroulement de l’étude ;    Veiller à ce que le plan d’étude, le rapport final, les données brutes et les pièces justificatives soient archivés après  achèvement de l’étude.    Votre profil   Master en biologie moléculaire, biologie cellulaire, génétique, ou tout autre domaine similaire   Vous avez idéalement une expérience de 2 ans minimum sur un poste avec des responsabilités similaires    Vous avez obligatoirement déjà travaillé dans un environnement réglementaire BPL   Vous avez une bonne connaissance des techniques de biologie moléculaire telles que le NGS et la PCR   Vous êtes une personne rigoureuse, impliquée et curieuse, qui apprécie travailler dans le partage de connaissance et  qui aura à cœur de faire avancer l'équipe   Vous maîtrisez le français et l'anglais, à l'écrit comme à l'oral.     2 bonnes raisons de nous rejoindre   Intégrer une PME dynamique à taille humaine au sein de laquelle vous allez pouvoir intervenir sur différentes  thématiques ;   Évoluer dans un environnement où l’innovation et l’amélioration continue sont au cœur de nos produits et process.    Vous souhaitez nous rejoindre ? Dans ce cas-là, envoyez-nous votre CV accompagné d’une lettre de motivation à :  careers@firalis.com 


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/recrutement/
Nous rejoindre | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Recrutement Rejoignez-nous pour soutenir notre croissance et notre capacité d'innovation. Nous sommes engagés à soutenir les organisations biopharmaceutiques, les chercheurs et les professionnels de santé en leur offrant des solutions multi-omiques de pointe qui couvrent l'ensemble du process de développement de traitements et de produits de diagnostic. Rejoignez nos équipes Nos experts sont la force motrice de notre croissance et de notre réussite. Lorsque vous travaillez chez Firalis Molecular Precision, vous apportez votre contribution à une mission importante : soutenir les avancées thérapeutiques et permettre une amélioration des soins apportés aux patients et de leur traitement. Vous serez amené à travailler au sein d’une équipe ouverte et collaborative où vous aurez l’autonomie et la responsabilité d’avoir un impact réel. Vous vous épanouirez dans un environnement dynamique qui favorise le développement personnel, intellectuel et opérationnel. Découvrir les postes à pourvoir chez Firalis Molecular Precision Opportunités Présence mondiale À Firalis Molecular Precision, notre présence à l’échelle mondiale témoigne de notre engagement à servir nos clients partout dans le monde. Avec des sites principaux à Huningue, en France, au cœur de la BioValley, et à Kendall Square, aux États-Unis, l’un des principaux centres de biotechnologie au monde, nous sommes particulièrement bien positionnés pour répondre aux divers besoins de notre clientèle globale. Notre récente installation aux États-Unis est plus qu’un simple lieu d’implantation ; il s’agit d’une démarche proactive visant à nous rapprocher de nos valeureux clients, nous permettant de proposer nos solutions multi-omiques au marché américain, particulièrement dynamique. Rejoindre notre équipe, c’est faire partie d’une organisation qui non seulement fait progresser la médecine de précision, mais qui accorde également la priorité à l’établissement de liens fructueux avec des utilisateurs à travers le monde. Nous connaître Avantages En travaillant chez Firalis Molecular Precision, vous bénéficiez d’un cadre de travail conçu pour votre bien-être. Nous veillons à offrir un environnement où vos besoins sont pris en compte et où votre productivité s’accroît. Chez Firalis Molecular Precision, nous estimons qu’il est important de donner à nos employés la flexibilité d’organiser leurs horaires de travail et la possibilité de télétravailler, afin d’assurer un bon équilibre entre vie professionnelle et vie privée. Pour maintenir un bon niveau d’énergie tout au long de la journée, nous mettons à disposition une abondance de fruits frais, d’en-cas et de boissons chaudes. De plus, nos locaux sont dog-friendly, ce qui vous permet d’emmener votre compagnon à quatre pattes au bureau, sous couverts qu’il soit vacciné, propre et calme. Postes à pourvoir chez Firalis Molecular Precision Directeur.rice général(e) des affaires (H/F) Responsable de développement d'essais (H/F) Informaticien.ne (H/F) Comptable (H/F) Directeur d'études BPL (H/F) Si aucun des postes ci-dessus n'est susceptible de vous convenir, n’hésitez pas à adresser votre candidature spontanée (CV et lettre de motivation) à notre équipe de recrutement. Candidature spontanée Vous souhaitez en savoir plus sur les perspectives de carrière, les avantages et les offres d'emploi à Firalis Molecular Precision ? Contacter un Responsable des Ressources Humaines CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés.


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2024/04/09/firalis-molecular-precision-achieves-iso-203872018-certification/
Firalis Molecular Precision becomes ISO 20387:2018 certified. We value your
privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized
ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent
to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent
Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform
certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under
each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary"
are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic
functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary
cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as
providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies
do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display.
Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like
sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting
feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics
Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the
website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number
of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display.
Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key
performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user
experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Firalis
Molecular Precision achieves ISO 20387:2018 certification, elevating
biobanking services. 04.09.24 Huningue, France – Firalis Molecular Precision
(FMP), a CAP-accredited fast-growing Contract Research Organization (CRO) and
Contract Development and Manufacturing Organization (CDMO), proudly announces
its attainment of ISO 20387:2018 certification, a significant milestone
underscoring FMP’s commitment to high quality in biobanking practices. ISO
20387:2018, an internationally recognized standard, sets forth stringent
requirements for the competence, impartiality, and consistent operation of
biobanks engaged in the collection, processing, storage, and distribution of
biological materials and associated data for research and development
purposes. This certification validates FMP’s adherence to the highest quality
standards in all facets of its biobanking operations. By complying with ISO
20387, FMP ensures the integrity, reliability, and traceability of biological
samples, thereby bolstering confidence in research outcomes and fostering
collaboration among biobanks and researchers globally. It also further
enriches Firalis Molecular Precision’s extensive certificate portfolio,
reaffirming its dedication to delivering high-quality services and solutions
to its clients. For more information about FMP’s Quality Management System and
its ISO 20387:2018 certification ( N° 2024/108791.1) , visit
firalismolecularprecision.com/quality-management-and-standards About Firalis
Molecular Precision Firalis Molecular Precision (FMP) is a fast-growing CRO &
CDMO, providing advanced multi-omics solutions and tailored contract research
services to the Life Sciences sector. With headquarters in Huningue, France,
and a presence in Cambridge, Mass., FMP is renowned for its commitment to
innovation and excellence. Leveraging cutting-edge technologies, FMP offers a
comprehensive suite of bioanalytical services encompassing biobanking,
multiomics-driven analyses (including genomics, proteomics, transcriptomics,
lipidomics, and metabolomics), as well as omic data analysis, assay
development, and custom in vitro diagnostic (IVD) kit manufacturing. FMP’s
mission is to empower healthcare professionals, researchers, and
biopharmaceutical entities with the tools and solutions they need to drive
progress towards better patient care and a more personalized medicine. Share
this article on your socials Go back to all news Contact us Subscribe to our
newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit
production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023
Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading
Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2024/03/21/firalis-molecular-precision-launches-spatial-omics-grant-program/
Firalis Molecular Precision launches spatial omics Grant Program We value your
privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized
ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent
to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent
Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform
certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under
each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary"
are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic
functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary
cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as
providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies
do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display.
Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like
sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting
feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics
Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the
website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number
of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display.
Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key
performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user
experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Firalis
Molecular Precision partners with Vizgen to launch MERSCOPE® Platform Grant
Program 2.0 03.22.24 Huningue, France – Firalis Molecular Precision (FMP), a
CAP-accredited fast-growing Contract Research Organization (CRO) and Contract
Development and Manufacturing Organization (CDMO), is thrilled to announce a
collaborative effort with Vizgen, a pioneer in spatial omics technology, to
introduce a Grant Program, open to researchers in Europe. Building upon the
success of their first collaborative Grant Program, which resulted in
selecting a researcher dedicated to investigating the spatial immune cell
organization in tumors of triple negative breast cancer (TNBC) patients before
immunotherapy, Vizgen and FMP will be supporting, once again, a winning
researcher to advance their research project. As part of the Grant, FMP will
award the selected researcher with exclusive access to MERFISH technology
coupled with the cutting-edge MERSCOPE® Platform in FMP’s laboratories,
leveraging one of Vizgen’s Predesigned Panels for a single-cell spatial
analysis project. This initiative aims to encourage researchers to harness
spatial transcriptomics to improve their understanding of cellular
interactions and functional states and to advance treatment development in
various therapeutic areas (oncology, neurology, immunology). “We are excited
to partner with Vizgen once more in this Grant Program,” said Dr. Eric
Schordan, CSO of Firalis Molecular Precision. “By combining FMP’s expertise in
spatial omics data generation and analysis with Vizgen’s cutting-edge
technology, we aim to empower researchers to unlock new insights into cellular
biology and disease mechanisms.” The winning researcher will also receive
comprehensive data analysis services to derive meaningful insights from their
experiments. The program seeks proposals that demonstrate innovation, impact,
and a clear potential to advance their research area. Eligible researchers
interested in applying for the Grant Program can find more information and
submit their grant application on firalismolecularprecision.com/grant-program-
application-page/ Applications will be evaluated by a panel of experts based
on scientific merit, innovation, and potential impact. The deadline to submit
a 300-word abstract is June 30, 2024, and the winner will be notified in
September 2024. About Firalis Molecular Precision Firalis Molecular Precision
(FMP) is a fast-growing CRO & CDMO, providing advanced multi-omics solutions
and tailored contract research services to the Life Sciences sector. With
headquarters in Huningue, France, and a presence in Cambridge, Mass., FMP is
renowned for its commitment to innovation and excellence. Leveraging cutting-
edge technologies, FMP offers a comprehensive suite of bioanalytical services
encompassing biobanking, multiomics-driven analyses (including genomics,
proteomics, transcriptomics, lipidomics, and metabolomics), as well as omic
data analysis, assay development, and custom in vitro diagnostic (IVD) kit
manufacturing. Our mission is to empower healthcare professionals,
researchers, and biopharmaceutical entities with the tools and solutions they
need to make progress towards better patient care and a more personalized
medicine. About Vizgen Vizgen is dedicated to pioneering the next generation
of genomics, providing tools that demonstrate the possibilities of in situ
single-cell spatial genomics, setting the standard for the spatial genomics
field. These tools are enabling researchers to gain new insights into the
biological systems that govern human health and disease with spatial context.
The company’s MERSCOPE® Platform enables massively multiplexed, genome-scale
nucleic acid imaging with high accuracy and unrivaled detection efficiency at
subcellular resolution. MERSCOPE® provides transformative insights into a wide
range of tissue-scale basic research and translational medicine in oncology,
immunology, neuroscience, infectious disease, developmental biology, cell and
gene therapy, and is an essential tool for accelerating drug discovery and
development. For more information, visit www.vizgen.com . Share this article
on your socials Go back to all news Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter
Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production
Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis
Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2024/02/20/precision-med-tri-conference/
FMP to attend the 31st International Precision Med Tri-Conference We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR FMP to attend the 31st International Precision Med Tri-Conference. Huningue­­, France­­­­ – Firalis Molecular Precision, a fast-growing Contract Research Organization (CRO) and Contract Development and Manufacturing Organization (CDMO), announces its participation in the upcoming 31st International Precision Med Tri-Con in San Diego. The event, scheduled to take place March 26-28, serves as a premier meeting ground for the diagnostics and precision medicine community. With a focus on the latest research, technologies, and business models in implementing precision medicine, the conference will cover a wide array of topics including biomarkers, companion diagnostics, genomic medicine, precision health, and more. Discussions will also delve into innovation and market access strategies for at-home diagnostics, point-of-care testing, and molecular diagnostics for infectious diseases. This year’s agenda promises to explore emerging implications of faster and cheaper sequencing, AI and digital tools, and spatial biology and single-cell multi-omics in advancing precision medicine. Firalis Molecular Precision is enthusiastic about the opportunity to connect and collaborate with fellow experts in the field. As a CRO & CDMO dedicated to providing advanced and tailored bioanalytical services, we are committed to supporting drug and diagnostic product development projects with precision and expertise. "Our participation in the 31st International Precision Med Tri-Con underscores our commitment to driving advancements in precision medicine. We are excited to engage with the global diagnostics and precision medicine community and showcase how our tailored multi-omics services can contribute to advancing patient care and innovative research projects." \- Sébastien Langé CEO of Firalis Molecular Precision, Inc. Attendees are encouraged to visit FMP’s booth (327) to learn more about our comprehensive suite of bioanalytical services and to explore potential collaborations. Find more information on the event and join us at Precision Med Tri-Con | Must-Attend Conference for the Precision Medicine Community (triconference.com) About Firalis Molecular Precision Firalis Molecular Precision (FMP) is a fast-growing CRO & CDMO, providing advanced multi-omics solutions and tailored contract research services to the Life Sciences sector. With headquarters in Huningue, France, and a presence in Cambridge, MA, USA, FMP is renowned for its commitment to innovation and excellence. Leveraging cutting-edge technologies, FMP offers a comprehensive suite of bioanalytical services encompassing biobanking, multiomics-driven analyses (including genomics, proteomics, transcriptomics, lipidomics, and metabolomics), as well as omic data analysis, assay development, and custom in vitro diagnostic (IVD) kit manufacturing. Our mission is to empower healthcare professionals, researchers, and biopharmaceutical entities with the tools and solutions they need to make progress towards better patient care and a more personalized medicine. Share this article on your socials Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/news-events/page/2/
News & Events - Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use
cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or
content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our
use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences
We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions.
You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent
category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on
your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of
the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required
to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or
adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally
identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help
perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on
social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features.
No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how
visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on
metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No
cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and
analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a
better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR News &
Events The role of bioanalytical testing in drug development Read more Firalis
Molecular Precision to exhibit during RNA Leaders Europe Congress Read more
Firalis Molecular Precision to attend BIO-Europe Spring® 2024 Read more
Leveraging multi-omics to advance precision medicine Read more Elevating
biobanking and genomics services through the “Cell Lines in Read more Firalis
Molecular Precision announces strategic acquisition of Illumina NovaSeq X Read
more 1 2 3 4 5 Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics
Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms &
Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision,
all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/news-events/page/3/
News & Events - Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use
cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or
content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our
use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences
We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions.
You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent
category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on
your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of
the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required
to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or
adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally
identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help
perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on
social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features.
No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how
visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on
metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No
cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and
analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a
better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR News &
Events Firalis Molecular Precision acquires Olink® Explore HT panel Read more
MERSCOPE Grant Winner Announced Read more BioTechX Europe Read more CAP
Accreditation Read more BIO-Europe 2023 Read more August’s Newsletter is Out!
Read more 1 2 3 4 5 Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics
Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms &
Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision,
all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/news-events/page/4/
News & Events - Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use
cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or
content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our
use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences
We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions.
You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent
category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on
your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of
the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required
to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or
adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally
identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help
perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on
social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features.
No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how
visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on
metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No
cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and
analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a
better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR News &
Events Biomarkers and how they can be catalysts for personalized medicine Read
more July’s Newsletter is out! Read more Your Trusted Olink® Explore Panel
Service Provider in France Read more France’s Leading NGS Service Provider
Read more Advancing Cancer Research Read more Revolutionizing In Situ Spatial
Analysis Read more 1 2 3 4 5 Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services
Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies,
Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular
Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/news-events/page/5/
News & Events - Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use
cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or
content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our
use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences
We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions.
You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent
category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on
your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of
the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required
to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or
adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally
identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help
perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on
social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features.
No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how
visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on
metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No
cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and
analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a
better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR News &
Events Pioneering multiomics solutions on the global stage Read more Expanding
our international presence Read more Joining Scientist.com Read more Grant
Program Launch ft. Vizgen Read more June’s Newsletter is out! Read more
Expanding our digital reach with the Launch of a Twitter Read more 1 2 3 4 5
Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking
Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice
Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved.
Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/nous-contacter/
Nous contacter | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Nous contacter Comment pouvons-nous vous aider ? N’hésitez pas à nous contacter en utilisant les coordonnées ci-dessous ou à nous envoyer un message en remplissant le formulaire. +33 (0) 3 89 91 13 20 || +1 857 259 0185 sales@firalis.com marketing@firalis.com Siège en France Services CDMO Services CRO Site administratif Siège aux États-Unis CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés.


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/services-de-proteomiques-quanterix/
Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Notre service s'appuie sur les plateformes Quanterix SR-X™ et SP-X™ pour fournir une mesure sensible et précise des biomarqueurs protéiques. Nos services Les plateformes SR-X™ et SP-X™ de Quanterix permettent la détection et la quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques à des concentrations très faibles, ce qui rend la mesure de plusieurs protéines dans un seul échantillon accessible avec sensibilité et précision. Quanterix SR-X™ Cette plateforme assure la mesure multiplexée des protéines allant jusqu’à 4 analytes et les protéines peuvent être mesurées à des concentrations aussi faibles que 0,1 fg/mL. Son application s’étend aux biomarqueurs neurologiques (Tau, NF-Light, GFAP, UCH-L1, Ab42 & Ab40, etc.), ce qui en fait un outil de choix pour l’étude des pathologies affectant le système nerveux. Figure 1. Mode opératoire de Quanterix SR-X™ Quanterix SP-X™ Cette plateforme polyvalente est adaptée à l’immuno-oncologie et aux biomarqueurs inflammatoires, notamment l’IFNγ, l’IL-1β, l’IL-4, l’IL-5, l’IL-6, l’IL-8, l’IL-10, l’IL-12p70, l’IL-22 et le TNFα, et permet la mesure multiplexée des protéines pour un maximum de 10 analytes. Avec une sensibilité remarquable, les protéines peuvent être détectées à des concentrations aussi faibles que 10 fg/mL. Figure 2. Mode opératoire de Quanterix SP-X™ Des essais sur mesure peuvent être développés à la demande pour quantifier des biomarqueurs protéiques spécifiques. La technologie SIMOA® trouve des applications dans divers domaines, notamment la recherche de biomarqueurs, le diagnostic et le développement de médicaments. Elle peut être utilisée pour détecter et mesurer des biomarqueurs liés à la maladie d'Alzheimer, au cancer, aux maladies infectieuses et aux maladies cardiovasculaires, entre autres. En savoir plus sur la technologie SIMOA® de Quanterix Pourquoi opter pour nos services de détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques ? Apport d'échantillon faible L’apport d’échantillon est généralement de l’ordre de 25 à 50μL pour la plupart des dosages, ce qui permet de conserver des échantillons précieux et d’analyser des ceux de faible volume. Haut débit Les plateformes Quanterix offrent des débits élevés, permettant l’analyse des centaines d’échantillons en une seule fois. Une équipe compétente Notre équipe d’experts, dotée d’une grande expérience dans le domaine de l’analyse protéomique, s’engage à vous fournir le meilleur service et le meilleur soutien tout au long de votre projet. Détection ultra-sensible La technologie SIMOA® permet la détection et la quantification de molécules individuelles avec une précision et une sensibilité élevées (fg/mL). La limite de détection rapportée est de 0,2-1 fg/mL, en fonction du test. Plage d'analyse étendue Permettant la détection de biomolécules de faible et de forte abondance dans un seul et même échantillon. Bénéficiez de notre expertise scientifique en protéomique et de nos plateformes de pointe au laboratoire pour faire avancer votre projet de recherche Nous contacter CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/services/developpement-dessais-production/
Développement d'essais / Production | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Développement et production d'essais Développement d'essais, production de matériel biologique et production de kits de diagnostic in vitro. Nos services Services de production de matériel biologique Nos services comprennent la production de protéines et d’anticorps . Nous utilisons une variété de techniques pour produire des matériaux biologiques de haute qualité , y compris la technologie de l’ ADN recombinant, la culture cellulaire et la purification des protéines . En savoir plus sur les services de production de matériel biologique Services de développement d'essais Nos services sont spécialisés dans le développement et l’optimisation d’immunodosages pour répondre à vos besoins spécifiques en matière de recherche. Nous travaillons en étroite collaboration avec nos clients pour garantir la fiabilité et la précision de nos tests, tout en respectant les normes de qualité les plus strictes. Grâce à nos années d’expérience dans le développement de tests ELISA et à notre accès à des technologies et équipements de pointe, nous garantissons la plus haute qualité pour nos tests. En savoir plus sur les services de développement d'essais Production de kits de diagnostic in vitro Nos services de production de kits de diagnostic in vitro sont conçus pour vous aider à développer et à fabriquer des kits de diagnostic de haute qualité. Nous travaillons en étroite collaboration avec nos clients pour développer des kits fiables, précis et répondant aux normes de qualité les plus strictes. Notre équipe a des années d’expérience dans le développement de kits de diagnostic pour une variété d’applications , y compris les maladies neurodégénératives, cardiovasculaires et auto-immunes . En savoir plus sur les services de production Au sein de nos services ASD et Production, nous nous engageons à vous fournir des résultats de la plus haute qualité. Contactez-nous dès aujourd’hui pour discuter de vos besoins en matière de recherche et de la manière dont nous pouvons vous aider à atteindre vos objectifs scientifiques. Retour à l'aperçu des services CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/le-groupe/
Notre entreprise | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN FAITES CONNAISSANCE AVEC NOUS A propos Gestion de la qualité et normes CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés.


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/services/genomiques/htg-transcriptomiques/
Services de Transcriptomiques HTG | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN HTG Transcriptomiques Home Services Génomiques HTG Transcriptomiques Notre service de profilage d'expression génique via la technologie HTG Nous proposons des panels de profilage d’expression génique HTG à la pointe de la technologie. Ils sont conçus pour fournir des informations précises sur les niveaux d’expression de l’ARN dans une variété de types d’échantillons. La technologie est compatible pour des tissus fixés au formol et dans la paraffine (FFPE), de tissus frais congelés et de lysats cellulaires. Nos services pour vous aider à réussir Notre technologie HTG nous permet d’analyser les données d’expression génique avec une sensibilité et une spécificité exceptionnelles. En effet, vous pouvez obtenir des informations sur une variété de processus biologiques, y compris la différenciation cellulaire, la prolifération, l’apoptose, etc . HTG propose une gamme de panels de profilage d’expression génique, chacun d’entre eux étant conçu pour répondre aux besoins spécifiques de nos clients. Les panels couvrent un large éventail de gènes et de voies, et sont constamment mis à jour par HTG pour rester à la pointe de l’analyse de l’expression génique. Nous proposons le profilage de six panneaux selon vos besoins : En savoir plus HTG EdgeSeq p anel transcriptomique Le HTG Transcriptome Panel (HTP) est conçu pour fournir une couverture étendue de la plupart des transcrits de l’ARNm humain, ce qui permet aux chercheurs de générer des résultats fiables. Cible 19 398 transcrits humain HTG EdgeSeq panel miRNA sur le transcriptome entier L’essai HTG EdgeSeq miRNA Transcriptome entier est un panel qui permet d’établir le profil de tous les miARN humains connus, ce qui permet d’étudier l’expression des miARN et leur impact sur la régulation des gènes et les maladies. Cible 2 083 miARN humain En savoir plus En savoir plus HTG EdgeSeq panel de biomarqueurs en oncologie Le HTG EdgeSeq biomarqueurs en oncologie panel est conçu pour mesurer les niveaux d’expression de gènes connus pour être impliqués dans l’oncogenèse et la progression des tumeurs, ce qui en fait un outil précieux pour la recherche et le diagnostic du cancer. Cible 2 549 transcrits humain HTG EdgeSeq panel d'immuno-oncologie de précision Le EdgeSeq panel d’immuno-oncologie de précision est un panel de gènes ciblé qui permet d’analyser les gènes liés au système immunitaire, ce qui en fait un outil précieux pour étudier la relation entre le système immunitaire et le cancer. Cible 1 392 transcrits humain En savoir plus En savoir plus HTG EdgeSeq panel de réponse immunitaire Le HTG EdgeSeq panel de réponse immunitaire est un panel de gènes conçu pour mesurer l’expression des gènes impliqués dans la réponse immunitaire, ce qui permet aux chercheurs de mieux comprendre les mécanismes à l’origine des maladies liées à l’immunité. Cible 2 002 transcrits humain HTG EdgeSeq panel sur la réponse tumorale de l'ARNm de la souris Le HTG EdgeSeq panel sur la réponse tumorale de l’ARNm de la souris est un panel de gènes conçu pour étudier l’expression des gènes impliqués dans la réponse tumorale dans des modèles murins, ce qui permet de mieux comprendre la biologie du cancer et les cibles thérapeutiques potentielles. Cible 1659 transcrits murin En savoir plus Comment cela fonctionne-t-il ? Avec moins de temps de travail, de la préparation de l’échantillon à l’analyse des données, les solutions de HTG permettent d’analyser rapidement , précisément , de manière reproductible et quantitative des milliers d’ARN ciblés à partir d’un seul test, en 36 heures seulement. La technologie est une combinaison de l’essai de protection par nucléase (qNPA) et du séquençage nouvelle génération . Pourquoi choisir nos services de transcriptomique HTG ? Large panel de matrices biologiques Mesure possible dans une matrice biologique variée : tissus fixés au formol, tissus frais congelés et lysats cellulaires, plasma, PAxgene, sérum. Faible quantité d'échantillon Nécessité d’une petite quantité d’échantillon et pas d’extraction d’acide nucléique. Solutions personnalisées HTG propose des panels complets et personnalisables pour vos projets uniques. Vous pouvez ainsi obtenir des informations précieuses sur la biologie de vos échantillons et développer des thérapies ciblées et efficaces. Équipe expérimentée Notre équipe d’experts possède une vaste expérience en matière de séquençage et d’analyse bioinformatique. Nous nous engageons à vous fournir le meilleur service et le meilleur soutien tout au long de votre projet. Si vous souhaitez en savoir plus sur nos panels et services de profilage d’expression génique, n’hésitez pas à nous contacter dès aujourd’hui. Nous nous réjouissons de travailler avec vous ! Vous souhaitez en savoir plus sur nos autres services de génomiques ? Cliquez ici ! CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés. Chargement des commentaires…


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/condition-dutilisation/
Conditions d'utilisation - Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Conditions d'utilisation du site Firalis Molecular Precision Propriété du site web Ce site est édité par Firalis Molecular Precision, SA de droit français, immatriculée à l’INSEE, sous le numéro SIREN : 443849096 dont le siège social est situé au 17, rue du Fort, Huningue FRANCE. Directeur éditorial Le directeur éditorial du site est le PDG de Firalis Molecular Precision, M. Christophe Valat. Hébergement du sites web Le site est hébergé par Automattic, Inc, San Francisco, États-Unis. Conditions générales d'utilisation Le site est soumis à la loi française. L’utilisateur reconnaît avoir pris connaissance des présentes conditions générales d’utilisation et s’engage à les respecter. Firalis Précision Moléculaire se réserve le droit de modifier cette notice à tout moment. L’utilisateur s’engage donc à la consulter régulièrement. Ce site est accessible 24 heures sur 24, 7 jours sur 7, sauf en cas de travaux de maintenance et d’interventions nécessaires au bon fonctionnement du site. Dans ce cas, l’interruption sera signalée par un avertissement sur la page d’accueil ou par tout autre moyen. Cette interruption ne peut en aucun cas engager la responsabilité de Firalis Précision Moléculaire et ne donne droit à aucune indemnité. Dans le cas où vous accédez au site de Firalis Molecular Precision à partir d’un pays autre que la France, vous vous engagez à vous conformer également à la législation localement applicable. Contenu du site Les informations fournies sur le site de Firalis Molecular Precision sont purement indicatives et ne sont données qu’à titre indicatif. Firalis Molecular Precision ne peut garantir l’exactitude et l’exhaustivité des informations diffusées sur le site ainsi que leur mise à jour. Ces informations doivent faire l’objet d’une analyse complémentaire appropriée par l’utilisateur. Firalis Molecular Precision ne saurait être tenu pour responsable des erreurs ou omissions, d’une absence de disponibilité des informations et des services. En conséquence, l’utilisateur reconnaît utiliser ces informations à ses risques et périls. Firalis Molecular Precision ne saurait être tenu pour responsable des dommages directs ou indirects qui pourraient résulter de l’accès ou de l’utilisation du site Firalis Molecular Precision, y compris, mais sans s’y limiter, l’inaccessibilité, la perte de données et/ou la présence de virus sur son site. Cookies Firalis Molecular Precision respecte la vie privée de chaque individu qui visite son site web. Lorsque vous visitez notre site web, un cookie peut être installé automatiquement sur votre navigateur. Il s’agit d’un petit fichier temporaire constitué d’une chaîne de caractères qui stocke des informations relatives aux fonctions de personnalisation et sert à enregistrer les informations de navigation de l’utilisateur dans le seul but d’améliorer la qualité de l’information sur notre site web. Types de cookies Si vous choisissez de désactiver les cookies sur notre site, il se peut que vous ne puissiez pas profiter des avantages du site. Modification des conditions Firalis Molecular Precision se réserve le droit de modifier ces conditions à tout moment et sans préavis. Toute modification entrera en vigueur immédiatement après sa publication sur le site Web. En continuant à utiliser le site Web après la publication des conditions révisées, vous acceptez les modifications. CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés.


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/politiques-de-confidentialite/
Politiques de confidentialité - Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Politique de confidentialité Protection des données et libertés civiles Les données personnelles collectées via le formulaire de contact (nom, prénom, société, adresse email, etc…) sont destinées uniquement à l’usage de Firalis Molecular Precision, qui est responsable de leur traitement et de leur conservation. Conformément aux exigences du règlement européen n° 2016/679 relatif à l’informatique, aux fichiers et aux libertés, les données personnelles collectées sur le site web font l’objet d’une déclaration auprès de la direction générale de Firalis Molcular Precision. Les données ainsi collectées ne seront ni cédées, ni échangées, ni louées à un tiers. Conformément à la loi précitée, les utilisateurs sont informés qu’ils disposent d’un droit d’accès, de rectification et de suppression des données les concernant. Ce droit peut être exercé soit directement sur le site, soit par courrier électronique (legal@firalis.com), soit en écrivant à Firalis Molecular Precision – 17 rue du Fort, 68630 Huningue. Données collectées Chaque formulaire du site http://www.firalismolecularprecision.com limite la collecte de données personnelles au strict minimum. Les données personnelles collectées sont traitées selon des protocoles sécurisés. Ces données sont traitées sur les bases juridiques suivantes : Dans le cadre de l’exécution d’un contrat. Sur la base de votre consentement. Afin de satisfaire aux obligations légales et réglementaires qui incombent à Firalis Molecular Precion. Finalité du traitement des données Nous utilisons les données personnelles collectées aux fins principales suivantes : Les opérations de marketing et de prospection commerciale, la fidélisation ou la prospection commerciale personnalisée et l’envoi d’offres publicitaires personnalisées. Le traitement des demandes d’information. La gestion de l’exercice des droits des personnes concernées par nos traitements. Exercer vos droits Conformément à la réglementation sur les données à caractère personnel, vous disposez des droits suivants : Droit d’accès : savoir si vos données sont traitées et en obtenir la communication (article 15 du RGPD). Droit de rectification : pour corriger les données inexactes ou compléter vos données (article 16 du GDPR). Droit à l’effacement : effacer vos données pour une raison spécifique (article 17 du GDPR). Droit à la limitation du traitement : vos données seront conservées mais ne seront plus utilisées aux fins mentionnées précédemment (article 18 du GDPR). Droit à la portabilité des données : récupérer vos données fournies afin de les transmettre à une autre entreprise (article 20 du RGPD). Droit d’opposition : pour s’opposer au traitement de vos données (articles 21 et 22 du RGPD). Firalis Molecular Precision a désigné un représentant légal pour assurer la protection des données personnelles et le respect de la loi dans l’entreprise. Vous pouvez le contacter pour toute information ou pour exercer vos droits à l’adresse suivante Firalis Molecular Precision – 17 rue du Fort, 68630 Huningue. Ou par courrier électronique à l’adresse: legal@firalis.com Enfin, vous pouvez vous adresser à la Commission nationale de l’informatique et des libertés (CNIL). En cas de limitation ou d’inexécution de vos droits sur les données personnelles ou en cas d’absence de réponse du responsable du traitement dans un délai d’un mois à compter de la demande, vous pouvez saisir la Commission Nationale de l’Informatique et des Libertés, qui statue sur cette demande dans un délai de trois semaines à compter de la date de réception de la réclamation. (Article 51 de la loi Informatique et Libertés – réf RGPD) Propriété intellectuelle Le présent site et les éléments reproduits sont la propriété de Firalis Molecular ou font l’objet d’un droit d’utilisation ou d’exploitation au profit d’Eurobiomed. Les marques et logos (nom commercial semi-figuratif) de Firalis Molecular Precision sont des marques déposées. La structure générale, les logiciels, textes, images, vidéos, sons, animations, et plus généralement toutes les informations et contenus figurant sur le site sont soumis à la législation protégeant le droit d’auteur. Toute représentation, reproduction, modification ou altération, en tout ou partie, de tout ou partie du site ou de son contenu, par quelque procédé que ce soit, et sur quelque support que ce soit, constitue une contrefaçon sanctionnée par les articles l 335-2 et suivants du Code de la propriété intellectuelle. Les bases de données figurant, le cas échéant, sur le site de Firalis Molecular Precision sont protégées par les dispositions de la loi du 1er juillet 1998 portant transposition en France de la directive européenne du 11 mars 1996 relative à la protection juridique des bases de données. A ce titre, Firalis Molecular Precision interdit expressément toute réutilisation, reproduction ou extraction de tout élément de ces bases de données. L’utilisateur est responsable de toute réutilisation, reproduction ou extraction non autorisée. Firalis Molecular Precision se réserve le droit de supprimer, immédiatement et sans mise en demeure préalable, tout contenu : message, texte, image, graphique qui contreviendrait aux lois et règlements en vigueur et notamment aux réglementations précisées ci-dessus. Si vous souhaitez utiliser un des contenus du site (texte, image, etc.), vous devez obtenir l’autorisation expresse, préalable et écrite de Firalis Molecular Precision, en écrivant à l’adresse indiquée dans le paragraphe « informations légales » ou en envoyant un e-mail au webmaster. Modification des conditions Firalis Molecular Precision se réserve le droit de modifier cette politique à tout moment et sans préavis. Toute modification entrera en vigueur immédiatement après sa publication sur le site Web. En continuant à utiliser le site Web après la publication de la politique révisée, vous acceptez les modifications. Contactez-nous Si vous avez des questions ou des préoccupations concernant la présente politique de protection des données ou la manière dont nous utilisons vos informations personnelles, veuillez nous contacter à l’adresse suivante : legal@firalis.com. CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés.


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/conditions-generales-de-vente/
Conditions générales de vente - Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Conditions générales de vente ARTICLE 1. DOMAINE D'APPLICATION - OPPOSABILITÉ Les présentes Conditions Générales de Vente (ci-après dénommées « CGV »), régissent les relations contractuelles (ci-après « le Contrat ») entre la société ci-après identifiée dans l’Offre (telle que définie à l’article 2 ci-après), ci-après dénommée « La Société » et ses clients, dénommés « le Client », ensemble dénommés « les Parties », dans le cadre de la fourniture de prestations d’analyses (ci-après « l’Analyse »). En signant le Devis établi par la Société, ou en commandant en référence à un tel Devis, le Client : – Accepte ces CGV – Accepte que les présentes CGV, éventuellement précisées dans le Devis, constituent le contrat entre les parties, à l’exclusion de toute autre stipulation contenue dans tout autre document, sauf convention contraire négociée et précisée dans un contrat spécifique écrit. Toute dérogation aux présentes CGV devra être mentionnée dans le « Devis » (tel qu’il est défini ci-dessous) ou être signalée dans un document écrit signé par une personne dûment habilitée à représenter la Société. Dans le cas contraire, toute disposition de quelque nature que ce soit proposée par le Client, à quelque moment et sous quelque forme que ce soit, dérogerait aux présentes CGV sera rejetée et considérée comme nulle. ARTICLE 2. COMMANDES Toute Analyse ou toute commande de produit donne lieu à l’émission d’une offre écrite par la Société (ci-après dénommée « le Devis » ou « l’Offre ») soit sur papier (fax ou coursier), soit sur support électronique, à laquelle sont ci-joint les présentes CGV. L’acceptation de l’Offre par le Client, entraînant acceptation des présentes CGV, restituées sur support papier ou électronique, entraîne la conclusion de la Commande. L’Offre précise sa durée de validité. Toute commande entraîne l’acceptation pleine et entière sans dérogations aux présentes CGV. L’Offre complète ou peut modifier les présentes CGV et constitue à ce titre les conditions applicables au Contrat. L’exécution de l’Analyse ne peut commencer, après la réception par la Société de l’Offre acceptée, que si la Société a reçu les échantillons devant être analysés ainsi que l’ensemble des informations identifiées dans l’Offre. Toute prestation supplémentaire demandée par le Client sur des échantillons reçus par la Société générera une nouvelle Offre et sera traitée comme une nouvelle Commande pouvant également entraîner de nouveaux délais d’exécution. ARTICLE 3. PRIX ET CONDITIONS DE PAIEMENT Les prix sont établis sur la base des données fournies par le Client et pour des conditions normales d’exécution de la prestation. L’Analyse ou la vente des produits s’effectuent aux tarifs en vigueur au jour de l’Offre, prix hors taxes. Les taxes applicables sont celles en vigueur à la date de facturation. Toute taxe, droit ou autre prestation à payer en vertu de la réglementation française et communautaire, soit en provenance d’un pays d’importation, soit d’un pays de transit, sera à la charge du Client. Sauf mention contraire dans nos Devis, Confirmations de commande ou Factures, le paiement est exigible dans les trente (30) jours à compter de la date de facturation, par virement bancaire, à l’adresse de paiement mentionnée sur la Facture. Toute facture restant impayée après la date d’échéance portera intérêt au taux de un pour cent (1%) par mois ou trois fois le taux d’intérêt maximum autorisé par la loi applicable, selon le plus élevé des deux, et une indemnité forfaitaire pour frais de recouvrement d’un montant de 40 € (quarante euros), avec faculté pour la Société de mettre en attente toutes les commandes en cours et de demander le remboursement de tous les frais engagés pour recouvrer les sommes dues, excédant le montant des frais de recouvrement mentionnés ci-dessus. Toute contestation de facture par le Client devra être notifiée à la Société par courrier recommandé au plus tard dans les 30 jours à compter de la facturation. ARTICLE 4. OBLIGATIONS DU CLIENT DANS LA LIVRAISON D'ÉCHANTILLONS OU DE MATÉRIAUX Les échantillons ou matériaux doivent être dans un état permettant sans difficulté la préparation de rapports/analyses ou la production de produits commandés. La Société est en droit de procéder à un examen initial des échantillons ou des matériaux pour vérifier leur état avant de traiter les échantillons, d’établir un procès-verbal ou de les utiliser en production. En cas de mauvaise qualité ou quantité de l’échantillon, la Société peut refuser d’exécuter la prestation de service. Le Client dûment informé pourra procéder à l’envoi d’un nouvel échantillon ou d’un échantillon complémentaire. Il est de la responsabilité du client d’assurer la conformité aux réglementations sur les déchets dangereux, y compris en ce qui concerne l’information, le transport et l’élimination et d’informer le personnel ou les représentants de la société des problèmes de santé et de sécurité des échantillons, y compris tout toxique connu ou suspecté. S’il s’agit d’une étude clinique, le Client certifie que les échantillons ont été prélevés dans le cadre de cette étude et qu’il a obtenu le consentement des patients. ARTICLE 5. DROITS DE PROPRIÉTÉ SUR LE MATÉRIEL ÉCHANTILLON Le Client conserve la propriété des échantillons. Le Client autorise la Société à utiliser gratuitement les échantillons pour effectuer l’analyse, et précisera dans sa commande si, après analyse, l’échantillon doit être retourné, détruit ou conservé en stock dans ce cas la durée du stock doit être fixé), le Client supporte intégralement le coût d’un tel choix. Sauf demande spécifique incluse dans l’Offre (retour des échantillons aux frais du Client, etc.) les échantillons seront conservés pendant 3 mois à compter de la date de réception des résultats d’analyse par le Client, puis détruits. En cas de retour des échantillons par la Société, tous les frais de transport, d’assurance et d’emballage seront à la charge du Client (à inclure dans le Devis si possible). La Société ne sera pas responsable en cas de détérioration de l’échantillon pendant le transport. La Société ne sera pas responsable en cas de détérioration de l’échantillon. ARTICLE 6. DATES DE LIVRAISON, DÉLAIS D'EXECUTION Les dates de livraison et les délais d’exécution sont indiqués dans l’offre. Dans le cas où la réalisation de l’étude de service nécessite des éléments matériels ou immatériels, en possession du Client et devant être transmis à la Société, l’application des délais exprimés dans le Devis ne court qu’à compter de la réception de ces éléments par l’Entreprise. Les résultats sont généralement envoyés par d’autres moyens électroniques, à l’attention des personnes indiquées par le client dans la commande, dans les meilleurs délais après la fin de l’analyse. Les données brutes seront transmises au Client selon la modalité précisée dans l’Offre. Les données brutes, le cahier de laboratoire et autres documents ou données critiques associés au projet seront conservés au sein de la Société pendant 5 ans. En cas de sous-traitance, les originaux des rapports du sous-traitant justifiant les résultats seraient remis sur simple demande du Client. Toute analyse est considérée comme entièrement réalisée à compter de la date de fourniture des livrables et d’un rapport final répondant aux critères de qualité usuels en la matière. ARTICLE 7. TRANSFERT DE PROPRIÉTÉ LE TRANSFERT DE PROPRIÉTÉ ET LE DROIT D’USAGE DE NOS TRAVAUX, RAPPORTS D’ANALYSE ET PRODUITS SERONT SOUMIS AU PAIEMENT INTÉGRAL PRÉALABLE. Si le Client souhaite se référer sous quelque forme ou support que ce soit à l’accréditation ou au rapport d’analyse, il devra demander au préalable l’autorisation de la Société, qui sera libre de déterminer s’il pourra être identifié, et le cas échéant les règles à suivre. Le Client garantit la Société contre toutes les conséquences, de quelque nature que ce soit, d’une publication/diffusion du rapport d’analyse, par exemple dans le cas où cela causerait un préjudice à un tiers ou à la Société, et couvrira la Société de toute demande d’indemnisation pour réparer tout dommage résultant d’une telle publication/diffusion. ARTICLE 8. GARANTIES LIMITÉES ET RESPONSABILITÉS La Société garantit au Client que la Prestation est réalisée conformément aux spécifications énoncées dans le Devis. Pour la réalisation de la Prestation, la Société est tenue par une obligation de moyens. Un rapport d’analyse préliminaire et/ou un extrait de rapport serait remis sur simple demande du Client. Toutefois, étant donné qu’il ne comprend pas toutes les analyses demandées, le rapport ne saurait engager la responsabilité légale de la Société. Le Client est responsable du bon acheminement des échantillons envoyés à la Société pour analyses. Sauf accord écrit contraire de la part de la Société, la Société décline toute responsabilité en cas de perte ou de dommage pouvant survenir à tout échantillon en transit. Le Client sera à tout moment responsable de la sécurité, de l’emballage et de l’assurance de l’échantillon depuis son expédition jusqu’à sa livraison aux bureaux ou aux laboratoires de la Société. Sauf convention écrite expresse entre toutes les parties, la relation contractuelle est exclusivement entre le Client et la Société. Il n’y aura pas de tiers bénéficiaire ou de garantie collatérale relative à toute commande et le client doit indemniser et tenir la Société indemne de et contre toutes les réclamations de tiers de quelque manière que ce soit concernant le client ou la commande par le client. La Société (ainsi que ses travailleurs, employés de bureau, employés, représentants, gérants, dirigeants, administrateurs, agents et consultants et tous les partenaires et affiliés de la Société), ne sera responsable qu’en présence d’un dommage direct et immédiat prouvé causé par les faute dans le cadre de l’exécution d’une commande et seulement si la Société en a reçu notification par écrit au plus tard six (6) mois après la date à laquelle le client a eu connaissance de la réclamation concernée. Les parties indemnisantes de la société ne seront pas responsables de toute perte ou dommage indirect, direct ou consécutif (y compris, mais sans s’y limiter, la perte d’activité, de bénéfices, de clientèle, d’opportunités commerciales ou similaire) subi par le client ou par un tiers. ARTICLE 9. ANALYSES RÉPÉTÉES Les objections aux résultats des tests peuvent être faites dans les trente (30) jours suivant la réception des résultats par le Client. Toutefois, à moins qu’il ne s’avère que les résultats de l’analyse répétée ne correspondent pas à ceux de la première, le Client supportera les frais de l’essai ou de l’examen répété. De plus, une analyse répétée ne sera possible que si la Société dispose d’une quantité suffisante de l’échantillon original lorsqu’elle reçoit l’objection du Client. Sinon, le client devra payer tous les frais, y compris les frais d’échantillonnage, de transport, d’analyse et d’élimination pour la nouvelle analyse. Toute contestation sera traitée conformément aux dispositions prévues dans la procédure interne de gestion des réclamations. Cette procédure est disponible sur simple demande à quality@firalis.com . ARTICLE 10. FORCE MAJEURE La Société ne peut être tenue responsable des retards, erreurs, dommages ou autres problèmes causés par des événements ou des circonstances qui sont imprévus ou hors du contrôle raisonnable de la Société, ou qui résultent du respect des demandes gouvernementales, des lois et règlements (y compris tout événement tel que défini comme force majeure par la jurisprudence française, par exemple refus d’agrément, etc.). ARTICLE 11. CONFIDENTIALITÉ La Société s’engage à garder confidentiel le rapport d’analyse et ne pourra l’utiliser ou le divulguer à un tiers pour quelque raison que ce soit, sauf en vue de prouver l’exécution des travaux et d’obtenir une indemnité afférente, ou à la demande d’une autorité administrative compétente ou pour exécuter une décision de justice. La Société s’engage à garder confidentielles toutes les informations techniques, commerciales, financières ou autres qui lui seraient communiquées dans le cadre de l’exécution de l’analyse, et identifiées comme étant confidentielles par le Client. Le Client s’engage à garder confidentielles toutes les informations techniques, commerciales, financières ou autres dont il pourrait avoir connaissance dans le cadre de l’exécution de l’analyse par la Société, ainsi que sur la composition des produits et logiciels livrés par la Société. ARTICLE 12. IMPARTIALITÉ La Société et tous ses employés s’engagent à exécuter leurs services de manière indépendante et impartiale. Le Client s’interdit tout acte portant atteinte à l’impartialité ou à l’indépendance de la Société ou de ses préposés. ARTICLE 13. LOI APPLICABLE ET JURIDICTION La relation contractuelle entre la Société et le Client est soumise au droit français. Tout litige survenant quant à la validité, l’interprétation, la conclusion, l’exécution ou la résiliation du contrat sera de la compétence exclusive du tribunal de commerce du lieu du siège social de la société ayant accepté la commande en question. La reproduction ou l’utilisation de la marque d’accréditation COFRAC du laboratoire est interdite. CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés.


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2024/02/14/the-role-of-bioanalytical-testing-in-drug-development/
The role of bioanalytical testing in drug development We value your privacy We
use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or
content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our
use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences
We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions.
You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent
category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on
your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of
the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required
to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or
adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally
identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help
perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on
social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features.
No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how
visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on
metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No
cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and
analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a
better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR The role of
bioanalytical testing in drug development In the realm of pharmaceuticals,
where innovation meets critical healthcare needs, bioanalytical testing
emerges as an indispensable tool in the drug development process. In this
article, we delve into the intricacies of bioanalytical testing, shedding
light on its significance and contribution to advancing modern medicine.
Bioanalytical testing encompasses a spectrum of techniques and methodologies
aimed at quantifying the presence of drugs and their metabolites in biological
matrices. From blood and urine to tissues and cells, these analyses provide
invaluable insights into a drug’s pharmacokinetic profile, elucidating its
absorption, distribution, metabolism, and excretion (ADME) characteristics. By
meticulously assessing drug concentrations over time, researchers can decipher
how a compound behaves within the body, guiding dose optimization and
therapeutic regimen design. One of the primary objectives of bioanalytical
testing is to ensure that investigational drugs meet regulatory requirements
before they can be administered to patients. Regulatory agencies such as the
Food and Drug Administration (FDA) mandate thorough bioanalytical assessments
to evaluate the safety and efficacy of pharmaceutical products. By analyzing
drug levels and pharmacokinetic parameters in preclinical and clinical
studies, researchers can understand a drug’s performance, facilitating
regulatory approval and commercialization. Moreover, bioanalytical testing
plays a role in supporting preclinical research and development efforts.
During the early stages of drug discovery, scientists rely on these analyses
to screen potential drug candidates, assess their pharmacological properties,
and prioritize promising leads for further investigation. By employing
sophisticated analytical techniques such as liquid chromatography-mass
spectrometry (LC-MS) and enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA),
researchers can accurately quantify drug concentrations in biological samples
with precision and sensitivity. Bioanalytical testing holds immense importance
in the context of personalized medicine and patient care. By tailoring drug
dosages to individual patients based on their unique pharmacokinetic profiles,
clinicians can optimize therapeutic outcomes while minimizing the risk of
adverse reactions. This precision dosing approach relies on bioanalytical data
obtained through therapeutic drug monitoring (TDM), allowing healthcare
providers to make informed decisions regarding drug selection, dosing
adjustments, and treatment optimization. Furthermore, bioanalytical testing
plays a crucial role in post-marketing surveillance and pharmacovigilance
efforts. Even after a drug has been approved for commercial use, ongoing
monitoring of its safety and efficacy remains paramount. By continuously
evaluating drug concentrations in patient populations and monitoring for
potential adverse effects, regulatory agencies and pharmaceutical companies
can swiftly identify and address safety concerns, ensuring the continued well-
being of patients. Share this article on your socials Contact us Subscribe to
our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD
kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS ©
2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2024/02/14/firalis-molecular-precision-to-exhibit-during-rna-leaders-europe-congress/
FMP to exhibit during RNA Leaders Europe Congress | Event We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Firalis Molecular Precision to exhibit during RNA Leaders Europe Congress Huningue, 14/02/2024 – Firalis Molecular Precision announces today its participation in the RNA Leaders Europe Congress. This premier event, renowned for its pivotal role in shaping the future of RNA development, will convene the most innovative companies with the right partners from March 13 th to 14th in Basel, Switzerland. RNA Leaders Europe Congress serves as a dynamic platform uniting leading experts, innovators, and industry stakeholders to drive innovation and collaboration in RNA research and development. As a trusted partner in advancing RNA therapeutics, Firalis Molecular Precision is excited to contribute to this transformative dialogue. Find Firalis Molecular Precision at Booth 35 where it will showcase its scientific expertise in leveraging multi-omics technologies to propel RNA innovation forward. Our experts will be available to engage with attendees, offering solutions tailored to their specific research projects and objectives: – Comprehensive multi-omics analyses – Target identification and validation – Biomarker discovery – Drug repurposing strategies – Personalized medicine approaches Find more information on the event and join us at RNA Leaders Europe (informaconnect.com) About Firalis Molecular Precision Firalis Molecular Precision (FMP) is a fast-growing CRO & CDMO, providing advanced multi-omics solutions and tailored contract research services to the Life Sciences sector. With headquarters in Huningue, France, and a presence in Cambridge, MA, USA, FMP is renowned for its commitment to innovation and excellence. Leveraging cutting-edge technologies, FMP offers a comprehensive suite of bioanalytical services encompassing biobanking, multiomics-driven analyses (including genomics, proteomics, transcriptomics, lipidomics, and metabolomics), as well as omic data analysis, assay development, and custom in vitro diagnostic (IVD) kit manufacturing. Our mission is to empower healthcare professionals, researchers, and biopharmaceutical entities with the tools and solutions they need to make progress towards better patient care and a more personalized medicine. Share this article on your socials Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2024/02/14/firalis-molecular-precision-to-attend-bio-europe-spring-2024/
Firalis Molecular Precision to attend BIO-Europe Spring® 2024 We value your
privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized
ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent
to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent
Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform
certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under
each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary"
are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic
functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary
cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as
providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies
do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display.
Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like
sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting
feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics
Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the
website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number
of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display.
Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key
performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user
experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Firalis
Molecular Precision to attend BIO-Europe Spring 2024 Huningue, 14/02/2024 –
Firalis Molecular Precision, today announced that it will be attending 18th
annual BIO-Europe Spring taking place March 18–20, 2023 in Barcelona, Spain.
The event is expected to bring together over 3,700 executives from biotech,
pharma and finance companies to engage in 20,000+ one-to-one meetings. BIO-
Europe Spring is the place to meet the world under one roof and discover the
latest innovations which will advance the medicines of tomorrow. EBD Group is
committed to providing a forum for the global biopharma community to come
together. That is why this year’s event will also feature three days of
digital partnering in the week following the in-person event. To schedule a
meeting with Firalis Molecular Precision’s experts, register now at
https://informaconnect.com/bioeurope-spring/ About BIO-Europe Spring Over the
years, BIO-Europe Spring has become Europe’s largest springtime partnering
event. Its international reach makes it a one of a kind offering and gateway
to the global life science community. The event will cater to the needs of the
entire value chain, start-up and innovator educational programs, industry
trends and outlooks from KOLs, company pitches, professional partnering
meetings as well as various networking opportunities are part of the ROI
proven feature set. BIO-Europe Spring is produced by EBD Group, the leading
partnering firm for the global biotechnology industry, with the support of the
Biotechnology Innovation Organization (BIO). About Firalis Molecular Precision
Firalis Molecular Precision (FMP) is a fast-growing CRO & CDMO, providing
advanced multi-omics solutions and tailored contract research services to the
Life Sciences sector. With headquarters in Huningue, France, and a presence in
Cambridge, MA, USA, FMP is renowned for its commitment to innovation and
excellence. Leveraging cutting-edge technologies, FMP offers a comprehensive
suite of bioanalytical services encompassing biobanking, multiomics-driven
analyses (including genomics, proteomics, transcriptomics, lipidomics, and
metabolomics), as well as omic data analysis, assay development, and custom in
vitro diagnostic (IVD) kit manufacturing. Our mission is to empower healthcare
professionals, researchers, and biopharmaceutical entities with the tools and
solutions they need to make progress towards better patient care and a more
personalized medicine. Share this article on your socials Contact us Subscribe
to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development
IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy
GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2024/01/17/leveraging-multi-omics-to-advance-precision-medicine/
Leveraging multi-omics to advance precision medicine | Insights We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Leveraging multi-omics to advance precision medicine Precision medicine is revolutionizing the healthcare industry by tailoring treatments to individual patients based on their genetic makeup, lifestyle, and environment. Multi-omics, which encompass genomics, transcriptomics, proteomics, metabolomics, and microbiomics, are playing a pivotal role in advancing precision medicine. They provide a comprehensive understanding of an individual’s biology, paving the way for more accurate diagnoses and personalized treatment plans. Understanding genomics Genomics involves the study of an individual’s complete set of DNA, including all of their genes and genetic material. By analyzing a patient’s genome, researchers and healthcare providers can identify genetic variations that may predispose individuals to certain diseases or influence their response to particular medications. Leveraging genomic data allows for the development of targeted therapies and interventions that are tailored to an individual’s genetic profile. Understanding transcriptomics Transcriptomics focuses on the study of an individual’s entire set of RNA molecules, providing valuable insights into gene expression patterns. By analyzing the transcriptome, researchers can identify specific genes that are overexpressed or underexpressed in certain disease states. This information is crucial for understanding the underlying molecular mechanisms of diseases and identifying potential targets for precision treatments. Understanding proteomics Proteomics involves the comprehensive study of all proteins within an individual’s cells, tissues, or bodily fluids. Understanding the proteome enables researchers to identify specific protein biomarkers associated with various diseases, allowing for early disease detection and monitoring of treatment response. Furthermore, proteomic analysis facilitates the development of targeted therapies that aim to modulate specific protein pathways involved in disease progression. Understanding metabolomics Metabolomics focuses on the study of an individual’s comprehensive set of small-molecule metabolites, providing critical insights into metabolic pathways and cellular processes. By analyzing the metabolome, researchers can identify metabolic signatures associated with specific diseases and gain a deeper understanding of how an individual’s metabolism is affected by various environmental factors and lifestyle choices. This information is invaluable for tailoring dietary interventions and personalized lifestyle modifications to optimize health outcomes. One of the key challenges in leveraging multi-omics is integrating and interpreting diverse sets of omics data to derive meaningful insights. Advanced bioinformatics and computational tools are essential for processing large-scale omics data, identifying biomolecular interactions, and uncovering intricate relationships between different omics layers. By integrating genomics, transcriptomics, proteomics and metabolomics data, researchers can gain a holistic understanding of an individual’s molecular profile, paving the way for more precise diagnostics and targeted therapeutic interventions. The integration of multi-omics data holds the potential to transform the future of medicine, enabling the development of innovative therapies and interventions that aim to optimize health outcomes and improve patient care. Share this article on your socials Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2024/01/05/elevating-services-through-the-cell-lines-in-the-21st-century-symposium/
Elevating biobanking and genomics services We value your privacy We use
cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or
content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our
use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences
We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions.
You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent
category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on
your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of
the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required
to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or
adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally
identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help
perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on
social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features.
No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how
visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on
metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No
cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and
analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a
better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Elevating
biobanking and genomics services through the “Cell Lines in the 21st Century”
Symposium As we embark on a new year filled with boundless energy and
determination, we stay focused on and committed to staying at the forefront of
advancements in multi-omics. Thus, we’d like to announce that our Business
Development Manager – Europe, Marjolaine Rouard, is gearing up for the
upcoming symposium, “ Cell Lines in the 21st Century: Challenges and
Opportunities for Reproducible Research .” Organized by the Swiss Institute of
Bioinformatics (SIB), this symposium, scheduled for January 11th, 2024, is set
to be a pivotal event in our journey towards mastering the intricacies of cell
line handling. It is a gathering of international experts dedicated to
unraveling the complexities of this evolving field. At the heart of the
symposium are discussions on best practices in cell line management and
authentication. It will also shine a spotlight on the crucial issue of cell
line misidentification or cross-contamination. It’s a unique opportunity for
us to delve into the latest strategies and innovations that will shape the
future of the healthcare industry and enhance our cell line handling
expertise. Mastery of these best practices is not just a goal but a necessity
for delivering top-notch biobanking and genomics services. The knowledge
gained from this event will undoubtedly elevate our capabilities, ensuring we
provide our clients with the highest quality and most custom services. About
Firalis Molecular Precision Firalis Molecular Precision (FMP) is an emerging
omics-powered CRO (Contract Research Organization) based in Huningue, France
and in Cambridge, USA. FMP uses the latest cutting-edge technologies and a
range of services (biobanking, multiomics-powered bioanalysis, bioinformatics,
assay development and kit manufacturing) to provide support in biomarker
discovery, clinical testing and IVD kit production endeavours. Visit us at:
http://www.firalismolecularprecision.com . or contact our experts. Connect
with us on LinkedIn and Twitter . Share this article on your socials Contact
us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay
development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice
Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved.
Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/12/08/novaseq-x-plus-sequencing-system-acquisition/
NovaSeq X Plus Sequencing System Acquisition We value your privacy We use
cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or
content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our
use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences
We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions.
You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent
category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on
your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of
the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required
to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or
adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally
identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help
perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on
social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features.
No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how
visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on
metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No
cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and
analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a
better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Firalis
Molecular Precision announces strategic acquisition of Illumina NovaSeq X Plus
Sequencing System. Huningue, FR – 08/12/2023 Firalis Molecular Precision
(“FMP” or “the company”), a fast-growing Contract Research Organization (CRO)
providing multi-omics solutions for biomarker discovery, clinical testing and
IVD kit production, announces a strategic leap in its genomics capabilities
through the acquisition of the Illumina NovaSeq X Plus Sequencing System (“the
technology” or “it”). The production-scale sequencer complements FMP’s
existing range of next-generation sequencing technologies, contributing to a
comprehensive suite of solutions that cater to the diverse needs of FMP’s
clients. It will empower FMP to significantly increase its capacity to process
large volumes of genomic data swiftly and efficiently, providing clients with
faster and more comprehensive sequencing services. Indeed, the primary focus
of this initiative is to assist clients in their research endeavors. FMP aims
to provide researchers, healthcare professionals and academic organizations
with the advanced tools they need to accelerate discoveries across diverse
therapeutic areas. The Illumina NovaSeq X Plus Sequencing System is powered by
XLEAP-SBS chemistry, a sequencing by synthesis (SBS)-based chemistry,
representing a leap forward in sequencing technology. This chemistry ensures
not only high throughput but also accuracy and reliability in genomic data
analysis. The technology leverages the DRAGEN Bio-IT Platform, a cutting-edge
software enabling fast and efficient next-generation sequencing data analysis.
“ The acquisition of the Illumina® NovaSeq X Plus is a major step in the
development of our NGS service offerings,” says Dr. Eric Schordan, FMP’s CSO.
“We will be able to provide to our customers the highest NGS sample analysis
quality combined to a competitive cost in France by our outstanding team”.
Disclaimer This press release may contain forward-looking statements within
the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995, including
statements regarding the anticipated benefits, capabilities, and performance
of the Illumina NovaSeq X Plus Sequencing System, as well as FMP’s
expectations, beliefs, plans, intentions, and strategies regarding the
acquisition and utilization of this technology. Such forward-looking
statements involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties, and other factors
that may cause the actual results, performance, or achievements of FMP to be
materially different from any future results, performance, or achievements
expressed or implied by these forward-looking statements. These risks and
uncertainties include, but are not limited to, the potential impact of
external factors such as regulatory changes, market conditions, and
technological developments, as well as the inherent risks associated with the
adoption of new technologies. FMP undertakes no obligation to update or revise
any forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances that may
arise after the date of this press release, except as required by law. Readers
are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements,
which speak only as of the date hereof. This disclaimer is in addition to, and
not in lieu of, any other disclaimers or limitations of liability contained in
any other communications of FMP or its representatives. About Firalis
Molecular Precision Firalis Molecular Precision (FMP) is an emerging omics-
powered CRO (Contract Research Organization) based in Huningue, France and in
Cambridge, USA. FMP uses the latest cutting-edge technologies and a range of
services (biobanking, multiomics-powered bioanalysis, bioinformatics, assay
development and kit manufacturing) to provide support in biomarker discovery,
clinical testing and IVD kit production endeavours. Visit us at:
http://www.firalismolecularprecision.com . or contact our experts. Connect
with us on LinkedIn and Twitter . Firalis Molecular Precision Media Relations
E-mail: marketing@firalis.com Share this article on your socials Contact us
Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay
development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice
Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved.
Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/11/08/explore-ht-panel-acquisition/
Firalis Molecular Precision acquires Olink® new Explore HT panel We value your
privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized
ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent
to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent
Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform
certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under
each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary"
are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic
functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary
cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as
providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies
do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display.
Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like
sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting
feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics
Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the
website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number
of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display.
Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key
performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user
experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Firalis
Molecular Precision acquires Olink® Explore HT panel, a First in France
November 6, 2023 Huningue (France) — Firalis Molecular Precision, Inc. (“FMP”
or the “Company”), a pioneering Contract Research Organization (CRO) providing
multi-omics solutions for biomarker discovery, announces its latest
acquisition in the field of proteomics research. With the recent acquisition
of the innovative Olink Proteomics, Inc. (“Olink”) Explore HT panel, the
company becomes the first in France to offer this cutting-edge technology to
its clients. The Olink® Explore HT panel represents a significant leap forward
in next generation proteomics, enabling researchers to measure over 5,300
protein biomarkers in only 2µl of sample accurately and with a high
throughput, unveiling the human proteome in the blink of an eye. Combining the
Olink® Explore HT panel with its existing repertoire of Olink® panels , FMP
shows its dedication to innovation and staying at the forefront of
technological advancements. With this disruptive tool, researchers will now be
able to accelerate their discovery of new protein biomarkers with
unprecedented precision and uncover important biological invaluable insights
into disease mechanisms and therapeutic opportunities. As part of the official
launch, FMP invites researchers and scientists from various fields to explore
the possibilities of the Olink® Explore HT panel in their research projects
and is granting a promotional offer for the first two analyses on the panel.
The company’s team of experts is eager to collaborate, offering guidance and
support to maximize the potential of this cutting-edge technology. About
Firalis Molecular Precision Firalis Molecular Precision (FMP) is an emerging
multiomics-powered CRO (Contract Research Organization) based in Huningue,
France and in Cambridge, USA. FMP uses the latest cutting-edge technologies
and a range of services (biobanking, multiomics-powered bioanalysis,
bioinformatics, assay development and kit manufacturing) to provide support
along the entire drug development process, from the discovery phase to the
approval phase. FMP also provides expertise and support to biotech and pharma
companies for their biomarker discovery and monitoring endeavours. For more
information, go to http://www.firalismolecularprecision.com . or contact our
experts . Connect with us on LinkedIn and Twitter . Share this article on your
socials : Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics
Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions
Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights
reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/11/06/merscope-grant-winner-announced/
MERSCOPE Grant Winner Announced | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Firalis Molecular Precision announces MERSCOPE Grant Program winner Winner of the Grant Program in collaboration with Vizgen : Dr. Léo Laoubi Huningue, FR. November 6th, 2023 – Firalis Molecular Precision, CAP-accredited global CRO and provider of multi-omics solutions for biomarker discovery and drug development, announces today the winner of its first ever MERSCOPE® Platform Grant Program, in collaboration with Vizgen , the life science company dedicated to improving human health by visualizing single-cell spatial genomics information. The grant was open to researchers in Europe and was awarded to the researcher whose cancer research project displayed scientific excellence and innovation. The selection process involved a thorough evaluation by our expert decision committee, comprised of Dr. Thierry Massfelder, PhD, HDR, Research Director at Inserm, Deputy Director at the Inserm/Université de Strasbourg Joint Research Unit (UMR) 1260 ‘Regenerative NanoMedicine’, and Dr. Marco Antonio Mendoza Parra, PhD, CR1 – CNRS, Team Leader of SysFate ( https://www.sysfate.org/ ) at Genoscope – Centre National de Séquençage/UMR8030/LISSB. The grant winners is Dr. Léo LAOUBI, a seasoned immunologist with 8 years’ experience in private and academic research groups. Dr. Laoubi co-authored several peer-reviewed original articles and reviews in immunology. Dr. Laoubi’s current research centers on unraveling the immune response associated to cancer treatments. His primary focus lies in predicting treatment responses and deciphering resistance mechanisms to develop targeted interventions. In this context, Dr. LAOUBI notably investigates the spatial immune cell organization in tumors of triple negative breast cancer (TNBC) patients before a PD-1/CTLA-4 blockade adjuvant immunotherapy. The goal is to identify predictive biomarkers of the immunotherapy such as unique cell clusters or gene signatures. “ This project concerns the triple negative breast cancer, a public health issue, and specifically the identification of predictive biomarkers of the immune checkpoint inhibitors response and resistance ,” said Dr. Thierry Massfelder, expert decision committee member. “ The hypothesis, the objectives, and the experimental design on human samples with the MERSCOPE platform, with a validation at the proteomic level, are all very well presented. The project clearly has all the assets to succeed. ” For his work, Dr. Léo Laoubi has been selected as the winner of the Firalis Molecular Precision x Vizgen Grant Program and will leverage Vizgen’s cutting-edge MERSCOPE technology and the expertise of Firalis Molecular Precision to advance his research project. About Firalis Molecular Precision Firalis Molecular Precision (FMP) is an emerging multiomics-powered CRO (Contract Research Organization) based in Huningue, France and in Cambridge, USA. FMP uses the latest cutting-edge technologies and a range of services (biobanking, multiomics-powered bioanalysis, bioinformatics, assay development and kit manufacturing) to provide support along the entire drug development process, from the discovery phase to the approval phase. FMP also provides expertise and support to biotech and pharma companies for their biomarker discovery and monitoring endeavours. For more information, go to http://www.firalismolecularprecision.com . or contact our experts . Connect with us on LinkedIn and Twitter . Share this article on your socials : Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/11/06/biotechx-europe/
BioTechX Europe | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR BioTechX Europe BioTechX Europe 2023, one of the biggest healthcare events in Europe, happened in Basel, Switzerland, from October 4 to 6, 2023. The event brought together experts to talk about how technology is changing the way we do healthcare, including how artificial intelligence is helping in the pharmaceutical industry. They also discussed what might happen with smarter technology in healthcare in the future. BioTechX Europe proved to be a significant event in our calendar as we had the opportunity to showcase our cutting-edge multi-omics solutions. As a global CRO service-provider, we are committed to advancing the field of precision medicine, and our participation at this congress allowed us to do just that. Multi-omics is a rapidly evolving field that involves the integration of various -omics data, such as genomics , transcriptomics , proteomics , and metabolomics , to provide a comprehensive understanding of complex biological systems. We unveiled our latest technology portfolio additions that we leverage to provide cutting-edge multi-omics solutions to our clients, and their immense potential to revolutionize research in fields such as personalized medicine, biomarker discovery, and disease understanding. By integrating multiple layers of biological data, our solutions enable researchers to gain a more holistic perspective on complex biological processes and systems. BioTechX Europe was also the perfect opportunity for our experts to engage with fellow innovators and potential collaborators to gain invaluable insights into advancements in the field. Share this article on your socials : Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/11/02/cap-accreditation/
CAP Accreditation | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR CAP Accreditation Firalis Molecular Precision is particularly honored to have obtained accreditation from the College of American Pathologists as a testing laboratory and proudly takes the lead as the first establishment in France to be granted the CAP Laboratory Accreditation. This rewards the ongoing efforts undertaken for years by our quality and operational teams to meet the requirements of this gold standard. By being the first in France to have this accreditation, it is a great opportunity for our company to strengthen its CRO activities with overseas pharmaceutical and biotech companies by offering them the ability to perform cutting-edge genomics and proteomics analyses in France on patient cohorts, in accordance with the highest FDA standards. Find us in the CAP-Accredited Laboratory database. Know more about the CAP Accreditation. Contact our team for more information or to schedule a meeting. Share this article on your socials : Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin Loading Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/11/02/bio-europe-2023/
BIO-Europe 2023 - Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use
cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or
content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our
use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences
We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions.
You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent
category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on
your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of
the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required
to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or
adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally
identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help
perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on
social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features.
No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how
visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on
metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No
cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and
analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a
better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR BIO-Europe
2023 Days Hours Minutes Seconds Firalis Molecular Precision will be attending
the upcoming BIO-Europe partnering event on November 6-8 in Munich, Germany.
BIO-Europe brings together more than 5,500 participants from 60 different
countries and 2,220+ companies, establishing itself as the premier European
gathering of biopharmaceutical experts. During this event, leaders in the
field of life sciences come together to exchange their invaluable knowledge
and insights, providing a glimpse into the most recent industry developments
and innovations. Our experts are delighted to have the opportunity to connect
with you during the event and discuss your research needs and goals in disease
biomarker discovery and monitoring and drug/treatment development and how we
can achieve them via our multi-omics solutions. Our experts will be available
for one-on-one discussions throughout the event. Contact our team to have more
information or to schedule a meeting. Share this article on your socials :
Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking
Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice
Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved.
Twitter Linkedin Loading Comments...


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/08/10/augusts-newsletter-is-out/
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/wp-content/uploads/2023/08/FMP-August-Newsletter-2023.pdf



 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/08/10/augusts-newsletter-is-out/
August's Newsletter is Out! - Firalis Molecular Precision We value your
privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized
ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent
to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent
Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform
certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under
each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary"
are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic
functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary
cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as
providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies
do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display.
Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like
sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting
feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics
Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the
website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number
of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display.
Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key
performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user
experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR August's
Newsletter : Revolutionizing Biomarker Discovery and Clinical Testing Through
Assay Development and Custom Kit Production In the ever-evolving realm of
biotechnology, our mission is clear: lead through innovation. This month’s
newsletter shines a spotlight on two of our pioneering services – Assay
Development and Custom Kit Production – integral to our multiomics approach
for biomarker discovery and clinical testing. Assay Development : Our Assay
Development services epitomize precision and insight. Crafted by experts,
these assays unlock the intricacies of molecular functions, pathways, and
interactions within cells. Through tailored solutions, we empower researchers
to unlock groundbreaking insights into biomarkers, drug development, and
disease mechanisms. Custom Kit Production: Tailored Tools for Progress
Innovation often requires custom solutions. Our Custom Kit Production
department produces and industrializes tailored kits for biomarker
identification, monitoring and quantification. From concept to creation, we
design bespoke kits that align perfectly with research goals. This newsletter
encapsulates our dedication to revolutionizing healthcare through Assay
Development, Custom Kit Production, and multiomics. Discover August’s
Newsletter. Share on your socials! Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter
Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production
Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis
Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/07/17/biomarkers-and-how-they-can-be-catalysts-for-personalized-care/
Biomarkers and how they can be catalysts for personalized medicine - Firalis
Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your
browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our
traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies.
Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies
to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find
detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The
cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they
are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show
more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the
basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your
consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable
data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform
certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social
media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No
cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how
visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on
metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No
cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and
analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a
better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Biomarkers
and how they can be catalysts for personalized medicine The concept of
tailoring medical treatments to individual patients based on their
characteristics, such as genetic makeup, lifestyle, and environmental factors,
is gaining traction. The latest advancement in personalized precision medicine
that we are going to discuss is biomarker identification. In this article, we
take a closer look at these valuable assisting tools, also known as
biomarkers, to find out what they are, what role they play in this framework,
and how they can be harnessed to improve patient care. What are biomarkers ?
Biomarkers are measurable indicators, such as proteins, genes, metabolites, or
other molecules, that can be used to objectively assess various physiological,
pathological, or pharmacological processes in the body. Personalized medicine
and biomarker identification are closely interconnected concepts. Personalized
medicine or precision medicine is an approach to healthcare that involves
using individual patients’ unique characteristics to provide more effective
and targeted medical treatments and interventions. In order to do that,
healthcare professionals need to gain a deeper understanding of an
individual’s disease or condition. This is where biomarkers are brought into
play. Because biomarkers are like clues in the body that help healthcare
professionals understand an individual’s health, by being analyzed, they can
be leveraged to detect the presence of a disease, develop specific therapeutic
strategies, and determine which treatments are likely to work best for an
individual, increasing the chances of successful treatment while reducing the
risk of side effects. By comparing the levels or activity of specific
biomarkers between healthy individuals and those with a disease, researchers
can identify patterns or changes associated with the disease. For example,
several studies highlighted a relationship between elevated values of KL-6 and
mortality or progression in Idiopathic Pulmonary Fibrosis (IPF). Biomarkers
can also be used to monitor treatment response and provide insights into
whether the treatment is effective or needs adjustment. They also play a
crucial role in prognosis and outcome prediction. But above all, they can be
used as indicators of disease presence or risk even before symptoms manifest.
All this data obtained from biomarker analysis helps healthcare providers
develop personalized care plans and provide appropriate support to individual
patients. This is why biomarker identification is the foundation for
personalized medicine. However, it’s important to note that biomarker research
is an active area of study, and the discovery and validation of biomarkers for
specific diseases or conditions require rigorous scientific investigation.
Researchers use a variety of techniques, including genomics, proteomics,
metabolomics, and advanced data analysis methods, to identify and characterize
biomarkers and their relevance to disease processes. In this framework,
Firalis Molecular Precision is at the forefront of providing multiomics
solutions for biomarker discovery, which involves integrating data from
multiple omics platforms such as genomics , transcriptomics , proteomics , and
metabolomics , using sophisticated bioinformatics tools and algorithms. By
doing this, we aim to obtain a more comprehensive view of the molecular
landscape associated with a disease. Leveraging the power of multiomics
advances our ability to diagnose, treat, and manage complex conditions.
References : Biomarkers Definitions Working Group Biomarkers and surrogate
endpoints: Preferred definitions and conceptual framework. Clin. Pharmacol.
Ther. 2001; 69 :89–95. doi: 10.1067/mcp.2001.113989. Stainer A, Faverio P,
Busnelli S, Catalano M, Della Zoppa M, Marruchella A, Pesci A, Luppi F.
Molecular Biomarkers in Idiopathic Pulmonary Fibrosis: State of the Art and
Future Directions. Int J Mol Sci. 2021 Jun 10;22(12):6255. doi:
10.3390/ijms22126255. PMID: 34200784; PMCID: PMC8230407. Share on your
socials! Back to News & Events overview Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter
Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production
Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis
Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/07/04/elementor-11391/
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/wp-content/uploads/2023/07/Newsletter_FMP_July_2023.pdf



 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/07/04/elementor-11391/
July's Newsletter is out! - Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy
We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or
content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our
use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences
We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions.
You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent
category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on
your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of
the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required
to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or
adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally
identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help
perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on
social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features.
No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how
visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on
metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No
cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and
analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a
better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR July's
Newsletter is out! Exciting Times Ahead: Welcoming Our New CEO and Unveiling
Our Grant Program In our July Newsletter, we announce the appointment of a new
Chief Executive Officer (CEO) who is set to lead our organization into a
promising future. Alongside this exciting development, we unveil our latest
initiative, a groundbreaking grant program that aims to propel innovation and
drive groundbreaking discovery. Introducing Our Visionary New CEO With a firm
belief in the power of exceptional leadership, we welcome Mr. Christophe Valat
as the new CEO of Firalis Molecular Precision . Boasting an illustrious career
and remarkable accomplishments within the pharma and biotech industry, Mr.
Valat brings a wealth of experience and a transformative vision to the helm.
FMP x Vizgen Grant Program: Fueling Innovations Designed to ignite innovation
and address pressing challenges in our industry, the Grant Program we have
launched will serve as a catalyst for change and a platform for the
realization of groundbreaking ideas. Through this program, we offer a chance
to EU scientists and researchers to access Vizgen’s MERSCOPE® Platform for
single-cell spatial analysis, leveraging the PanCancer Pathways (Human) or
PanNeuro Cell Type (Mouse) Predesigned Gene Panels, and comprehensive data
analysis services provided by our skilled bioinformatics team. Learn more
about the Grant Program and apply today ! Discover July’s Newsletter Share on
your socials ! Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics
Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms &
Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision,
all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/06/19/elementor-10986/
Your Trusted Olink® Explore Panel Service Provider in France - Firalis
Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your
browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our
traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies.
Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies
to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find
detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The
cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they
are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show
more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the
basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your
consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable
data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform
certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social
media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No
cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how
visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on
metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No
cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and
analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a
better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Elevating
Protein Biomarker Research with Olink® Explore Panels in France In the world
of life sciences, Olink® Explore panels have revolutionized protein biomarker
discovery. These panels allow researchers to simultaneously analyze thousands
of proteins, yielding valuable insights into disease mechanisms and
personalized medicine. When it comes to accessing Olink® Explore panels and
the expertise required for optimal results, Firalis Molecular Precision stands
out as the only qualified service provider in France. Unparalleled Expertise
and Experience Our team comprises highly skilled scientists and researchers
who possess extensive knowledge and experience in utilizing Olink® Explore
panels. Comprehensive Solutions From experimental design and sample processing
to data analysis and result interpretation, our team provides support
throughout the entire research process. Cutting-Edge Facilities and Equipment
To ensure top-quality outcomes, we have invested in state-of-the-art
facilities and cutting-edge equipment. Our laboratories are equipped with the
latest technology necessary for sample preparation, high-throughput analysis,
and data interpretation. By utilizing advanced equipment and implementing
rigorous quality control measures, we guarantee precise and reproducible
results for your research. Customization and Flexibility We understand that
every research project is unique, requiring a tailored approach to achieve
specific objectives. We offer customization and flexibility to accommodate
diverse research requirements. Whether you need panels for a specific disease
area, a particular set of biomarkers, or a combination of panels, we can
provide personalized solutions to ensure your research goals are met
effectively. Collaboration and Support Collaboration is at the core of our
service provision. We foster open communication and maintain a spirit of
partnership throughout the research process. Our team of experts is readily
available to address any queries, provide guidance, and offer scientific
support whenever needed. Partner with us to unlock the full potential of Olink
Explore panels and accelerate your scientific discoveries in the field of
protein biomarker research. Learn more about our Large-scale Protein
Identification services using Olink® technology Share on your socials! Contact
us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay
development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice
Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved.
Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/06/19/brouillon-auto/
France's Leading NGS Service Provider - Firalis Molecular Precision We value
your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve
personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept
All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All
Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently
and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all
cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as
"Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the
basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active
Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such
as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These
cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display.
Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like
sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting
feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics
Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the
website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number
of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display.
Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key
performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user
experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR France's
Leading NGS Service-Provider with Illumina's Cutting-Edge sequencing
technologies Firalis Molecular Precision has emerged as France’s leading NGS
service-provider, spearheading the genomics revolution in the country. With a
steadfast commitment to excellence, innovation, and precision, Firalis
Molecular Precision has acquired Illumina’s groundbreaking sequencing
technologies, including the NextSeq 500 , NextSeq 2000 , NovaSeq 6000 Dx , and
the highly anticipated Novaseq X-Plus . These technologies represent the
pinnacle of genomics technology and enable Firalis Molecular Precision to
deliver unparalleled precision, scalability, and efficiency to its esteemed
clientele. NextSeq 500 : The NextSeq 500 offers exceptional flexibility and
high-throughput capabilities, making it a powerful tool for a wide range of
genomic applications. With rapid turnaround times and high-quality data
output, this platform empowers researchers to delve deeper into the
complexities of the genome, unlocking new insights and accelerating scientific
discoveries. NextSeq 2000 : Building upon the success of its predecessor, the
NextSeq 2000 represents a significant advancement in NGS technology. Offering
increased sequencing capacity and enhanced data output, this platform enables
Firalis Molecular Precision to undertake large-scale genomics projects with
ease. Researchers benefit from reliable and accurate results, driving
breakthroughs in diverse fields, including cancer genomics, rare disease
research, and pharmacogenomics. NovaSeq 6000 Dx : The acquisition of the
NovaSeq 6000 Dx underscores Firalis Molecular Precision’s commitment to
precision diagnostics. This platform, specifically designed for clinical
diagnostics, ensures the highest standards of accuracy and reliability. It
empowers healthcare professionals with the tools they need to deliver
personalized medicine, enabling early disease detection, optimized treatment
strategies, and improved patient outcomes. Novaseq X-Plus (upcoming):
Anticipation surrounds the forthcoming acquisition of the Novaseq X-Plus by
Firalis Molecular Precision. This state-of-the-art platform promises enhanced
sequencing capabilities, longer read lengths, and improved accuracy. Share on
your socials! Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics
Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms &
Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision,
all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/06/19/elementor-10953/
Advancing Cancer Research - Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy
We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or
content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our
use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences
We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions.
You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent
category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on
your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of
the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required
to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or
adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally
identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help
perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on
social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features.
No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how
visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on
metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No
cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and
analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a
better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Advancing
Cancer Research: Firalis Molecular Precision Showcases Multiomic Analysis
Services at Gustave Roussy Institute Firalis Molecular Precision recently had
the honor of showcasing its comprehensive range of multiomic analysis services
at the prestigious Gustave Roussy Institute in Villejuif, France . Renowned as
Europe’s leading cancer center and recognized as the world’s third-best
oncology hospital, the Gustave Roussy Institute provides an ideal platform for
Firalis Molecular Precision to present its cutting-edge technologies and
expertise in oncology. At the forefront of the presentation was Dr. Eric
Schordan, the Chief Scientific Officer (CSO) of Firalis Molecular Precision .
With his vast knowledge and experience, Dr. Schordan captivated the audience
as he unveiled our company’s advanced sequencing technologies, designed to
analyze multiple biological molecules simultaneously. This multiomic approach
allows for a more comprehensive understanding of the complex mechanisms
underlying cancer development, progression, and response to treatment. Firalis
Molecular Precision takes immense pride in supporting such an ambitious and
dedicated institution like the Gustave Roussy Institute in its noble mission
to find a cure for cancer. By providing high-throughput sequencing
technologies and leveraging their expertise in oncology, we aim to contribute
significantly to the Institute’s ongoing efforts. As the world continues to
witness the devastating impact of cancer, the importance of collaborations and
partnerships between organizations like Firalis Molecular Precision and
institutions like the Gustave Roussy Institute cannot be overstated. By
pooling their resources, knowledge, and passion, they can accelerate
scientific advancements, uncover novel therapeutic approaches, and ultimately
bring hope to the millions of individuals affected by cancer worldwide. Share
on your socials! Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics
Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms &
Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision,
all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/06/16/elementor-10927/
Revolutionizing In Situ Spatial Analysis - Firalis Molecular Precision We
value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve
personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept
All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All
Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently
and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all
cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as
"Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the
basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active
Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such
as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These
cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display.
Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like
sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting
feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics
Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the
website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number
of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display.
Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key
performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user
experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR
Revolutionizing In Situ Spatial Analysis In the rapidly evolving field of life
sciences and biomedical research, spatial analysis has emerged as a
groundbreaking approach to understanding complex biological systems. By
analyzing the spatial relationships between cells and tissues within their
native environments, researchers can unlock new insights into disease
mechanisms, drug discovery, and personalized medicine. Recognizing the immense
potential of this technology, we are proud to announce that we have become
Europe’s first service provider of Vizgen’s MERSCOPE ® Platform for in situ
spatial analysis. Vizgen, a leading company in the field of spatial genomics,
has developed the MERSCOPE® Platform, which combines cutting-edge imaging
techniques with advanced computational algorithms. This innovative solution
allows researchers to visualize and analyze gene expression patterns within
intact tissue samples, providing a detailed map of cellular interactions and
molecular signatures. This partnership represents a significant milestone in
the field of spatial genomics. Indeed, we are proud to contribute to the
advancement of scientific research and support the quest for improved
diagnostics, targeted therapeutics, and personalized medicine. With Vizgen, we
are unlocking the power of in situ spatial analysis and revolutionizing the
way we understand the complexity of biological systems. Our team of highly
trained experts is proficient in operating the MERSCOPE® Platform and
assisting researchers with experimental design, sample preparation, and data
analysis. Share on your socials! Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter
Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production
Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis
Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/06/16/elementor-10893/
Pioneering multiomics solutions on the global stage - Firalis Molecular
Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing
experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By
clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All
Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate
efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information
about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are
categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential
for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary
Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of
this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent
preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No
cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain
functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media
platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to
display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors
interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics
such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies
to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze
the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better
user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Pioneering
multiomics solutions on the global stage - BIO2023 International Convention On
June 5-8th, our experts Sébastien Langé, US Business Developer, and Louis
Chauvière, Head of Bioinformatics Department, showcased our multiomics
solutions at BIO2023 , the renowned international convention held in Boston.
Representing Firalis Molecular Precision, they solidified our position as top
service-providers in the field. Major networking event for the biotech
ecosystem, the BIO International Convention brings together 15,000+ life
science leaders and innovators in fields such as drug discovery,
biomanufacturing, genomics, nanotechnology, and cell therapy. We were part of
the French Healthcare Pavilion and supported by Business France. Our experts
also had the exceptional opportunity to engage in discussions and knowledge-
sharing with the French Ambassador in the US Laurent Bili and the CEO of
Business France, Laurent Saint-Martin. These interactions not only showcased
our company’s capabilities but also facilitated valuable connections with key
stakeholders in the biotech industry. Share on your socials! Contact us
Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay
development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice
Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved.
Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/06/16/elementor-10881/
Expanding our international presence - Firalis Molecular Precision We value
your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve
personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept
All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All
Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently
and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all
cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as
"Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the
basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active
Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such
as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These
cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display.
Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like
sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting
feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics
Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the
website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number
of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display.
Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key
performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user
experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Expanding
our international presence : US Subsidiary Opening We are happy to announce
that we have expanded our international presence with a new operational office
in Cambridge, USA , in the heart of the world’s largest biotech hub: Kendall
Square . Our US team including Sébastien Langé , our Business Developer – US ,
is now growing alongside many young international companies and a vibrant
community. Our decision to establish a presence in the US is driven by our
vision to become the global partner of the most innovative biopharma companies
and academic organizations and foster together the development of breakthrough
diagnostics and therapeutics. We are confident that our new subsidiary will
enable us to accelerate our growth and continue to deliver exceptional value
to our clients. Stay tuned for more updates as we enter this new chapter!
Share on your socials! Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services
Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies,
Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular
Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/06/16/elementor-10871/
Joining Scientist.com - Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Expanding Access to Multiomic Solutions by joining Scientist.com As a leading Biotech CRO, we are now listed on Scientist.com, a prominent online marketplace connecting researchers and service providers. At Firalis Molecular Precision , we specialize in providing comprehensive multiomic solutions to not only biotech and pharma companies but also academic researchers and institutes. Our cutting-edge technologies and expertise in genomics, proteomics, metabolomics, and other -omics approaches enable us to deliver tailored solutions for complex research projects. Being featured on Scientist.com allows us to expand our reach and connect with a wider network of scientists and organizations seeking advanced biotech services. Visit our profile on Scientist.com to learn more about our offerings : Firalis | Public Marketplace (scientist.com) Share on your socials! Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/06/16/elementor-10863/
Grant Program Launch ft. Vizgen - Firalis Molecular Precision We value your
privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized
ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent
to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent
Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform
certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under
each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary"
are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic
functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary
cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as
providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies
do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display.
Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like
sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting
feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics
Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the
website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number
of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display.
Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key
performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user
experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR EU Grant
Program Launch Accelerating Scientific Advancements: Introducing the Firalis
Molecular Precision and Vizgen Grant Program We are thrilled to announce the
launch of a prestigious grant program, a collaborative effort between Firalis
Molecular Precision and Vizgen. This groundbreaking initiative aims to empower
researchers and scientists by providing them with unparalleled access to
cutting-edge technology and comprehensive data analysis services, facilitated
by our highly skilled bioinformatics team. At Firalis Molecular Precision, we
are renowned for our advanced multiomic solutions, offering a wide range of
services to support researchers in their quest for scientific breakthroughs.
Vizgen, on the other hand, is revolutionizing spatial genomics, providing
innovative technologies that enable the spatial visualization of molecular
interactions within tissues. By combining our expertise, we aim to provide an
unprecedented opportunity for researchers to leverage the power of multiomic
solutions and spatial genomics. The selected recipient of this grant program
will not only have access to state-of-the-art technology but will also receive
comprehensive data analysis services. Our bioinformatics team, consisting of
experienced and skilled professionals, will work closely with the recipient to
derive meaningful insights from the complex multiomic datasets generated. This
personalized support will play a pivotal role in accelerating research and
facilitating groundbreaking discoveries. To participate in this exceptional
grant program, we invite researchers and scientists to submit their abstracts
through our dedicated registration form. It is crucial to provide a compelling
overview of your research project, emphasizing its potential impact on the
scientific community. The link to the registration form can be found at the
end of this article. We encourage all interested individuals to act swiftly,
as the deadline for submissions is fast approaching. Spaces are limited, and
we anticipate a high level of interest in this program. Don’t miss out on this
unparalleled opportunity to propel your research to new heights and make a
lasting impact on your field. Click here to access the registration form: Link
to Registration Form We kindly request your assistance in spreading the word
about this Grant Program. Please share this article with colleagues, fellow
scientists and spatial biology enthusiasts. Join us on this remarkable journey
of scientific advancement! Deadline for submissions: September 15th, 2023
Share on your socials! Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services
Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies,
Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular
Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/06/16/june-newsletter-is-out/
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/wp-content/uploads/2023/06/Newsletter_FMP_June_2023.pdf



 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/06/16/june-newsletter-is-out/
June's Newsletter is out! - Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy
We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or
content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our
use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences
We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions.
You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent
category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on
your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of
the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required
to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or
adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally
identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help
perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on
social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features.
No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how
visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on
metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No
cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and
analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a
better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR June's
Newsletter is out! In the latest edition of our newsletter, we highlighted a
groundbreaking advancement in the field of lipido-metabolomics—the Absolute
lDQ® p400 HR Kit from Biocrates. This innovative kit has garnered significant
attention for its ability to revolutionize lipid profiling and metabolic
analysis, opening new doors for researchers and scientists. Lipido-
metabolomics, the study of lipid metabolism and its impact on human health and
disease, plays a crucial role in understanding various physiological and
pathological processes. It provides insights into lipid composition, lipid
classes, and their alterations, thereby shedding light on metabolic disorders,
cardiovascular diseases, and even certain cancers. Biocrates, a leading
provider of metabolomics solutions, has developed the Absolute lDQ® p400 HR
Kit, a cutting-edge technology that simplifies and enhances lipido-
metabolomics research. This kit enables comprehensive and accurate lipid
analysis, allowing scientists to delve deeper into lipid metabolism and gain a
more profound understanding of its intricate mechanisms. In our June
newsletter, we shed light on this remarkable advancement in lipido-
metabolomics, emphasizing the significant impact the Absolute lDQ® Kit can
have on scientific research and discovery. We encourage researchers,
scientists, and professionals in the field to explore the potential of this
cutting-edge technology and leverage its capabilities to unravel the mysteries
of lipid metabolism. Discover June’s Newsletter Share on your socials! Contact
us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay
development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice
Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved.
Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/2023/06/16/expanding-our-digital-reach-with-the-launch-of-a-twitter-account/
Expanding our digital reach with the Launch of a Twitter account We value your
privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized
ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent
to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent
Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform
certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under
each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary"
are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic
functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary
cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as
providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies
do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display.
Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like
sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting
feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics
Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the
website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number
of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display.
Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key
performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user
experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized
advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the
effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My
Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services
Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial
Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO
Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing
Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein
identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive
Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics /
Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services
Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About
Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Expanding
our digital reach with the Launch of a Twitter account Firalis Molecular
Precision has taken a significant step forward in enhancing its digital
presence by launching its official Twitter account. With a reputation for
cutting-edge research and innovative solutions, FMP aims to connect with a
broader audience and provide valuable insights into the world of precision
medicine through this popular social media platform. To stay connected with
Firalis Molecular Precision and gain access to cutting-edge insights,
groundbreaking research, and updates from the world of precision medicine and
multiomic solutions, be sure to follow our official Twitter account . Share on
your socials ! Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics
Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms &
Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision,
all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/company/
Company | Firalis Molecular Precision We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Menu CRO Services Biobanking Genomics Next-Generation Sequencing Single-cell Sequencing Spatial Transcriptomics Custom RT-qPCR Proteomics Olink® – large-scale protein identification Immunoassay: absolute protein quantification Ultra-sensitive Quanterix biomarker detection system Mass Spectrometry Assay Lipidomics / Metabolomics Custom R&D mass spectrometry Omic Data Analysis CDMO Services Assay Development Custom Kit Production BioProduction Regulatory Affairs About Our Company Quality Commitment Careers News & Events Contact EN FR Get to know us About Us Quality Management and Standards Contact us Subscribe to our newsletter Services Genomics Proteomics Biobanking Assay development IVD kit production Policies, Terms & Conditions Legal Notice Privacy Policy GTS © 2023 Firalis Molecular Precision, all rights reserved. Twitter Linkedin


 
https://firalismolecularprecision.com/fr/2023/06/21/lancement-de-notre-compte-twitter/
Lancement de notre compte Twitter We value your privacy We use cookies to enhance your browsing experience, serve personalized ads or content, and analyze our traffic. By clicking "Accept All", you consent to our use of cookies. Customize Reject All Accept All Customize Consent Preferences We use cookies to help you navigate efficiently and perform certain functions. You will find detailed information about all cookies under each consent category below. The cookies that are categorized as "Necessary" are stored on your browser as they are essential for enabling the basic functionalities of the site. ... Show more Necessary Always Active Necessary cookies are required to enable the basic features of this site, such as providing secure log-in or adjusting your consent preferences. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable data. No cookies to display. Functional Functional cookies help perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collecting feedback, and other third-party features. No cookies to display. Analytics Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics such as the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc. No cookies to display. Performance Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors. No cookies to display. Advertisement Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with customized advertisements based on the pages you visited previously and to analyze the effectiveness of the ad campaigns. No cookies to display. Reject All Save My Preferences Accept All Firalis Molecular Precision Menu Services CRO et CDMO Biobanque Génomique Séquençage nouvelle génération Séquençage de cellules uniques Transcriptomique spatiale​ RT-qPCR sur mesure​ Protéomique Quantification absolue des biomarqueurs par des essais immunologiques multiplexés Détection et quantification de biomarqueurs protéiques Olink® – Identification de protéines à grande échelle Spectrométrie de Masse Lipidomique / Métabolomique Spectrométrie de masse sur mesure pour la R&D Développement d’essais & Production Production de matériel biologique​ Développement d’essais Production de kits sur mesure Analyse des données Affaires réglementaires Notre entreprise A propos de nous Engagement qualité Carrières Nous contacter FR EN Lancement de notre compte Twitter Firalis Molecular Precision a pris une mesure importante pour renforcer sa présence numérique en lançant son compte Twitter officiel. Réputée pour ses technologies de recherche de pointe et ses solutions multi-omiques innovantes, Firalis Molecular Precision vise à se rapprocher d’un public plus large et à fournir des informations précieuses sur le monde de la médecine de précision par l’intermédiaire de cette plate-forme populaire. Pour rester en contact avec Firalis Molecular Precision et avoir accès à des mises à jour du monde de la médecine de précision et des solutions multi-omiques, ne manquez pas de suivre notre compte Twitter officiel. Partager sur vos réseaux sociaux CRO et CDMO engagée à faire progresser la médecine de précision en offrant des solutions multi-omiques, à l'aide de technologies de pointe et d'expertise scientifique. Entreprise À propos Services CRO et CDMO Engagement qualité Carrières Contact Conditions et politiques Conditions d'utilisation Politiques de confidentialité GTCS Nous suivre Linkedin Twitter © Firalis Molecular Precision 2024 | Tous droits réservés.

